         The Odyssey

            Book I  Visit of Pallas to Telemachus  

  A council of the gods﻿—Deliberations concerning Ulysses﻿—Mercury despatched to Calypso, to bid her send Ulysses to Ithaca﻿—Visit of Pallas, in the shape of Mentor, to Telemachus, advising him to repair to Pylos and Sparta in quest of his father, Ulysses﻿—Revels of the suitors of Penelope﻿—Phemius, the minstrel, and his song of the return of the Grecians﻿—The suitors rebuked by Telemachus.

      Tell me, O Muse, of that sagacious man    Who, having overthrown the sacred town    Of Ilium, wandered far and visited    The capitals of many nations, learned    The customs of their dwellers, and endured    Great suffering on the deep: his life was oft    In peril, as he labored to bring back    His comrades to their homes. He saved them not,    Though earnestly he strove; they perished all,    Through their own folly; for they banqueted,    Madmen! upon the oxen of the Sun﻿—    The all-o’erlooking Sun, who cut them off    From their return. O goddess, virgin-child    Of Jove, relate some part of this to me.  

    Now all the rest, as many as escaped    The cruel doom of death, were at their homes    Safe from the perils of the war and sea,    While him alone, who pined to see his home    And wife again, Calypso, queenly nymph,    Great among goddesses, detained within    Her spacious grot, in hope that he might yet    Become her husband. Even when the years    Brought round the time in which the gods decreed    That he should reach again his dwelling-place    In Ithaca, though he was with his friends,    His toils were not yet ended. Of the gods    All pitied him save Neptune, who pursued    With wrath implacable the godlike chief,    Ulysses, even to his native land.  

    Among the Ethiopians was the god    Far off﻿—the Ethiopians most remote    Of men. Two tribes there are; one dwells beneath    The rising, one beneath the setting sun.    He went to grace a hecatomb of beeves    And lambs, and sat delighted at the feast;    While in the palace of Olympian Jove    The other gods assembled, and to them    The father of immortals and of men    Was speaking. To his mind arose the thought    Of that Aegisthus whom the famous son    Of Agamemnon, Prince Orestes, slew.    Of him he thought and thus bespake the gods:﻿—  

    “How strange it is that mortals blame the gods    And say that we inflict the ills they bear,    When they, by their own folly and against    The will of fate, bring sorrow on themselves!    As late Aegisthus, unconstrained by fate,    Married the queen of Atreus’ son and slew    The husband just returned from war. Yet well    He knew the bitter penalty, for we    Warned him. We sent the herald Argicide,    Bidding him neither slay the chief nor woo    His queen, for that Orestes, when he came    To manhood and might claim his heritage,    Would take due vengeance for Atrides slain.    So Hermes said; his prudent words moved not    The purpose of Aegisthus who now pays    The forfeit of his many crimes at once.”  

    Pallas, the blue-eyed goddess, thus replied:﻿—    “O father, son of Saturn, king of kings!    Well he deserved his death. So perish all    Guilty of deeds like his! But I am grieved    For sage Ulysses, that most wretched man,    So long detained, repining, and afar    From those he loves, upon a distant isle    Girt by the waters of the central deep﻿—    A forest isle, where dwells a deity    The daughter of wise Atlas, him who knows    The ocean to its utmost depths, and holds    Upright the lofty columns which divide    The earth from heaven. The daughter there detains    The unhappy chieftain, and with flattering words    Would win him to forget his Ithaca.    Meanwhile, impatient to behold the smokes    That rise from hearths in his own land, he pines    And willingly would die. Is not thy heart,    Olympics, touched by this? And did he not    Pay grateful sacrifice to thee beside    The Argive fleet in the broad realm of Troy?    Why then, O Jove, art thou so wroth with him?”  

    Then answered cloud-compelling Jove: “My child,    What words have passed thy lips? Can I forget    Godlike Ulysses, who in gifts of mind    Excels all other men, and who has brought    Large offerings to the gods that dwell in heaven?    Yet he who holds the earth in his embrace,    Neptune, pursues him with perpetual hate    Because of Polypheme, the Cyclops, strong    Beyond all others of his giant race,    Whose eye Ulysses had put out. The nymph    Thoosa brought him forth﻿—a daughter she    Of Phorcys, ruling in the barren deep﻿—    And in the covert of o’erhanging rocks    She met with Neptune. For this cause the god    Who shakes the shores, although he slay him not,    Sends forth Ulysses wandering far away    From his own country. Let us now consult    Together and provide for his return,    And Neptune will lay by his wrath, for vain    It were for one like him to strive alone    Against the might of all the immortal gods.”  

    And then the blue-eyed Pallas spake again:﻿—    “O father! son of Saturn, king of kings!    If such the pleasure of the blessed gods    That now the wise Ulysses shall return    To his own land, let us at once despatch    Hermes, the Argicide, our messenger,    Down to Ogygia, to the bright-haired nymph,    And make our steadfast purpose known to bring    The sufferer Ulysses to his home,    And I will haste to Ithaca, and move    His son, that with a resolute heart he call    The long-haired Greeks togethefand forbid    The excesses of the suitor train, who slay    His flocks and slow-paced beeves with crooked horns.    To Sparta I will send him and the sands    Of Pylos, to inquire for the return    Of his dear father. So a glorious fame    Shall gather round him in the eyes of men.”  

    She spake, and fastened underneath her feet    The fair, ambrosial golden sandals worn    To bear her over ocean like the wind,    And o’er the boundless land. In hand she took,    Well tipped with trenchant brass, the mighty spear,    Heavy and huge and strong, with which she bears    Whole phalanxes of heroes to the earth,    When she, the daughter of a mighty sire,    Is angered. From the Olympian heights she plunged,    And stood among the men of Ithaca,    Just at the porch and threshold of their chief,    Ulysses. In her hand she bore the spear,    And seemed the stranger Mentes, he who led    The Taphians. There before the gate she found    The haughty suitors. Some beguiled the time    With draughts, while sitting on the hides of beeves    Which they had slaughtered. Heralds were with them,    And busy menials: some who in the bowls    Tempered the wine with water, some who cleansed    The tables with light sponges, and who set    The banquet forth and carved the meats for all.  

    Telemachus the godlike was the first    To see the goddess as he sat among    The crowd of suitors, sad at heart, and thought    Of his illustrious father, who might come    And scatter those who filled his palace halls,    And win new honor, and regain the rule    Over his own. As thus he sat and mused    Among the suitors, he beheld where stood    Pallas, and forth he sprang; he could not bear    To keep a stranger waiting at his door.    He came, and taking her right hand received    The brazen spear, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “Hail, stranger! thou art truly welcome here,    First come and share our feast and be refreshed,    Then say what thou requirest at our hands.”  

    He spake and led the way, and in his steps    Pallas Athenè followed. Entering then    The lofty halls, he set the spear upright    By a tall column, in the armory    With polished walls, where rested many a lance    Of the large-souled Ulysses. Then he placed    His guest upon a throne, o’er which he spread    A covering many-hued and beautiful,    And gave her feet a footstool. Near to her    He drew his party-colored seat, aloof    From where the suitors sat; that so his guest    Might not amid those haughty revellers    Be wearied with the tumult and enjoy    His meal the less, and that himself might ask    News of his absent father. In a bowl    Of silver, from a shapely ewer of gold,    A maid poured water for the hands, and set    A polished table near them. Then approached    A venerable matron bringing bread    And delicacies gathered from the board;    And he who served the feast before them placed    Chargers with various meats, and cups of gold;    While round the board a herald moved, and poured    Wine for the guests. The haughty suitors now    Came in, and took their places on the thrones    And couches; heralds poured upon their hands    The water; maidens heaped the canisters    With bread, and all put forth their hands to share    The banquet on the board, while to the brim    Boys filled the beakers. When the calls of thirst    And hunger were appeased, the suitors thought    Of other things that well become a feast﻿—    Song and the dance. And then a herald brought    A shapely harp, and gave it to the hands    Of Phemius, who had only by constraint    Sung to the suitors. On the chords he struck    A prelude to his lay, while, as he played,    Telemachus, that others might not hear,    Leaned forward, and to blue-eyed Pallas spake:﻿—  

    “My friend and guest, wilt thou take no offence    At what I say? These revellers enjoy    The harp and song, for at no cost of theirs    They waste the substance of another man,    Whose white bones now are mouldering in the rain    Upon some mainland, or are tossed about    By ocean billows. Should they see him once    In Ithaca, their prayers would rather rise    For swifter feet than richer stores of gold    And raiment. But an evil fate is his,    And he has perished. Even should we hear    From any of the dwellers upon earth    That he is near at hand, we could not hope.    For him is no return. But now, I pray,    Tell me, and frankly tell me, who thou art,    And of what race of men, and where thy home,    And who thy parents; how the mariners    Brought thee to Ithaca, and who they claim    To be, for well I deem thou couldst not come    Hither on foot. All this, I pray, relate    Truly, that I may know the whole. Art thou    For the first time arrived, or hast thou been    My father’s guest? for many a stranger once    Resorted to our palace, and he knew    The way to win the kind regard of men.”  

    Pallas, the blue-eyed goddess, answered thus:﻿—    “I will tell all and truly. I am named    Mentes; my father was the great in war    Anchialus. I rule a people skilled    To wield the oar, the Taphians, and I come    With ship and crew across the dark blue deep    To Temesè, and to a race whose speech    Is different from my own, in quest of brass,    And bringing bright steel with me. I have left    Moored at the field behind the town my barque,    Within the bay of Reithrus, and beneath    The woods of Neius. We claim to be    Guests by descent, and from our fathers’ time,    As thou wilt learn if thou shouldst meet and ask    Laertes, the old hero. It is said    He comes no more within the city walls,    But in the fields dwells sadly by himself,    Where an old handmaid sets upon his board    His food and drink when weariness unnerves    His limbs in creeping o’er the fertile soil    Of his rich vineyard. I am come because    I heard thy father had at last returned,    And now am certain that the gods delay    His journey hither; for the illustrious man    Cannot have died, but is detained alone    Somewhere upon the ocean, in some spot    Girt by the waters. There do cruel men    And savage keep him, pining to depart.    Now let me speak of what the gods reveal,    And what I deem will surely come to pass,    Although I am no seer and have no skill    In omens drawn from birds. Not long the chief    Will be an exile from his own dear land,    Though fettered to his place by links of steel;    For he has large invention, and will plan    A way for his escape. Now tell me this,    And truly; tall in stature as thou art,    Art thou in fact Ulysses’ son? In face    And glorious eyes thou dost resemble him    Exceedingly; for he and I of yore    Were oftentimes companions, ere he sailed    For Ilium, whither also went the best    Among the Argives in their roomy ships,    Nor have we seen each other since that day.”  

    Telemachus, the prudent, spake: “O guest,    True answer shalt thou have. My mother says    I am his son; I know not; never man    Knew his own father. Would I were the son    Of one whose happier lot it was to meet    Amidst his own estates the approach of age.    Now the most wretched of the sons of men    Is he to whom they say I owe my birth.    Thus is thy question answered.” Then again    Spake blue-eyed Pallas: “Of a truth, the gods    Ordain not that thy race, in years to come,    Should be inglorious, since Penelope    Hath borne thee such as I behold thee now.    But frankly answer me﻿—what feast is here,    And what is this assembly? What may be    The occasion? is a banquet given? is this    A wedding? A collation, where the guests    Furnish the meats, I think it cannot be,    So riotously goes the revel on    Throughout the palace. A well-judging man,    If he should come among them, would be moved    With anger at the shameful things they do.”  

    Again Telemachus, the prudent, spake:﻿—    “Since thou dost ask me, stranger, know that once    Rich and illustrious might this house be called    While yet the chief was here. But now the gods    Have grown unkind and willed it otherwise,    They make his fate a mystery beyond    The fate of other men. I should not grieve    So deeply for his loss if he had fallen    With his companions on the field of Troy,    Or midst his kindred when the war was o’er.    Then all the Greeks had built his monument,    And he had left his son a heritage    Of glory. Now has he become the prey    Of Harpies, perishing ingloriously,    Unseen, his fate unheard of, and has left    Mourning and grief, my portion. Not for him    Alone I grieve; the gods have cast on me    Yet other hardships. All the chiefs who rule    The isles, Dulichium, Samos, and the groves    That shade Zacynthus, and who bear the sway    In rugged Ithaca, have come to woo    My mother, and from day to day consume    My substance. She rejects not utterly    Their hateful suit, and yet she cannot bear    To end it by a marriage. Thus they waste    My heritage, and soon will seek my life.”  

    Again in grief and anger Pallas spake:﻿—    “Yea, greatly dost thou need the absent chief    Ulysses here, that he might lay his hands    Upon these shameless suitors. Were he now    To come and stand before the palace gate    With helm and buckler and two spears, as first    I saw him in our house, when drinking wine    And feasting, just returned from Ephyrè    Where Ilus dwelt, the son of Mermerus﻿—    For thither went Ulysses in a barque,    To seek a deadly drug with which to taint    His brazen arrows; Ilus gave it not;    He feared the immortal gods; my father gave    The poison, for exceedingly he loved    His guest﻿—could now Ulysses, in such guise,    Once meet the suitors, short would be their lives    And bitter would the marriage banquet be.    Yet whether he return or not to take    Vengeance, in his own palace, on this crew    Of wassailers, rests only with the gods.    Now let me counsel thee to think betimes    How thou shalt thrust them from thy palace gates.    Observe me, and attend to what I say:    Tomorrow thou shalt call the Achaian chiefs    To an assembly; speak before them all,    And be the gods thy witnesses. Command    The suitors all to separate for their homes;    And if thy mother’s mind be bent to wed,    Let her return to where her father dwells,    A mighty prince, and there they will appoint    Magnificent nuptials, and an ample dower    Such as should honor a beloved child.    And now, if thou wilt heed me, I will give    A counsel for thy good. Man thy best ship    With twenty rowers, and go forth to seek    News of thy absent father. Thou shalt hear    Haply of him from someone of the sons    Of men, or else some word of rumor sent    By Jove, revealing what mankind should know.    First shape thy course for Pylos, and inquire    Of noble Nestor; then, at Sparta, ask    Of fair-haired Menelaus, for he came    Last of the mailed Achaians to his home.    And shouldst thou learn that yet thy father lives,    And will return, have patience yet a year,    However hard it seem. But shouldst thou find    That he is now no more, return forthwith    To thy own native land, and pile on high    His monument, and let the funeral rites    Be sumptuously performed as may become    The dead, and let thy mother wed again.    And when all this is fully brought to pass,    Take counsel with thy spirit and thy heart    How to destroy the suitor crew that haunt    Thy palace, whether by a secret snare    Or open force. No longer shouldst thou act    As if thou wert a boy; thou hast outgrown    The age of childish sports. Hast thou not heard    What honor the divine Orestes gained    With all men, when he slew the murderer,    The crafty wretch Aegisthus, by whose hand    The illustrious father of Orestes died?    And then, my friend﻿—for I perceive that thou    Art of a manly and a stately growth﻿—    Be also bold, that men hereafter born    May give thee praise. And now must I depart    To my good ship, and to my friends who wait,    Too anxiously perhaps, for my return.    Act wisely now, and bear my words in mind.”  

    The prudent youth Telemachus rejoined:﻿—    “Well hast thou spoken, and with kind intent,    O stranger! like a father to a son;    And ne’er shall I forget what thou hast said.    Yet stay, I pray thee, though in haste, and bathe    And be refreshed, and take to thy good ship    Some gift with thee, such as may please thee well,    Precious and rare, which thou mayst ever keep    In memory of me﻿—a gift like those    Which friendly hosts bestow upon their guests.”  

    Then spake the blue-eyed Pallas: “Stay me not,    For now would I depart. Whatever gift    Thy heart may prompt thee to bestow, reserve    Till I come back, that I may bear it home,    And thou shalt take some precious thing in turn.”  

    So spake the blue-eyed Pallas, and withdrew,    Ascending like a bird. She filled his heart    With strength and courage, waking vividly    His father’s memory. Then the noble youth    Went forth among the suitors. Silent all    They sat and listened to the illustrious bard,    Who sang of the calamitous return    Of the Greek host from Troy, at the command    Of Pallas. From her chamber o’er the hall    The daughter of Icarius, the sage queen    Penelope, had heard the heavenly strain,    And knew its theme. Down by the lofty stairs    She came, but not alone; there followed her    Two maidens. When the glorious lady reached    The threshold of the strong-built hall, where sat    The suitors, holding up a delicate veil    Before her face, and with a gush of tears,    The queen bespake the sacred minstrel thus:﻿—  

    “Phemius! thou knowest many a pleasing theme﻿—    The deeds of gods and heroes, such as bards    Are wont to celebrate. Take then thy place    And sing of one of these, and let the guests    In silence drink the wine; but cease this strain;    It is too sad; it cuts me to the heart,    And wakes a sorrow without bounds﻿—such grief    I bear for him, my lord, of whom I think    Continually; whose glory is abroad    Through Hellas and through Argos, everywhere.”  

    And then Telemachus, the prudent, spake:﻿—    “Why, O my mother! canst thou not endure    That thus the well-graced poet should delight    His hearers with a theme to which his mind    Is inly moved? The bards deserve no blame;    Jove is the cause, for he at will inspires    The lay that each must sing. Reprove not, then,    The minstrel who relates the unhappy fate    Of the Greek warriors. All men most applaud    The song that has the newest theme; and thou﻿—    Strengthen thy heart to hear it. Keep in mind    That not alone Ulysses is cut off    From his return, but that with him at Troy    Have many others perished. Now withdraw    Into thy chamber; ply thy household tasks,    The loom, the spindle; bid thy maidens speed    Their work. To say what words beseem a feast    Belongs to man, and most to me; for here    Within these walls the authority is mine.”  

    The matron, wondering at his words, withdrew    To her own place, but in her heart laid up    Her son’s wise sayings. When she now had reached,    With her attendant maids, the upper rooms,    She mourned Ulysses, her beloved spouse,    And wept, till blue-eyed Pallas closed her lids    In gentle slumbers. Noisily, meanwhile,    The suitors revelled in the shadowy halls;    And thus Telemachus, the prudent, spake:﻿—  

    “Ye suitors of my mother, insolent    And overbearing; cheerful be our feast,    Not riotous. It would become us well    To listen to the lay of such a bard,    So like the gods in voice. I bid you all    Meet in full council with the morrow morn,    That I may give you warning to depart    From out my palace, and to seek your feasts    Elsewhere at your own charge﻿—haply to hold    Your daily banquets at each other’s homes.    But if it seem to you the better way    To plunder one man’s goods, go on to waste    My substance; I will call the immortal gods    To aid me, and if Jupiter allow    Fit retribution for your deeds, ye die,    Within this very palace, unavenged.”  

    He spake; the suitors bit their close-pressed lips,    Astonished at the youth’s courageous words.    And thus Antinoüs, Eupeithes’ son,    Made answer: “Most assuredly the gods,    Telemachus, have taught thee how to frame    Grand sentences and gallantly harangue.    Ne’er may the son of Saturn make thee king    Over the seagirt Ithaca, whose isle    Is thy inheritance by claim of birth.”  

    Telemachus, the prudent, thus rejoined:﻿—    “Wilt thou be angry at the word I speak,    Antinoüs? I would willingly accept    The kingly station if conferred by Jove.    Dost thou indeed regard it as the worst    Of all conditions of mankind? Not so    For him who reigns; his house grows opulent,    And he the more is honored. Many kings    Within the bounds of seagirt Ithaca    There are, both young and old, let anyone    Bear rule, since great Ulysses is no more;    But I will be the lord of mine own house,    And o’er my servants whom the godlike chief,    Ulysses, brought from war, his share of spoil.”  

    Eurymachus, the son of Polybus,    Addressed the youth in turn: “Assuredly,    What man hereafter, of the Achaian race,    Shall bear the rule o’er seagirt Ithaca    Rests with the gods. But thou shalt keep thy wealth,    And may no son of violence come to make    A spoil of thy possessions while men dwell    In Ithaca. And now, my friend, I ask    Who was thy guest; whence came he, of what land    Claims he to be, where do his kindred dwell,    And where his patrimonial acres lie?    With tidings of thy father’s near return    Came he, or to receive a debt? How swift    Was his departure, waiting not for us    To know him! yet in aspect and in air    He seemed to be no man of vulgar note.”  

    Telemachus, the prudent, answered thus:﻿—    “My father’s coming, O Eurymachus,    Is to be hoped no more; nor can I trust    Tidings from whatsoever part they come,    Nor pay regard to oracles, although    My mother send to bring a soothsayer    Within the palace, and inquire of him.    But this man was my father’s guest; he comes    From Taphos; Mentes is his name, a son    Of the brave chief Anchialus; he reigns    Over the Taphians, men who love the sea.”  

    He spake, but in his secret heart he knew    The immortal goddess. Then the suitors turned.    Delighted, to the dance and cheerful song,    And waited for the evening. On their sports    The evening with its shadowy blackness came;    Then each to his own home withdrew to sleep,    While to his lofty chamber, in full view,    Built high in that magnificent palace home,    Telemachus went up, and sought his couch,    Intent on many thoughts. The chaste and sage    Dame Eurycleia by his side went up    With lighted torches﻿—she a child of Ops,    Pisenor’s son. Her, in her early bloom,    Laertes purchased for a hundred beeves,    And in his palace honored equally    With his chaste wife; yet never sought her bed.    He would not wrong his queen. ’Twas she who bore    The torches with Telemachus. She loved    Her young lord more than all the other maids,    And she had nursed him in his tender years.    He opened now the chamber door and sat    Upon the couch, put his soft tunic off    And placed it in the prudent matron’s hands.    She folded it and smoothed it, hung it near    To that fair bed, and, going quickly forth,    Pulled at the silver ring to close the door,    And drew the thong that moved the fastening bolt.    He, lapped in the soft fleeces, all night long.    Thought of the voyage Pallas had ordained.  

            Book II  Departure of Telemachus from Ithica  

  The chief men of Ithica assembled by Telemachus﻿—His complaint of the suitors﻿—Their attempt to justify themselves﻿—Prophecy of the return of Ulysses by the seer, Halitherses﻿—Request of Telemachus for a vessel to visit Pylos and Sparta, in quest of his father, granted by the assembly﻿—Preparations for his departure.

      Now when the Morning, child of Dawn, appeared,    The dear son of Ulysses left his bed    And put his garments on. His trenchant sword    He hung upon his shoulders, and made fast    His shapely sandals to his shining feet,    And issued from his chamber like a god.    At once he bade the clear-voiced heralds call    The long-haired Greeks to council. They obeyed,    Quickly the chiefs assembled, and when all    Were at the appointed place, Telemachus    Went to the council, bearing in his hand    A brazen spear, yet went he not alone.    Two swift dogs followed him, while Pallas shed    A heavenly beauty over him, and all    Admired him as he came. He took the seat    Of his great father, and the aged men    Made way for him. And then Aegyptius spake﻿—    A hero bowed with age, who much had seen    And known. His son, the warlike Antiphus,    Went with the great Ulysses in his fleet    To courser-breeding Troy, and afterward    The cruel Cyclops, in the vaulted cave,    Slew him for his last meal. Three other sons    There were, and one of these, Eurynomus,    Was of the suitor train; the others took    Charge of their father’s acres. Never yet    Had he forgotten his lost son or ceased    To grieve for him, and as he spoke he wept  

    “Hear, men of Ithaca, what I shall say.    No council, no assembly, have we held    Since great Ulysses in his roomy ships    Departed from our isle. Who now is he    That summons us? On which of our young men    Or elders presses this necessity?    Is it belike that one of you has heard    Of an approaching foe, and can declare    The tidings clearly? Or would he propose    And urge some other matter which concerns    The public weal? A just and generous mind    I deem is his, and ’tis my hope that Jove    Will bring to pass the good at which he aims.”  

    As thus he spake Ulysses’ son rejoiced    In his auspicious words, nor longer kept    His seat, but, yielding to an inward force,    Rose midst them all to speak, while in his hand    Pisenor, the sagacious counsellor    And herald, placed the sceptre. Then he turned    To the old man, Aegyptius, speaking thus:﻿—  

    “O aged man, not far from thee is he    Who called this council, as thou soon shalt know    Mine chiefly is the trouble; I have brought    No news of an approaching foe, which I    Was first to hear, and would declare to all,    Nor urge I other matters which concern    The public weal; my own necessity﻿—    The evil that has fallen on my house﻿—    Constrains me; it is twofold. First, that I    Have lost an excellent father, who was king    Among you, and ruled o’er you with a sway    As gentle as a father’s. Greater yet    Is the next evil, and will soon o’erthrow    My house and waste my substance utterly.    Suitors, the sons of those who, in our isle,    Hold the chief rank, importunately press    Round my unwilling mother. They disdain    To ask her of Icarius, that the king    Her father may endow her, and bestow    His daughter on the man who best may gain    His favor, but with every day they come    Into our palace, sacrificing here    Oxen and sheep and fatling goats, and hold    High festival, and drink the purple wine    Unstinted, with unbounded waste; for here    Is no man like Ulysses to repel    The mischief from my house. Not such are we    As he was, to resist the wrong. We pass    For weaklings, immature in valor, yet    If I had but the power, assuredly    I would resist, for by these men are done    Insufferable things, nor does my house    Perish with honor. Ye yourselves should feel    Shame at these doings; ye should dread reproach    From those who dwell around us, and should fear    The offended gods, lest they repay these crimes    With vengeance. I beseech you, O my friends,    Both by Olympian Jove, and her by whom    Councils of men are summoned and dissolved﻿—    The goddess Themis﻿—that ye all refrain,    And leave me to my grief alone, unless    Ulysses, my great father, may have done    Wrong in his anger to the gallant Greeks,    Which ye, by prompting men to acts like these,    Seek to avenge on me. Far better ’twere,    Should ye yourselves destroy our goods and slay    Our herds, since, were it so, there might in time    Be some requital. We, from street to street,    Would plead continually for recompense,    Till all should be restored. But now ye heap    Upon me wrongs for which is no redress.”  

    Thus angrily he spake, and clashed to earth    The sceptre, shedding tears. The people felt    Compassion; all were silent for a space,    And there was none who dared with railing words    Answer Telemachus, save one alone,    Antinoüs, who arose and thus replied:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, thou youth of braggart speech    And boundless in abuse, what hast thou said    To our dishonor? Thou wouldst fix on us    A brand of shame. The blame is not with us,    The Achaian suitors; ’tis thy mother’s fault,    Skilled as she is in crafty shifts. ’Tis now    Already the third year, and soon will be    The fourth, since she began to cozen us.    She gives us all to hope, and sends fair words    To each by message, yet in her own mind    Has other purposes. This shrewd device    She planned; she laid upon the loom a web,    Delicate, wide, and vast in length, and said    Thus to us all: ‘Young princes, who are come    To woo me, since Ulysses is no more﻿—    My noble husband﻿—urge me not, I pray,    To marriage, till I finish in the loom﻿—    That so my threads may not be spun in vain﻿—    A funeral vesture for the hero-chief    Laertes, when his fatal hour shall come    With death’s long sleep. Else some Achaian dame    Might blame me, should I leave without a shroud    Him who in life possessed such ample wealth!’    Such were her words, and easily they wrought    Upon our generous minds. So went she on,    Weaving that ample web, and every night    Unravelled it by torchlight. Three full years    She practised thus, and by the fraud deceived    The Grecian youths; but when the hours had brought    The fourth year round, a woman who knew all    Revealed the mystery, and we ourselves    Saw her unravelling the ample web.    Thenceforth, constrained, and with unwilling hands,    She finished it. Now let the suitors make    Their answer to thy words, that thou mayst know    Our purpose fully, and the Achaians all    May know it likewise. Send thy mother hence,    Requiring that she wed the suitor whom    Her father chooses and herself prefers.    But if she still go on to treat the sons    Of Greece with such despite, too confident    In gifts which Pallas has bestowed on her    So richly, noble arts, and faculties    Of mind, and crafty shifts, beyond all those    Of whom we ever heard that lived of yore,    The bright-haired ladies of the Achaian race,    Tyro, Alcmena, and Mycenè, famed    For glossy tresses, none of them endowed    As is Penelope, though this last shift    Be ill devised﻿—so long will we consume    Thy substance and estate as she shall hold    Her present mood, the purpose which the gods    Have planted in her breast. She to herself    Gains great renown, but surely brings on thee    Loss of much goods. And now we go not hence    To our affairs nor elsewhere, till she wed    Whichever of the Greeks may please her most.”  

    And then rejoined discreet Telemachus:﻿—    “Antinoüs, grievous wrong it were to send    Unwilling from this palace her who bore    And nursed me. Whether he be living yet    Or dead, my father is in distant lands;    And should I, of my own accord and will,    Dismiss my mother, I must make perforce    Icarius large amends, and that were hard.    And he would do me mischief, and the gods    Would send yet other evils on my head.    For then my mother, going forth, would call    On the grim Furies, and the general curse    Of all men would be on me. Think not I    Will ever speak that word. But if ye bear    A sense of injury for what is past,    Go from these halls; provide for other feasts,    Consuming what is yours, and visiting    Each other’s homes in turn. But if it seem    To you the wiser and the better way    To plunder one man’s goods, go on to waste    My substance. I shall call the eternal gods    To aid me, and, if Jupiter allow    Fit retribution for your crimes, ye die    Within this very palace unavenged.”  

    So spake Telemachus. The Thunderer, Jove,    Sent flying from a lofty mountain-top    Two eagles. First they floated on the wind    Close to each other, and with wings outspread;    But as they came to where the murmuring crowd    Was gathered just beneath their flight, they turned    And clapped their heavy pinions, looking down    With deadly omen on the heads below,    And with their talons tore each other’s cheeks    And necks, and then they darted to the right    Away through Ithaca among its roofs.    All who beheld the eagles were amazed,    And wondered what event was near at hand.    Among the rest an aged hero spake,    Named Halitherses, Mastor’s son. He knew    More truly than the others of his age,    To augur from the flight of birds, and read    The will of fate﻿—and wisely thus he spake:﻿—  

    “Hear, men of Ithaca, what I shall say.    I speak of what most narrowly concerns    The suitors, over whom already hangs    Great peril, for Ulysses will not be    Long at a distance from his home and friends.    Even now he is not far, and meditates    Slaughter and death to all the suitor train;    And evil will ensue to many more    Of us, who dwell in sunny Ithaca.    Now let us think what measures may restrain    These men﻿—or let them of their own accord    Desist﻿—the soonest were for them the best.    For not as one untaught do I foretell    Events to come, but speak of what I know.    All things that I predicted to our chief,    What time the Argive troops embarked for Troy,    And sage Ulysses with them, are fulfilled;    I said that after many hardships borne,    And all his comrades lost, the twentieth year    Would bring him back, a stranger to us all﻿—    And all that then I spake of comes to pass.”  

    Eurymachus, the son of Polybus,    Answered the seer: “Go to thy house, old man,    And to thy boys, and prophesy to them,    Lest evil come upon them. I can act,    In matters such as these, a prophet’s part    Better than thou. True, there are many birds    That fly about in sunshine, but not all    Are ominous. Ulysses far away    Has perished; well it would have been if thou    Hadst perished with him; then thou wouldst not prate    Idly of things to come, nor wouldst thou stir    Telemachus to anger, in the hope    Of bearing to thy house some gift from him.    Now let me say, and be assured my words    Will be fulfilled: experienced as thou art,    If thou by treacherous speeches shalt inflame    A younger man than thou to violent deeds,    The sharper punishment shall first be his,    But we will lay on thee a penalty,    Old man, which thou shalt find it hard to bear,    And bitterly wilt thou repent. And now    Let me persuade Telemachus to send    His mother to her father. They will make    A marriage for her there, and give with her    A liberal dowry, such as may become    A favorite daughter on her wedding-day,    Else never will the sons of Greece renounce,    I think, the difficult suit. We do not fear    Telemachus himself, though glib of speech,    Nor care we for the empty oracle    Which thou, old man, dost utter, making thee    Only more hated. Still will his estate    Be wasted, nor will order e’er return    While she defers her marriage with some prince    Of the Achaians. We shall urge our suit    For that most excellent of womankind    As rivals, nor withdraw to seek the hand    Of others, whom we fitly might espouse.”  

    To this discreet Telemachus replied:﻿—    “Eurymachus, and ye, the illustrious train    Of suitors, I have nothing more to ask﻿—    No more to say﻿—for now the gods and all    The Achaians know the truth. But let me have    A gallant barque, and twenty men to make    From coast to coast a voyage, visiting    Sparta and sandy Pylos, to inquire    For my long-absent father, and the chance    Of his return, if any of mankind    Can tell me aught, or if some rumor come    From Jove, since thus are tidings often brought    To human knowledge. Should I learn that yet    He lives and may return, I then would wait    A twelvemonth, though impatient. Should I hear    That he no longer lives, I shall return    Homeward, and pile his monument on high    With funeral honors that become the dead,    And give my mother to a second spouse.”  

    He spake and took his seat, and then arose    Mentor, once comrade of the excellent chief    Ulysses, who, departing with his fleet,    Consigned his household to the aged man,    That they should all obey him, and that he    Should safely keep his charge. He rose amid    The assembly, and addressed them wisely thus:﻿—  

    “Hear and attend, ye men of Ithaca,    To what I say. Let never sceptred king    Henceforth be gracious, mild, and merciful,    And righteous; rather be he deaf to prayer    And prone to deeds of wrong, since no one now    Remembers the divine Ulysses more,    Among the people over whom he ruled    Benignly like a father. Yet I bear    No envy to the haughty suitors here,    Moved as they are to deeds of violence    By evil counsels, since, in pillaging    The substance of Ulysses, who they say    Will nevermore return, they risk their lives.    But I am angry with the rest, with all    Of you who sit here mute, nor even with words    Of stern reproof restrain their violence,    Though ye so many are and they so few.”  

    Leiocritus, Evenor’s son, rejoined:﻿—    “Malicious Mentor, foolish man! what talk    Is this of holding us in check? ’Twere hard    For numbers even greater than our own    To drive us from a feast. And should the prince    Of Ithaca, Ulysses, come himself,    Thinking to thrust the illustrious suitors forth    That banquet in these palace halls, his queen    Would have no cause for joy at his return,    Greatly as she desired it. He would draw    Sure death upon himself in strife with us    Who are so many. Thou hast spoken ill.    Now let the people who are gathered here    Disperse to their employments. We will leave    Mentor and Halitherses, who were both    His father’s early comrades, to provide    For the youth’s voyage. He will yet remain    A long time here, I think, to ask for news    In Ithaca, and never will set sail.”  

    Thus having said, he instantly dismissed    The people; they departed to their homes;    The suitors sought the palace of the prince.  

    Then to the ocean-side, apart from all,    Went forth Telemachus, and washed his hands    In the gray surf, and prayed to Pallas thus:﻿—  

    “Hear me, thou deity who yesterday,    In visiting our palace, didst command    That I should traverse the black deep to learn    News of my absent father, and the chance    Of his return! The Greeks themselves withstand,    My purpose; the proud suitors most of all.”  

    Such was his prayer, and straightway Pallas stood,    In form and voice like Mentor, by his side,    And thus accosted him with winged words:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, thou henceforth shalt not lack    Valor or wisdom. If with thee abides    Thy father’s gallant spirit, as he was    In deed and word, thou wilt not vainly make    This voyage. But if thou be not in truth    The son of him and of Penelope,    Then I rely not on thee to perform    What thou dost meditate. Few sons are like    Their fathers: most are worse, a very few    Excel their parents. Since thou wilt not lack    Valor and wisdom in the coming time,    Nor is thy father’s shrewdness wanting quite    In thee, great hope there is that happily    This plan will be fulfilled. Regard not then    The suitor train, their purposes and plots.    Senseless are they, as little wise as just,    And have no thought of the black doom of death    Now drawing near to sweep them in a day    To their destruction. But thy enterprise    Must suffer no delay. So much am I    Thy father’s friend and thine, that I will cause    A swift barque to be fitted out for sea,    And will myself attend thee. Go now hence    Among the suitors, and make ready there    The needful stores, and let them all be put    In vessels﻿—wine in jars, and meal, the strength    Of man, in close thick skins﻿—while I engage,    Among the people here, a willing crew.    Ships are there in our seagirt Ithaca    Full many, new and old, and I will choose    The best of these, and see it well equipped.    Then will we drag it down to the broad sea.”  

    Thus Pallas spake, the child of Jupiter.    Telemachus obeyed the heavenly voice,    And stayed not; home he hastened, where he saw    Sadly the arrogant suitors in the hall,    Busily flaying goats and roasting swine.    Antinoüs, laughing, came to meet the youth.    And fastened on his hand, and thus he spake:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, thou youth of lofty speech    And boundless in abuse, let neither word    Nor deed that may displease thee vex thy heart,    But gayly eat and drink as thou wert wont.    The Achaians generously will provide    Whatever thou requirest, ship and men﻿—    All chosen rowers﻿—that thou mayst arrive    Sooner at sacred Pylos, there to learn    Tidings of thy illustrious father’s fate.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus in turn:﻿—    “Antinoüs, never could I sit with you,    Arrogant ones! in silence nor enjoy    The feast in quiet. Is it not enough,    O suitors, that while I was yet a child    Ye wasted on your revelries my large    And rich possessions? Now that I am grown,    And, when I hear the words of other men,    Discern their meaning, now that every day    Strengthens my spirit, I will make the attempt    To bring the evil fates upon your heads,    Whether I go to Pylos or remain    Among this people. I shall surely make    This voyage, and it will not be in vain.    Although I go a passenger on board    Another’s ship﻿—since neither ship have I    Nor rowers﻿—ye have judged that so were best.”  

    He spake, and quickly from the suitor’s hand    Withdrew his own. The others who prepared    Their banquet in the palace scoffed at him,    And flung at him their bitter taunts, and one    Among the insolent youths reviled him thus:﻿—  

    “Telemachus is certainly resolved    To butcher us. He goes to bring allies    From sandy Pylos or the Spartan coast,    He is so bent on slaughter. Or perhaps    He visits the rich land of Ephyrè    In search of deadly poisons to be thrown    Into a cup and end us all at once.”  

    Then said another of the haughty youths:﻿—    “Who knows but, wandering in his hollow barque,    He too may perish, far from all his friends,    Just as Ulysses perished? This would bring    Increase of labor; it would cast on us    The trouble to divide his goods, and give    His palace to his mother, and to him    Who takes the woman as his wedded wife.”  

    So spake they, but Telemachus went down    To that high-vaulted room, his father’s, where    Lay heaps of gold and brass, and garments store    In chests, and fragrant oils. And there stood casks    Of delicate old wine and pure, a drink    For gods, in rows against the wall, to wait    If ever, after many hardships borne,    Ulysses should return. Upon that room    Close-fitting double doors were shut, and there    Was one who night and day kept diligent watch,    A woman, Eurycleia, child of Ops,    Peisenor’s son. Telemachus went in    And called her to him, and bespake her thus:﻿—  

    “Nurse, let sweet wine be drawn into my jars,    The finest next to that which thou dost keep    Expecting our unhappy lord, if yet    The nobly born Ulysses shall escape    The doom of death and come to us again.    Fill twelve, and fit the covers close, and pour    Meal into well-sewn skins, and let the tale    Be twenty measures of the flour of wheat.    This none but thou must know. Let all these things    Be brought together; then, as night shuts in,    When to her upper chamber, seeking rest,    My mother shall withdraw, I come and take    What thou providest for me. I am bound    For Sparta and for Pylos in the sands,    To gather news concerning the return    Of my dear father, if I haply may.”  

    So spake the youth, and his beloved nurse    Sobbed, wept aloud, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “Why should there come, dear child, a thought like this    Into thy heart. Why wouldst thou wander forth    To distant regions﻿—thou an only son    And dearly loved? Ulysses, nobly born,    Has perished, from his native land afar,    ’Mid a strange race. These men, when thou art gone,    At once will lay their plots to take thy life,    And share thy wealth among them. Stay thou here    Among thy people; need is none that thou    Shouldst suffer, roaming o’er the barren deep.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:﻿—    “Be of good cheer, O nurse, for my design    Is not without the sanction of a god;    But swear thou not to let my mother know    Of my intent until the eleventh day    Or twelfth shall pass, or till, in missing me,    She learn of my departure, lest she weep    And stain with tears the beauty of her face.”  

    He spake; the ancient woman solemnly    Swore by the gods, and when the rite was o’er    Drew wine into the jars, and poured the meal    Into the well-sewn skins. Telemachus    Entered the hall and joined the suitor train.  

    Then did the blue-eyed goddess turn her thoughts    To other plans, and taking on herself    The semblance of Telemachus, she ranged    The city, speaking to each man in turn,    And bidding him at nightfall to repair    To where the good ship lay. That gallant ship    She begged of the renowned Noëmon, son    Of Phronius, who with cheerful grace complied.  

    The sun went down, the city streets lay all    In shadow. Then she drew the good ship down    Into the sea, and brought and put on board    The appointments every well-built galley needs,    And moored her at the bottom of the port,    Where, in a throng, obedient to the word    Of Pallas, round her came her gallant crew.  

    With yet a new device the blue-eyed maid    Went to the palace of the godlike chief    Ulysses, where she poured a gentle sleep    Over the suitors. As they drank she made    Their senses wander, and their hands let fall    The goblets. Now no longer at the board    They sat, but sallied forth, and through the town    Went to their slumbers, for the power of sleep    Had fallen heavily upon their lids.    Then blue-eyed Pallas from those sumptuous halls    Summoned Telemachus. She took the form    And voice of Mentor, and bespake him thus:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, already at their oars    Sit thy well-armed companions and await    Thy coming; let us go without delay.”  

    Thus having spoken, Pallas led the way    With rapid footsteps which he followed fast;    Till having reached the galley and the sea    They found their long-haired comrades at the beach,    And thus the gallant prince Telemachus    Bespake them: “Hither, comrades, let us bring    The sea-stores from the dwelling where they lie;    My mother knows not of it, nor her maids;    The secret has been told to one alone.”  

    He spake, and went before them. In his steps    They followed. To the gallant barque they brought    The stores, and, as the well-beloved son    Of King Ulysses bade, they laid them down    Within the hull. Telemachus went up    The vessel’s side, but Pallas first embarked,    And at the stern sat down, while next to her    Telemachus was seated. Then the crew    Cast loose the fastenings and went all on board,    And took their places on the rowers’ seats,    While blue-eyed Pallas sent a favoring breeze,    A fresh wind from the west, that murmuring swept    The dark-blue main. Telemachus gave forth    The word to wield the tackle; they obeyed,    And raised the fir-tree mast, and, fitting it    Into its socket, bound it fast with cords,    And drew and spread with firmly twisted ropes    The shining sails on high. The steady wind    Swelled out the canvas in the midst; the ship    Moved on, the dark sea roaring round her keel,    As swiftly through the waves she cleft her way.    And when the rigging of that swift black ship    Was firmly in its place, they filled their cups    With wine, and to the ever-living gods    Poured out libations, most of all to one,    Jove’s blue-eyed daughter. Thus through all that night    And all the ensuing morn they held their way.  

            Book III  Interview of Telemachus with Nestor  

  Arrival of Telemachus, with Pallas in the shape of Mentor, at Pylos﻿—His interview with Nestor﻿—Nestor’s narrative of his return from Troy﻿—History of the death of Agamemnon and the revenge of Orestes﻿—Departure of Pallas to heaven﻿—Telemachus sent by Nestor with his son Peisistratus to Menelaus at Sparta.

      Now from the fair broad bosom of the sea    Into the brazen vault of heaven the sun    Rose shining for the immortals and for men    Upon the foodful earth. The voyagers    Arrived at Pylos, nobly built, the town    Of Neleus. There, upon the ocean-side,    They found the people offering coal-black steers    To dark-haired Neptune. On nine seats they sat,    Five hundred on each seat; nine steers were slain    For each five hundred there. While they performed    The rite, and, tasting first the entrails, burned    The thighs to ocean’s god, the Ithacans    Touched land, and, lifting up the good ship’s sail,    Furled it and moored the keel, and then stepped out    Upon the shore. Forth from the galley came    Telemachus, the goddess guiding him,    And thus to him the blue-eyed Pallas said:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, there now is no excuse,    Not even the least, for shamefaced backwardness.    Thou hast come hither o’er the deep to ask    For tidings of thy father﻿—what far land    Conceals him, what the fate that he has met.    Go then at once to Nestor, the renowned    In horsemanship, and we shall see what plan    He hath in mind for thee. Entreat him there    That frankly he declare it. He will speak    No word of falsehood; he is truly wise.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:﻿—    “O Mentor, how shall I approach the chief,    And with what salutation? Little skill    Have I in courtly phrase, and shame becomes    A youth in questioning an aged man.”  

    Pallas, the blue-eyed goddess, spake again:﻿—    “In part thy mind will prompt thy speech; in part    A god will put the words into thy mouth﻿—    For well I deem that thou wert neither born    Nor trained without the favor of the gods.”  

    Thus having said, the blue-eyed Pallas moved    With hasty pace before, and in her steps    He followed close, until they reached the seats    Of those assembled Pylians. Nestor there    Sat with his sons, while his companions stood    Around him and prepared the feast, and some    Roasted the flesh at fires, and some transfixed    The parts with spits. As they beheld the approach    Of strangers they advanced, and took their hands,    And bade them sit. Peisistratus, a son    Of Nestor, came the first of all, and took    A hand of each, and placed them at the feast    On the soft hides that o’er the ocean sand    Were spread beside his brother Thrasymed    And his own father; brought for their repast    Parts of the entrails, poured for them the wine    Into a golden goblet, held it forth    In his right hand, and with these words bespake    Pallas, the child of aegis-bearing Jove:﻿—  

    “Pray, stranger, to King Neptune. Ye have chanced    Upon his feast in coming to our coast.    And after thy libation poured, and prayer    Made to the god, give over to thy friend    The goblet of choice wine that he may make    Libation also; he, I question not,    Prays to the gods; we all have need of them.    A younger man is he than thou, and seems    In age to be my equal; therefore I    Will give the golden goblet first to thee.”  

    He spake, and in the hands of Pallas placed    The goblet of choice wine. Well pleased was she    With one so just and so discreet﻿—well pleased    That first to her he reached the cup of gold,    And thus she prayed to Neptune fervently:﻿—  

    “Hear, Neptune, thou who dost embrace the earth,    And of thy grace disdain not to bestow    These blessings on thy suppliants. First of all    Vouchsafe to Nestor and his sons increase    Of glory; on the Pylian people next    Bestow, for this most sumptuous hecatomb,    Large recompense; and, lastly, grant to us﻿—    Telemachus and me﻿—a safe return    To our own country with the end attained    Which brought us hither in our gallant barque.”  

    Thus did she pray, while she fulfilled the prayer;    And then she handed to Telemachus    The fair round goblet, and in words like hers    The dear son of Ulysses prayed. Meanwhile    The Pylians, having roasted well the flesh    And drawn it from the spits, distributing    To each his portion, held high festival.    And when the calls of hunger and of thirst    Were silenced, Nestor, the Gerenian knight,    Began discourse, and thus bespake his guests:﻿—  

    “The fitting time is come to ask our guests    Who they may be, since now their feast is o’er.    Say then, O strangers, who ye are, and whence    Ye come along the pathway of the deep.    Have ye an errand here, or do ye roam    The seas at large, like pirates, braving death,    And visiting with ravage foreign states?”  

    And then discreet Telemachus replied    Boldly﻿—for Pallas strengthened in that hour    His heart that he might confidently ask    News of his absent father, and so win    A worthy fame among the sons of men:﻿—  

    “O Nestor, son of Neleus, pride of Greece!    Thou bid’st us tell thee whence we came, and I    Will faithfully declare it. We are come    From Ithaca, beneath the Neritus,    And private, and not general, is the cause    Of which I am to speak. I came to ask    Concerning my great father, the large-souled    And nobly-born Ulysses, who ’tis said    With thee, his friend in arms, laid waste the town    Of Ilium. We have heard where all the rest    Who warred against the Trojans were cut off,    And died sad deaths; his fate alone the son    Of Saturn hath not chosen to reveal﻿—    Whether he fell on land by hostile hands,    Or while at sea was whelmed beneath the waves    Of Amphitritè. Wherefore to thy knees    I come, to ask that thou﻿—if so thou wilt﻿—    Relate the manner of his mournful death,    As thou didst see it with thine eyes, or else    As thou from other wanderers hast heard    Its history; for she who brought him forth    Bore him to be unhappy. Think thou not    To soften aught, through tenderness to me,    In thy recital, but in faithful words    Tell me the whole, whatever thou hast seen.    And I conjure thee, that if, in his life,    My father, great Ulysses, ever gave    Promise of word or deed for thee, and kept    His promise, in the realm of Troy, where ye    Achaians bore such hardships, that thou now    Remember it and speak without disguise.”  

    And Nestor the Gerenian knight replied:﻿—    “My friend, since thou recallest to my mind    The sufferings borne by us the sons of Greece,    Although of peerless valor, in that land,    Both when we ranged in ships the darkling sea    For booty wheresoe’er Achilles led,    And when around King Priam’s populous town    We fought, where fell our bravest, know thou then    That there the valiant Ajax lies, and there    Achilles; there Patroclus, like the gods    In council; there my well-beloved son    Blameless and brave, Antilochus the swift    Of foot and warlike﻿—many woes beside    We bore, and who of mortal birth could give    Their history? Nay, though thou shouldst remain    Five years or six, and ask of all the griefs    Endured by the brave Greeks, thou wouldst depart    Outwearied to thy home, ere thou hadst heard    The whole. Nine years in harassing the foe    We passed, beleaguering them and planning wiles    Innumerable. Saturn’s son at last    With difficulty seemed to close the war.    Then was there none who might presume to vie    In wisdom with Ulysses; that great man    Excelled in every kind of stratagem﻿—    Thy father﻿—if indeed thou be his son.    I look on thee amazed; all thy discourse    Is just like his, and one would ne’er believe    A younger man could speak so much like him.    While we were there, Ulysses and myself    In council or assembly never spake    On different sides, but with a like intent    We thoughtfully consulted how to guide    The Achaians in the way we deemed the best;    But after we had overthrown and spoiled    King Priam’s lofty city, and set sail    For home, and by some heavenly power the Greeks    Were scattered, Jupiter ordained for them    A sad return. For all were neither wise    Nor just, and many drew upon themselves    An evil doom﻿—the fatal wrath of her,    The blue-eyed maid, who claims her birth from Jove.    ’Twas she who kindled strife between the sons    Of Atreus. They had called the Achaians all    To an assembly, not with due regard    To order, at the setting of the sun,    And thither came the warriors overpowered    With wine. The brother kings set forth the cause    Of that assembly. Menelaus first    Bade all the Greeks prepare for their return    O’er the great deep. That counsel little pleased    King Agamemnon, who desired to keep    The people longer there, that he might soothe    By sacred hecatombs the fiery wrath    Of Pallas. Fool! who could not see how vain    Were such persuasion, for the eternal gods    Are not soon won to change their purposes.    They stood disputing thus, with bitter words,    Till wrangling noisily on different sides    Rose up the well-armed Greeks. The ensuing night    We rested, but we cherished in our breasts    A mutual hate; so for our punishment    Had Jove ordained. With early morn we drew    Our ships to the great deep, and put our goods    And our deep-bosomed women all on board.    Yet half the host went not, but on the shore    Remained with Agamemnon, Atreus’ son,    And shepherd of the people. All the rest    Embarked, weighed anchor, and sailed swiftly thence;    A deity made smooth the mighty deep,    And when we came to Tenedos we paid    Our offerings to the gods and longed for home﻿—    Vainly; it pleased not unpropitious Jove    To favor our return, and once again    He sent among us strife. A part of us    Led by Ulysses, that sagacious prince,    To please Atrides Agamemnon turned    Their well-oared galleys back. But I, with all    The vessels of the fleet that followed me,    Fled on my way, perceiving that some god    Was meditating evil. With us fled,    Encouraging his men, the warlike son    Of Tydeus. Fair-haired Menelaus came    Later to us in Lesbos, where we planned    For a long voyage, whether we should sail    Around the rugged Chios, toward the isle    Of Psyria, keeping that upon the left,    Or under Chios pass beside the steeps    Of windy Mimas. We besought the god    That he would show a sign, and he complied,    And bade us to Euboea cross the deep    Right in the midst, the sooner to escape    All danger. Then the wind blew strong and shrill,    And swiftly o’er the fishy gulfs our fleet    Flew on, and reached Geraestus in the night.    There, having passed the mighty deep, we made    To Neptune offerings of many a thigh    Of beeves. The fourth day dawned, and now the men    Of Diomed, the mighty horseman, son    Of Tydeus, stopped at Argos with their fleet,    While I went on to Pylos with the wind,    Which never, from the moment that the god    First sent it o’er the waters, ceased to blow.  

    “So, my dear child, I reached my home, nor knew    Nor heard from others who among the Greeks    Was saved, or who had perished on the way.    Yet what I since have heard while here I sit    Within my palace thou shalt duly learn.    Nor is it what I ought to keep from thee.  

    “ ’Tis said the Myrmidonian spearmen, led    By great Achilles’ famous son, returned    Happily home; as happily the son    Of Paeas, Philoctetes the renowned.    Idomeneus brought also back to Crete    All his companions who survived the war;    The sea took none of them. But ye have heard,    Though far away, the fate of Atreus’ son﻿—    How he came home, and how Aegisthus laid    A plot to slay him, yet on his own head    Drew heavy punishment﻿—so fortunate    It is when he who falls by murder leaves    A son; for ’twas the monarch’s son who took    Vengeance upon the crafty murderer    Aegisthus, by whose hand Atrides died.    Thou too, my friend, for thou art large of frame,    And of a noble presence, be thou brave,    That men in time to come may give thee praise.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:﻿—    “O Nestor, son of Neleus, pride of Greece,    Ample was his revenge, and far and wide    The Greeks will spread his fame to be the song    Of future times. O might the gods confer    On me an equal power to avenge myself    On that importunate, overbearing crew    Of suitors, who insult me, and devise    Evil against me! But the gods deny    Such fortune to my father and to me,    And all that now is left me is to bear.”  

    Again spake Nestor the Gerenian knight:﻿—    “Since thou, my friend, hast spoken words which bring    What I have heard to mind﻿—the rumor goes    That in thy palace many suiters wait    About thy mother, and in spite of thee    Do grievous wrong. Now tell me; dost thou yield    Willingly, or because the people, swayed    By oracles, regard thee as their foe?    Thy father yet may come again﻿—who knows?﻿—    Alone, or with the other Greeks, to take    The vengeance which these violent deeds deserve.    Should blue-eyed Pallas deign to favor thee,    As once she watched to guard the glorious chief    Ulysses in the realm of Troy, where we,    The Achaians, bore such hardships﻿—for I ne’er    Have seen the gods so openly befriend    A man as Pallas there befriended him﻿—    Should she thus deign to favor thee and keep    Watch over thee, then haply some of these    Will never think of marriage rites again.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:﻿—    “O aged man! I cannot think thy words    Will be fulfilled! for they import too much    And they amaze me. What thou sayst I wish    May come to pass, but know it cannot be,    Not even though the gods should will it so.”  

    Then thus the blue-eyed goddess, Pallas, spake:﻿—    “Telemachus, what words have passed thy lips?    Easily can a god, whene’er he will,    In the most distant regions safely keep    A man; and I would rather reach my home    Securely, after many hardships borne,    Than perish suddenly on my return    As Agamemnon perished by the guile    Of base Aegisthus and the queen. And yet    The gods themselves have not the power to save    Whom most they cherish from the common doom    When cruel fate brings on the last long sleep.”  

    Discreet Telemachus made answer thus:﻿—    “Let us, O Mentor, talk no more of this,    Though much we grieve; he never will return,    For his is the black doom of death ordained    By the great gods. Now suffer me to ask    Of Nestor further, since to him are known,    Beyond all other men, the rules of right    And prudence. He has governed, so men say,    Three generations, and to me he seems    In aspect like the ever-living gods.    O Nestor, son of Neleus, truly say    How died the monarch over mighty realms,    Atrides Agamemnon? Where was then    His brother Menelaus? By what arts    Did treacherous Aegisthus plan his death,    And slay a braver warrior than himself?    Was not the brother in the Achaian town    Of Argos? or was he a wanderer    In other lands, which made the murderer bold?”  

    The knight, Gerenian Nestor, answered thus:﻿—    “I will tell all and truly. Thou hast guessed    Rightly and as it happened. Had the son    Of Atreus, fair-haired Menelaus, come    From Troy, and found Aegisthus yet alive    Within the palace, he had never flung    The loose earth on his corpse, but dogs and birds    Had preyed upon it, lying in the fields    Far from the city, and no woman’s voice    Of all the Greeks had raised the wail for him.    Great was the crime he plotted. We were yet    Afar, enduring the hard toils of war,    While he, securely couched in his retreat    At Argos, famed for steeds, with flattering words    Corrupted Agamemnon’s queen. At first    The noble Clytemnestra turned away    With horror from the crime; for yet her heart    Was right, and by her side there stood a bard    With whom Atrides, when he went to Troy,    Had left his wife with many an earnest charge.    But when the gods and fate had spread a net    For his destruction, then Aegisthus bore    The minstrel to a desert isle, and there    Left him to be devoured by birds of prey,    And led the queen, as willing as himself,    To his own palace. Many a victim’s thigh    Upon the hallowed altars of the gods    He offered, many a gift of ornaments    Woven or wrought in gold he hung within    Their temples, since at length the mighty end    For which he hardly dared to hope was gained.    We sailed together from the coast of Troy,    Atrides, Menelaus, and myself,    Friends to each other. When the headland height    Of Athens, hallowed Sunium, met our eyes,    Apollo smote with his still shafts, and slew    Phrontis, Onetor’s son, who steered the barque    Of Menelaus, holding in his hands    The rudder as the galley scudded on﻿—    And skilled was he beyond all other men    To guide a vessel when the storm was high.    So there did Menelaus stay his course,    Though eager to go on, that he might lay    His friend in earth and pay the funeral rites.    But setting sail again with all his fleet    Upon the dark-blue sea, all-seeing Jove    Decreed a perilous voyage. He sent forth    His shrill-voiced hurricane, and heaped on high    The mountain waves. There, scattering the barques    Far from each other, part he drove to Crete,    Where the Cydonians dwell, beside the stream    Of Jardanus. A smooth and pointed rock    Just on the bounds of Gortys stands amidst    The dark-blue deep. The south wind thitherward    Sweeps a great sea towards Phoestus, and against    The headland on the left, where that small rock    Meets and withstands the mighty wave. The ships    Were driven on this, and scarce the crews escaped    With life; the ships were dashed against the crags    And wrecked, save five, and these, with their black prows,    Were swept toward Egypt by the winds and waves.  

    “Thus adding to his wealth and gathering gold    He roamed the ocean in his ships among    Men of strange speech. Aegisthus meantime planned    His guilty deeds at home; he slew the king    Atrides, and the people took his yoke.    Seven years in rich Mycenae he bore rule,    And on the eighth, to his destruction, came    The nobly-born Orestes, just returned    From Athens, and cut off that man of blood,    The crafty wretch Aegisthus, by whose hand    Fell his illustrious father. Then he bade    The Argives to the solemn burial-feast    Of his bad mother and the craven wretch    Aegisthus. Menelaus, that same day,    The great in war, arrived, and brought large wealth﻿—    So large his galleys could contain no more.    “And thou, my friend, be thou not long away,    Wandering from home, thy rich possessions left,    And in thy palace-halls a lawless crew,    Lest they devour thy substance, and divide    Thy goods, and thou have crossed the sea in vain.    Yet must I counsel and enjoin on thee    To visit Menelaus, who has come    Just now from lands and nations of strange men,    Whence one could hardly hope for a return;    Whom once the tempest’s violence had driven    Into that great wide sea o’er which the birds    Of heaven could scarce fly hither in a year,    Such is its fearful vastness. Go thou now,    Thou with thy ship and friends; or if thou choose    The way by land, a car and steeds are here,    And here my sons to guide thee to the town    Of hallowed Lacedaemon, there to find    The fair-haired Menelaus. Earnestly    Beseech of him that he declare the truth.    Falsely he will not speak, for he is wise.”  

    He spake; the sun went down; the darkness crept    Over the earth, and blue-eyed Pallas said:﻿—    “Most wisely hast thou spoken, ancient man.    Now cut ye out the tongues, and mingle wine,    That we to Neptune and the other gods    May pour libations, and then think of rest;    For now the hour is come; the light is gone,    Nor at a feast in honor of the gods    Should we long sit, but in good time withdraw.”  

    Jove’s daughter spake; they hearkened to her words;    The heralds came to them, and on their hands    Poured water; boys began to fill the bowls    To the hard brim, and ministered to each    From left to right. Then threw they to the flames    The victims’ tongues, and, rising, poured on earth    Wine to the gods; and when that rite was paid,    And when their thirst was satiate, Pallas rose    With nobly-born Telemachus to go    To their good ship, but Nestor still detained    The twain, and chidingly bespake them thus:﻿—  

    “Now Jove and all the other gods forbid    That ye should go from me to your good ship,    As from some half-clad wretch, too poor to own    Mantles and blankets in whose soft warm folds    He and his guests might sleep; but I have both﻿—    Mantles and blankets﻿—beautifully wrought,    And never shall the son of that great man    Ulysses lie upon a galley’s deck    While I am living. After me I hope    My sons, who dwell within my palace-halls,    Will duly welcome all who enter here.”  

    And thus again the blue-eyed Pallas spake:﻿—    “Well hast thou said, my aged friend, and well    Doth it become Telemachus to heed    Thy words, for that were best. Let him remain    With thee and sleep in thine abode, while I    Repair to our black ship, encouraging    The crew, and setting them their proper tasks,    For I am eldest of them all; the rest    Are young men yet, and moved by friendship joined    Our enterprise; the peers in age are they    Of the large-souled Telemachus. Tonight    I sleep within the hull of our black ship,    And sail with early morning for the land    Of the Cauconians, large of soul, from whom    A debt is due me, neither new nor small.    Send meantime from thy palace in a car,    And with thy son, this youth, and be the steeds    The fleetest and the strongest in thy stalls.”  

    The blue-eyed Pallas, having spoken thus,    Passed like an eagle out of sight, and all    Were seized with deep amazement as they saw.    The aged monarch, wondering at the sight,    Took by the hand Telemachus, and said:﻿—  

    “Of craven temper, and unapt for war,    O friend, thou canst not be, since thus the gods    Attend and guide thee in thy youth. And this,    Of all the gods whose dwelling is in heaven,    Can be no other than the spoiler-queen    Pallas, the child of Jove, who also held    Thy father in such eminent esteem    Among the Grecians. Deign to favor us,    O queen! bestow on me and on my sons    And on my venerable spouse the meed    Of special glory. I will bring to thee    A sacrifice, a broad-horned yearling steer,    Which never man hath tamed or led beneath    The yoke. Her will I bring with gilded horns,    And lay an offering on thine altar-fires.”  

    Such were his words, and Pallas heard the prayer,    And then Gerenian Nestor led the way,    And with his sons and sons-in-law approached    His glorious palace. When they came within    The monarch’s sumptuous halls, each took his place    In order on the couches and the thrones.    The old man mingled for them as they came    A bowl of delicate wine, eleven years old,    Drawn by the damsel cupbearer, who took    Its cover from the jar. The aged chief    Mingled it in the bowl, and, pouring out    A part to Pallas, offered earnest prayer    To her, who sprang from aegis-bearing Jove.  

    When due libations had been made, and all    Drank till they wished no more, most went away,    Each to his home to sleep; but Nestor made    Telemachus, the son of the great chief    Ulysses, rest upon a sumptuous couch    Within the echoing hall, and near to him    The chief of squadrons, skilled to wield the spear,    Peisistratus, who only of his sons    Abode in Nestor’s halls unwedded yet;    While in an inner room of that tall pile    The monarch slumbered on a bed of state,    Decked for him by the labors of his queen.  

    Soon as the daughter of the dawn appeared,    The rosy-fingered Morning, Nestor left    His bed and went abroad, and took his seat    On smooth white stones before his lofty doors,    That glistened as with oil, on which before    Sat Neleus, wise in council as the gods.    But he had yielded to the will of fate,    And passed into the Underworld. Now sat    Gerenian Nestor in his father’s place,    The guardian of the Greeks. Around his seat,    Just from the chambers of their rest, his sons    Echephron, Stratius, and Aretus came,    Perseus, and Thrasymedes; after these    Came brave Peisistratus, the sixth and last.    They led Telemachus, the godlike youth,    And placed him near them. The Gerenian knight    Nestor began, and thus bespake his sons:﻿—  

    “Do quickly what I ask, dear sons, and aid    To render Pallas, first of all the gods,    Propitious﻿—Pallas, who has deigned to come,    And at a solemn feast to manifest    Herself to me. Let one of you go forth    Among the fields, and bring a heifer thence,    Led by the herdsman. To the dark-hulled ship    Of the large-souled Telemachus I bid    Another son repair, and bring the crew    Save only two; and let another call    Laërceus hither, skilled to work in gold,    That he may plate with gold the heifer’s horns.    Let all the rest remain to bid the maids    Within prepare a sumptuous feast, and bring    Seats, wood, and limpid water from the fount.”  

    He spake, and all were busy. From the field    The bullock came; from the swift-sailing barque    Came the companions of the gallant youth    Telemachus; with all his implements﻿—    Hammer and anvil, and well-jointed tongs﻿—    With which he wrought, the goldsmith also came,    And to be present at the sacred rites    Pallas came likewise. Nestor, aged knight,    Brought forth the gold; the artisan prepared    The metal, and about the bullock’s horns    Wound it, that Pallas might with pleasure see    The victim so adorned. Then Stratius grasped    The horns, and, aided by Echephron, led    The bullock. From his room Aretus brought    A laver filled with water in one hand,    And in the other hand a canister    Of cakes, while Thrasymedes, great in war,    Stood near with a sharp axe, about to smite    The victim. Perseus held a vase to catch    The blood, while Nestor, aged horseman, took    Water and cakes, and offering first a part,    And flinging the shorn forelock to the flames,    Prayed to the goddess Pallas fervently.  

    And now, when they had prayed, and flung the cakes,    The large-souled Thrasymedes, Nestor’s son,    Struck, where he stood, the blow; the bullock’s strength    Gave way. At once the daughters of the king,    And his sons’ wives, and queen Eurydicè﻿—    Nestor’s chaste wife, and daughter eldest born    Of Clymenus, broke forth in shrilly cries.    From the great earth the sons then lifted up    And held the victim’s head. Peisistratus,    The chief of squadrons, slew it. When the blood    Had ceased to flow, and life had left its limbs,    They quickly severed joint from joint; they hewed    The thighs away, and duly covered them    With caul, a double fold, on which they laid    Raw strips of flesh. The aged monarch burned    These over the cleft wood, and poured dark wine    Upon them, while beside him stood the youths    With five-pronged spits; and when the thighs were burned    And entrails tasted, all the rest they carved    Into small portions and transfixed with spits,    And roasted, holding the sharp spits in hand.    Meantime, fair Polycastè, youngest born    Of Nestor’s daughters, gave Telemachus    The bath; and after he had bathed she shed    A rich oil over him, and in a cloak    Of noble texture and a tunic robed    The prince, who, like a god in presence, left    The bath, and took his place where Nestor sat,    The shepherd of the people. When the youths    Had roasted well and from the spits withdrawn    The flesh, they took their places at the feast.    Then rose up chosen men, and poured the wine    Into the cups of gold; and when at length    The thirst and appetite were both allayed,    The knight, Gerenian Nestor, thus began:﻿—  

    “Rise now, my sons; join to the bright-haired steeds    My car, and let Telemachus depart.”  

    He spake; they hearkened and obeyed, and straight    Yoked the swift horses to the car. Then came    The matron of the household, laying bread    And wine within the car, and dainties such    As make a prince’s fare. Telemachus    Then climbed into the sumptuous seat. The son    Of Nestor and the chief of armed bands,    Peisistratus, climbed also, took his place    Beside him, grasped the reins, and with the lash    Urged on the coursers. Not unwillingly    They darted toward the plain, and left behind    The lofty Pylos. All that day they shook    The yoke on both their necks. The sun went down;    The highways lay in darkness when they came    To Pherae and the abode of Diocles,    Son of Orsilochus, who claimed to be    The offspring of Alpheius. They with him    Found welcome there, and there that night they slept.  

    And when the rosy-fingered Morn appeared,    They yoked the horses, climbed the shining car,    And issued from the palace gate beneath    The sounding portico. Peisistratus    Wielded the lash to urge the coursers on,    And not unwillingly they flew and reached    A land of harvests. Here the travellers found    Their journey’s end, so swiftly those fleet steeds    Had borne them on. And now the sun went down,    And darkness gathered over all the ways.  

            Book IV  Conference of Telemachus and Menelaus  

  Arrival of Telemachus and his companion at Sparta﻿—A wedding; the marriage of the daughter of Menelaus﻿—Helen in Sparta﻿—Entertainment of the guests﻿—Helen’s account of her return to her husband﻿—The Trojan horse﻿—Narrative of the visit of Menelaus to Egypt, in order to consult the sea-god, Proteus﻿—Menelaus informed by him that Ulysses is detained by Calypso in her island﻿—Plot of the suitors to lie in wait for Telemachus on his voyage and destroy him﻿—Penelope visited and consoled by Pallas in a dream.

      They came to Lacedaemon’s valley, seamed    With dells, and to the palace of its king,    The glorious Menelaus, whom they found    Within, and at a wedding banquet, made    Both for his blameless daughter and his son,    And many guests. Her he must send away,    Bride of the son of that invincible chief,    Achilles. He betrothed her while in Troy,    And gave his kingly word, and now the gods    Fulfilled it by the marriage. He was now    Sending her forth, with steeds and cars, to reach    The noble city of the Myrmidons,    Where ruled her consort. From the Spartan coast    He brought Alector’s daughter for his son,    The gallant Megapenthes, borne to him    By a handmaiden in his later years.    For not to Helen had the gods vouchsafed    Yet other offspring, after she had brought    A lovely daughter forth, Hermione,    Like golden Venus both in face and form.  

    So banqueting the neighbors and the friends    Of glorious Menelaus sat beneath    The lofty ceiling of those spacious halls,    Delighted with the feast. A sacred bard    Amidst them touched the harp and sang to them    While, as the song began, two dancers sprang    Into the midst and trod the measure there  

    But they﻿—the hero-youth Telemachus    And Nestor’s eminent son﻿—were at the gate,    And standing in the entrance with their steeds.    The worthy Eteoneus, coming forth﻿—    The trusty servant of the glorious son    Of Atreus﻿—saw, and hastening thence to tell    The shepherd of the people, through the hall    He came to him, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “O Menelaus, foster-child of Jove,    Two strangers have arrived, two men who seem    Descended from almighty Jupiter.    Shall we then loose the harness from their steeds,    Or bid them elsewhere seek a friendly host?”  

    The fair-haired king indignantly replied:﻿—    “Nay, Eteoneus, thou hast not been wont.    Son of Boëthus, thus to play the fool.    Thou pratest idly, like a child. Ourselves    Have sat, as guests, at generous banquets given    By other men, when journeying hitherward    In hope that Jove might grant a respite here    From our disasters. Hasten, then, to loose    The steeds, and bring the strangers to the feast.”  

    He spake; the attendant hastened forth and called    The other trusty servitors, with charge    To follow. They unyoked the sweaty steeds,    And bound them to the stalls, and gave them oats,    With which they mingled the white barley-grains,    And close against the shining wall they placed    The car, and then they led the guests within    The sumptuous palace. Entering, these admired    The palace of the foster-child of Jove,    For like the splendor of the sun and moon    Its glory was. They with delighted eyes    Gazed, and, descending to the polished baths,    They bathed. The attendant maids who at the bath    Had ministered, anointing them with oil,    Arrayed the stranger guests in fleecy cloaks    And tunics. Each sat down upon a throne    Near to Atrides. Now a handmaid brought    A beautiful ewer of gold, and laver wrought    Of silver, and poured water for their hands,    And spread a polished table near their seat;    The reverend matron of the household came    With bread, and set before them many a dish    Gathered from all the feast. The carver next    Brought chargers lifted high, and in them meats    Of every flavor, and before them placed    Beakers of gold. The fair-haired monarch gave    His hand to each, and then bespake them thus:﻿—  

    “Now taste our banquet and rejoice, and when    Ye are refreshed with food we will inquire    Who ye may be; for ye are not of those    Whose race degenerates, ye are surely born    Of sceptred kings, the favorites of Jove.    Ignoble men have never sons like you.”  

    Thus having said, and taking in his hands    A fatling bullock’s chine, which menials brought    Roasted, and placed beside the king in sign    Of honor, this he laid before his guests.    And they put forth their hands and banqueted;    And when the calls of hunger and of thirst    At length were stilled, Telemachus inclined    His head toward Nestor’s son, that no one else    Might listen to his words, and thus he said:﻿—  

    “See, son of Nestor, my beloved friend,    In all these echoing rooms the sheen of brass,    Of gold, of amber, and of ivory;    Such is the palace of Olympian Jove    Within its walls. How many things are here    Of priceless worth! I wonder as I gaze.”  

    The fair-haired Menelaus heard him speak,    And thus accosted both with winged words:﻿—  

    “Dear sons, no mortal man may vie with Jove,    Whose palace and possessions never know    Decay, but other men may vie or not    In wealth with me. ’Twas after suffering    And wandering long that in my fleet I brought    My wealth with me, and landed on this coast    In the eighth year. For I had roamed afar    To Cyprus and to Phoenicè, and where    The Egyptians dwell, and Ethiopia’s sons,    And the Sidonians, and the Erembian race,    And to the coast of Lybia, where the lambs    Are yeaned with budding horns. There do the ewes    Thrice in the circle of the year bring forth    Their young. There both the master of the herd    And herdsman know no lack of cheese, or flesh,    Or of sweet milk; for there the herds yield milk    The whole year round. While I was roaming thus,    And gathering store of wealth, another slew    My brother, unforewarned, and through the fraud    Of his own guilty consort. Therefore small    Is the content I find in bearing rule    O’er these possessions. Ye have doubtless heard    This from your parents, be they who they may;    For much have I endured, and I have lost    A palace, a most noble dwelling-place,    Full of things rare and precious. Even now    Would I possessed within my palace here    But the third part of these; and would that they    Were yet alive who perished on the plain    Of Troy afar from Argos and its steeds!    Yet while I grieve and while I mourn them all,    Here, sitting in my palace, I by turns    Indulge my heart in weeping, and by turns    I pause, for with continual sorrow comes    A weariness of spirit. Yet, in truth,    For none of all those warriors, though their fate    Afflicts me sorely, do I so much grieve    As for one hero. When I think of him,    The feast and couch are joyless, since, of all    The Achaian chiefs, none brought so much to pass    As did Ulysses, both in what he wrought    And what he suffered. Great calamities    Fell to his lot in life, and to my own    Grief for his sake that cannot be consoled.    Long has he been divided from his friends,    And whether he be living now or dead    We know not. Old Laertes, the sage queen    Penelope, and young Telemachus,    Whom, when he went to war he left newborn    At home, are sorrowing somewhere for his sake.”  

    He spake, and woke anew the young man’s grief    For his lost father. From his eyelids fell    Tears at the hearing of his father’s name,    And with both hands he held before his eyes    The purple mantle. Menelaus saw    His tears, and pondered, doubting which were best﻿—    To let the stranger of his own accord    Speak of his father, or to question him    At first, and then to tell him all he knew.  

    As thus he pondered, Helen, like in form    To Dian of the golden distaff, left    Her high-roofed chamber, where the air was sweet    With perfumes, and approached. Adrasta placed    A seat for her of costly workmanship;    Alcippè brought a mat of soft light wool,    And Phylo with a silver basket came,    Given by Alcandra, wife of Polybus,    Who dwelt at Thebes, in Egypt, and whose house    Was rich in things of price. Two silver baths    He gave to Menelaus, tripods two,    And talents ten of gold. His wife bestowed    Beautiful gifts on Helen﻿—one of gold,    A distaff; one a silver basket edged    With gold and round in form. This Phylo brought    Heaped with spun yarn and placed before the queen;    Upon it lay the distaff, wrapped in wool    Of color like the violet. Helen there    Sat down, a footstool at her feet, and straight    Questioned with earnest words her husband thus:﻿—  

    “Say, Menelaus, foster-child of Jove,    Is it yet known what lineage these men claim﻿—    These visitants? And what I now shall say,    Will it be false or true? Yet must I speak.    Woman or man I think I never saw    So like another as this youth, on whom    I look with deep astonishment, is like    Telemachus, the son whom our great chief    Ulysses left at home a tender babe    When ye Achaians for my guilty sake    Went forth to wage the bloody war with Troy.”  

    And fair-haired Menelaus answered her:﻿—    “Yea, wife, so deem I as it seems to thee.    Such are his feet, his hands, the cast of the eye,    His head, the hair upon his brow. Just now,    In speaking of Ulysses, as I told    How he had toiled and suffered for my sake,    The stranger held the purple cloak before    His eyes, and from the lids dropped bitter tears.”  

    Peisistratus, the son of Nestor, spake    In answer: “Menelaus, foster-child    Of Jove and son of Atreus! sovereign king!    He is, as thou hast said, that hero’s son;    But he is modest, and he deems that ill    It would become him, on arriving here,    If he should venture in discourse while thou    Art present, in whose voice we take delight    As if it were the utterance of a god.    The knight Gerenian Nestor sent me forth    To guide him hither﻿—for he earnestly    Desired to see thee, that thou mightest give    Counsel in what he yet should say or do.    For bitterly a son, who finds at home    No others to befriend him, must lament    The absence of a father. So it is    With young Telemachus; for far away    His father is, and in the land are none    Who have the power to shelter him from wrong.”  

    The fair-haired Menelaus answered thus:﻿—    “O wonder! Then the son of one most dear,    Who for my sake so oft has braved and borne    The conflicts of the battlefield, hath come    Beneath my roof. I thought that I should greet    His father with a warmer welcome here    Than any other of the Argive race,    When Jove the Olympian Thunderer should grant    A safe return to us across the deep    In our good ships. I would have founded here    For him a city in Argos, and have built    Dwellings, and would have brought from Ithaca    Him and his son, and all his wealth and all    His people. To this end I would have caused    Some neighboring district where my sway is owned    To be dispeopled. Dwelling here we oft    Should then have met each other, and no cause    Would e’er have parted us, two faithful friends    Delighting in each other, till at last    Came Death’s black cloud to wrap us in its shade.    A god, no doubt, hath seen in this a good    Too great for us, and thus to him alone,    Unhappy man! denied a safe return.”  

    He spake; his words awoke in every heart    Grief for the absent hero’s sake. Then wept    The Argive Helen, child of Jove; then wept    Telemachus; nor tearless were the eyes    Of Nestor’s son, for to his mind arose    The memory of the good Antilochus,    Slain by the bright Aurora’s eminent son;    Of him he thought, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “O son of Atreus! aged Nestor saith,    When in his palace we discourse of thee    And ask each other’s thought, that thou art wise    Beyond all other men. Now, if thou mayst,    Indulge me, for not willingly I weep    Thus at the evening feast, and soon will Morn,    Child of the Dawn, appear. I do not blame    This sorrow for whoever meets his fate    And dies; the only honors we can pay    To those unhappy mortals is to shred    Our locks away, and wet our cheeks with tears.    I lost a brother, not the least in worth    Among the Argives, whom thou must have seen.    I knew him not: I never saw his face;    Yet is it said Antilochus excelled    The others; swift of foot, and brave in war.”  

    The fair-haired Menelaus answered him:﻿—    “Since thou my friend hast spoken thus, as one    Discreet in word and deed, of riper years    Than thou, might speak and act﻿—for thou art born    Of such a father, and thy words are wise﻿—    And easy is it to discern the son    Of one on whom Saturnius has bestowed    Both at the birth-hour and in wedded life    His blessing; as he gives to Nestor now    A calm old age that lapses pleasantly,    Within his palace-halls, from day to day,    And sons wise-minded, mighty with the spear﻿—    Then let us lay aside this sudden grief    That has o’ertaken us, and only think    Of banqueting. Let water now be poured    Upon our hands; there will be time enough    Tomorrow for discourse; Telemachus    And I will then engage in mutual talk.”  

    He spake, Asphalion, who with diligent heed    Served the great Menelaus, on their hands    Poured water, and they shared the meats that lay    Upon the board. But Helen, Jove-born dame,    Had other thoughts, and with the wine they drank    Mingled a drug, an antidote to grief    And anger, bringing quick forgetfulness    Of all life’s evils. Whoso drinks, when once    It is infused and in the cup, that day    Shall never wet his cheeks with tears, although    His father and his mother lie in death,    Nor though his brother or beloved son    Fall butchered by the sword before his eyes.    Such sovereign drugs she had, that child of Jove,    Given her by Polydamna, wife of Thon,    A dame of Egypt, where the bounteous soil    Brings forth abundantly its potent herbs,    Of healing some and some of bane, and where    Dwell the physicians who excel in skill    All other men, for they are of the race    Of Paeon. Now when Helen in the cups    Had placed the drug, and bidden them to pour    The wine upon it, thus she spake again:﻿—  

    “Atrides Menelaus, reared by Jove,    And ye the sons of heroes!﻿—Jupiter    The sovereign, gives, at pleasure, good and ill    To one or to another, for his power    Is infinite﻿—now sitting in these halls,    Feast and enjoy free converse. I will speak    What suits the occasion. I could not relate,    I could not even name, the many toils    Borne by Ulysses, stout of heart. I speak    Only of what that valiant warrior did    And suffered once in Troy, where ye of Greece    Endured such hardships. He had given himself    Unseemly stripes, and o’er his shoulders flung    Vile garments like a slave’s, and entered thus    The enemy’s town, and walked its spacious streets.    Another man he seemed in that disguise﻿—    A beggar, though when at the Achaian fleet    So different was the semblance that he wore.    He entered Ilium thus transformed, and none    Knew who it was that passed, but I perceived,    And questioned him; he turned my quest aside    With crafty answers. After I had seen    The bath administered, anointed him    And clothed him, and had sworn a solemn oath    Not to reveal his visit to the men    Of Ilium till he reached again the tents    And galleys, then he opened to me all    The plans of the Achaians. Leaving me,    On his return he slew with his long spear    Full many a Trojan, and in safety reached    The Argive camp with tidings for the host.    Then wept aloud the Trojan dames, but I    Was glad at heart, for I already longed    For my old home, and deeply I deplored    The evil fate that Venus brought on me,    Who led me thither from my own dear land,    And from my daughter and my marriage-bower,    And from my lawful spouse, in whom I missed    No noble gift of person or of mind.”  

    Then fair-haired Menelaus said to her:﻿—    “All thou hast spoken, woman, is most true.    Of many a valiant warrior I have known    The counsels and the purposes, and far    Have roamed in many lands, but never yet    My eyes have looked on such another man    As was Ulysses, of a heart so bold    And such endurance. Witness what he did    And bore, the heroic man, what time we sat,    The bravest of the Argives, pent within    The wooden horse, about to bring to Troy    Slaughter and death. Thou earnest to the place,    Moved, as it seemed, by some divinity    Who thought to give the glory of the day    To Troy. Deiphobus, the godlike chief,    Was with thee. Thrice about the hollow frame    That held the ambush thou didst walk and touch    Its sides, and call the Achaian chiefs by name,    And imitate the voices of the wives    Of all the Argives. Diomed and I    Sat with the great Ulysses in the midst,    And with him heard thy call, and rose at once    To sally forth or answer from within;    But he forbade, impatient as we were,    And so restrained us. All the Achaian chiefs    Kept silence save Anticlus, who alone    Began to speak, when, with his powerful hands,    Ulysses pressed together instantly    The opening lips, and saved us all, and thus    Held them till Pallas lured thee from the spot.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:﻿—    “Atrides Menelaus, reared by Jove,    Ruler of tribes! the harder was his lot,    Since even thus he could not shun the stroke    Of death, not though a heart of steel were his.    But now dismiss us to our beds, that there,    Couched softly, we may welcome balmy sleep.”  

    He spake, and Argive Helen called her maids    To make up couches in the portico,    And throw fair purple blankets over them,    And tapestry above, and cover all    With shaggy cloaks. Forth from the palace halls    They went with torches, and made ready soon    The couches; thither heralds led the guests.    There in the vestibule Telemachus,    The hero, and with him the eminent son    Of Nestor, took their rest. Meanwhile the son    Of Atreus lay within an inner room    Of that magnificent pile, and near to him    The glorious lady, long-robed Helen, slept.    But when at length the daughter of the Dawn,    The rosy-fingered Morning, brought her light,    Then Menelaus, great in battle, rose,    Put on his garments, took his trenchant sword,    And, having hung it on his shoulder, laced    The shapely sandals to his shining feet,    And issued from his chamber like a god    In aspect. Near Telemachus he took    His seat, and calling him by name he spake:﻿—  

    “What urgent cause, my brave Telemachus,    Brings thee to sacred Lacedaemon o’er    The breast of the great ocean? Frankly say,    Is it a private or a public need?”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:﻿—    “Atrides Menelaus, reared by Jove,    Ruler of nations! I am come to ask    News of my father, if thou knowest aught.    My heritage is wasting; my rich fields    Are made a desolation. Enemies    Swarm in my palace, and from day to day    Slaughter my flocks and slow-paced horned herds;    My mother’s suitors they, and measureless    Their insolence. And therefore am I come    To clasp thy knees, and pray thee to relate    The manner of my father’s sorrowful death    As thou hast seen it with thine eyes, or heard    Its story from some wandering man﻿—for sure    His mother brought him forth to wretchedness    Beyond the common lot. I ask thee not    To soften aught in the sad history    Through tenderness to me, or kind regard,    But tell me plainly ail that thou dost know;    And I beseech thee, if at any time    My father, good Ulysses, brought to pass    Aught that he undertook for thee in word    Or act while ye were in the realm of Troy,    Where the Greeks suffered sorely, bear it now    In mind, and let me have the naked truth.”  

    Then Menelaus of the amber locks    Drew a deep sigh, and thus in answer said:﻿—    “Heavens! they would climb into a brave man’s bed,    These craven weaklings. But as when a hart    Has hid her newborn suckling fawns within    The lair of some fierce lion, and gone forth    Herself to range the mountainsides and feed    Among the grassy lawns, the lion comes    Back to the place and brings them sudden death,    So will Ulysses bring a bloody fate    Upon the suitor crew. O father Jove,    And Pallas, and Apollo! I could wish    That now, with prowess such as once was his    When he, of yore, in Lesbos nobly built,    Rising to strive with Philomela’s son,    In wrestling threw him heavily, and all    The Greeks rejoiced, Ulysses might engage    The suitors. Short were then their term of life,    And bitter would the nuptial banquet be.    Now for the questions thou hast put, and craved    From me a true reply, I will not seek    To pass them by with talk of other things,    Nor yet deceive thee, but of all that once    Was told me by the Ancient of the Deep,    Whose words are truth, I shall keep nothing back.  

    “In Egypt still, though longing to come home,    The gods detained me; for I had not paid    The sacrifice of chosen hecatombs,    And ever do the gods require of us    Remembrance of their laws. There is an isle    Within the billowy sea before you reach    The coast of Egypt﻿—Pharos is its name﻿—    At such a distance as a ship could pass    In one whole day with a shrill breeze astern.    A sheltered haven lies within that isle,    Whence the good ships go forth with fresh supplies    Of water. There the gods constrained my stay    For twenty days, and never in that time    Blew favoring winds across the waters, such    As bear the galley over the great deep.    Now would our stores of food have been consumed,    Now would the courage of my men have died,    Had not a goddess pitied me, and come    To my relief, by name Idothea, born    To the great Proteus, Ancient of the Deep.    For she was moved by my distress, and came    To me while I was wandering alone,    Apart from all the rest. They through the isle    Roamed everywhere from place to place, and, pinched    With hunger, threw the hook for fish. She came,    And, standing near, accosted me and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Stranger, thou art an idiot, or at least    Of careless mood, or else art willingly    Neglectful, and art pleased with suffering,    That thou dost linger in this isle so long    And find no means to leave it, while the hearts    Of thy companions faint with the delay.’  

    “She spake, and I replied: ‘Whoe’er thou art,    goddess, let me say, not willingly    I linger here. I surely must have sinned    Against the immortal dwellers of high heaven;    But tell me﻿—for the gods know all things﻿—who    Of all the immortals holds me windbound here,    Hindering my voyage; tell me also how    To reach my home across the fishy deep.’  

    “I ended, and the glorious goddess said    In answer: ‘Stranger, I will truly speak;    The deathless Ancient of the Deep, whose words    Are ever true, Egyptian Proteus, oft    Here makes his haunt. To him are fully known﻿—    For he is Neptune’s subject﻿—all the depths    Of the great ocean. It is said I owe    To him my birth. If him thou canst insnare    And seize, he will disclose to thee thy way    And all its distances, and tell thee how    To reach thy home across the fishy deep;    And further will reveal, if so he choose,    O foster-child of Jove, whate’er of good    Or ill has in thy palace come to pass,    While thou wert wandering long and wearily.’  

    “So said the goddess, and I spake again:﻿—    ‘Explain by what device to snare and hold    The aged deity, lest he foreknow    Or else suspect our purpose and escape.    ’Twere hard for mortals to constrain a god.’  

    “I ended, and the glorious goddess thus    Made answer: ‘When the climbing sun has reached    The middle heaven, the Ancient of the Deep,    Who ne’er deceives, emerges from the waves,    And, covered with the dark scum of the sea,    Walks forth, and in a cavern vault lies down.    Thither fair Halosydna’s progeny,    The sea-calves from the hoary ocean, throng,    Rank with the bitter odor of the brine,    And slumber near him. With the break of day    I will conduct thee thither and appoint    Thy place, but thou shalt choose to go with thee    Three of the bravest men in thy good ships.    And let me now relate the stratagems    Of the old prophet. He at first will count    The sea-calves, going o’er them all by fives;    And when he has beheld and numbered all,    Amidst them all will he lie down, as lies    A shepherd midst his flock. And then, as soon    As ye behold him stretched at length, exert    Your utmost strength to hold him there, although    He strive and struggle to escape your hands;    For he will try all stratagems, and take    The form of every reptile on the earth,    And turn to water and to raging flame﻿—    Yet hold him firmly still, and all the more    Make fast the bands. When he again shall take    The form in which thou sawest him asleep,    Desist from force, and loose the bands that held    The ancient prophet. Ask of him what god    Afflicts thee thus, and by what means to cross    The fishy deep and find thy home again.’    “Thus having said, the goddess straightway sprang    Into the billowy ocean, while I sought    The galleys, where they rested on the sand,    With an uneasy spirit. When I reached    The ship and shore we made our evening meal.    The hallowed night came down; we lay and slept    Upon the sea-beach. When the Morning came,    The rosy-fingered daughter of the Dawn,    Forth on the border of the mighty main    I went, and prayed the immortals fervently.    I led three comrades, whom I trusted most    In all adventures. Entering the depths    Of the great sea, the goddess brought us thence    Four skins of sea-calves newly flayed, that thus    We might deceive her father. Then she scooped    Beds for us in the sea-sand, and sat down    To wait his coming. We were near to her,    And there she laid us duly down, and threw    A skin o’er each. Now did our ambush seem    Beyond endurance, for the noisome smell    Of those sea-nourished creatures sickened us;    And who could bear to sleep beside a whale?    But she bethought her of an antidote,    A sovereign one, and so relieved us all.    To each she brought ambrosia, placing it    Beneath his nostrils, and the sweets it breathed    O’ercame the animal odor. All the morn    We waited patiently. The sea-calves came    From ocean in a throng, and laid themselves    In rows along the margin of the sea.    At noon emerged the aged seer, and found    His well-fed sea-calves. Going o’er them all    He counted them, ourselves among the rest,    With no misgiving of the fraud, and then    He laid him down to rest. We rushed with shouts    Upon him suddenly, and in our arms    Caught him; nor did the aged seer forget    His stratagems; and first he took the shape    Of a maned lion, of a serpent next,    Then of a panther, then of a huge boar,    Then turned to flowing water, then became    A tall tree full of leaves. With resolute hearts    We held him fast, until the aged seer    Was wearied out, in spite of all his wiles.    And questioned me in speech at last and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘O son of Atreus! who of all the gods    Hath taught thee how to take me in this snare,    Unwilling as I am? What wouldst thou have?’  

    “He spake; I answered: ‘Aged prophet, well    Thou knowest. Why deceitfully inquire?    It is that I am held a prisoner long    Within this isle, and vainly seek the means    Of my escape, and grief consumes my heart.    Now﻿—since the gods know all things﻿—tell me this,    What deity it is, that, hindering thus    My voyage, keeps me here, and tell me how    To cross the fishy deep and reach my home.’  

    “Such were my words, and he in answer said:﻿—    ‘But thou to Jove and to the other gods    Shouldst first have paid acceptable sacrifice,    And shouldst have then embarked to reach with speed    Thy native land across the dark-blue deep.    Now it is not thy fate to see again    Thy friends, thy stately palace, and the land    That saw thy birth, until thou stand once more    Beside the river that through Egypt flows    From Jove, and offer sacred hecatombs    To the ever-living gods inhabiting    The boundless heaven, and they will speed thee forth    Upon the voyage thou dost long to make.’  

    “He spake. My heart was broken as I heard    His bidding to recross the shadowy sea    To Egypt, for the way was difficult    And long; and yet I answered him and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Duly will I perform, O aged seer,    What thou commandest. But I pray thee tell,    And truly, whether all the sons of Greece    Whom Nestor and myself, in setting sail,    Left on the Trojan coast, have since returned    Safe with their galleys, or have any died    Untimely in their ships or in the arms    Of their companions since the war wasclosed?’  

    “I spake; again he answered me and said:﻿—    ‘Why dost thou ask, Atrides, since to know    Thou needest not, nor is it well to explore    The secrets of my mind? Thou canst not, sure,    Refrain from tears when thou shalt know the whole.    Many are dead, and many left in Troy.    Two leaders only of the well-armed Greeks    Were slain returning; in that combat thou    Didst bear a part; one, living yet, is kept,    Far in the mighty main, from his return.  

    “ ‘Amid his well-oared galleys Ajax died.    For Neptune first had driven him on the rocks    Of Gyrae, yet had saved him from the sea;    And he, though Pallas hated him, had yet    Been rescued, but for uttering boastful words,    Which drew his fate upon him. He had said    That he, in spite of all the gods, would come    Safe from those mountain waves. When Neptune heard    The boaster’s challenge, instantly he laid    His strong hand on the trident, smote the rock    And cleft it to the base. Part stood erect,    Part fell into the deep. There Ajax sat,    And felt the shock, and with the falling mass    Was carried headlong to the billowy depths    Below, and drank the brine and perished there.    Thy brother in his roomy ships escaped    The danger, for imperial Juno’s aid    Preserved him. But when near Meleia’s heights    About to land, a tempest seized and swept    The hero thence across the fishy deep,    Lamenting his hard lot, to that far cape    Where once abode Thyestes, and where now    His son Aegisthus dwelt. But when the gods    Sent other winds, and safe at last appeared    The voyage, they returned, and reached their home.    With joy he stepped upon his native soil,    And kissed the earth that bore him, while his tears    At that most welcome sight flowed fast and warm.    Him from a lofty perch a spy beheld,    Whom treacherous Aegisthus planted there,    Bribed by two golden talents. He had watched    The whole year through, lest, coming unobserved,    The king might make his prowess felt. The spy    Flew to the royal palace with the news,    And instantly Aegisthus planned a snare.    He chose among the people twenty men,    The bravest, whom he stationed out of sight,    And gave command that others should prepare    A banquet. Then with chariots and with steeds,    And with a deadly purpose in his heart,    He went, and, meeting Agamemnon, bade    The shepherd of the people to the feast,    And slew him at the board as men might slay    A bullock at the crib. Of all who went    With Agamemnon thither, none survived,    And of the followers of Aegisthus none,    But all were slaughtered in the banquet-hall’  

    “He spake; my heart was breaking, and I wept,    While sitting on the sand, nor in my heart    Cared I to live, or longer to behold    The sweet light of the sun. But when there came    Respite from tears and writhing on the ground,    The Ancient of the Deep, who ne’er deceives,    Spake yet again: ‘Atrides, lose no time    In tears; they profit nothing. Rather seek    The means by which thou mayst the soonest reach    Thy native land. There thou perchance mayst find    Aegisthus yet alive, or haply first    Orestes may have slain him, and thyself    Arrive to see the funeral rites performed.’  

    “He spake, and though afflicted still, my heart    Was somewhat comforted; my spirit rose,    And thus I answered him with winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘These men I know; name now the third, who still    Is kept from his return afar within    The mighty main﻿—alive, perchance, or dead;    For, though I dread to hear, I long to know.’  

    “I spake, and Proteus answered me again:﻿—    ‘It is Laertes’ son, whose dwelling stands    In Ithaca. I saw him in an isle,    And in the cavern-palace of the nymph    Calypso, weeping bitterly, for she    Constrains his stay. He cannot leave the isle    For his own country; ship arrayed with oars    And seamen has he none to bear him o’er    The breast of the great ocean. But for thee,    ’Tis not decreed that thou shalt meet thy fate    And die, most noble Menelaus, where    The steeds of Argos in her pastures graze.    The gods will send thee to the Elysian plain,    And to the end of earth, the dwelling-place    Of fair-haired Rhadamanthus. There do men    Lead easiest lives. No snow, no bitter cold,    No beating rains, are there; the ocean-deeps    With murmuring breezes from the West refresh    The dwellers. Thither shalt thou go; for thou    Art Helen’s spouse, and son-in-law of Jove.’  

    “He spake, and plunged into the billowy deep.    I to the fleet returned in company    With my brave men, revolving, as I went,    A thousand projects in my thought. I reached    My galley by the sea, and we prepared    Our evening meal. The hallowed night came down,    And there upon the ocean-beach we slept.    But when the rosy-fingered Morn appeared,    The daughter of the Dawn, we drew our ships    To the great deep, and raised the masts and spread    The sails; the crews, all entering, took their seats    Upon the benches, ranged in order due,    And beat the foaming water with their oars.    Again to Egypt’s coast I brought the fleet,    And to the river that descends from Jove,    And there I offered chosen hecatombs;    And having thus appeased the gods, I reared    A tomb to Agamemnon, that his fame    Might never die. When this was done I sailed    For home; the gods bestowed a favoring wind.    But now remain thou till the eleventh day,    Or till the twelfth, beneath my roof, and then    Will I dismiss thee with munificent gifts﻿—    Three steeds, a polished chariot, and a cup    Of price, with which to pour, from day to day,    Wine to the gods in memory of me.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:﻿—    “Atrides, seek not to detain me long,    Though I could sit contentedly a year    Beside thee, never longing for my home,    Nor for my parents, such delight I find    In listening to thy words; but even now,    In hallowed Pylos, my companions grow    Weary, while thou delayest my return.    The gifts﻿—whate’er thou choosest to bestow﻿—    Let them be such as I can treasure up.    The steeds to Ithaca I may not take,    I leave them to adorn thy retinue;    For thou art ruler o’er a realm of plains,    Where grows much lotus, and sweet grasses spring,    And wheat and rye, and the luxuriant stalks    Of the white barley. But in Ithaca    Are no broad grounds for coursing, meadows none.    Goats graze amid its fields, a fairer land    Than those where horses feed. No isle that lies    Within the deep has either roads for steeds    Or meadows, least of all has Ithaca.”  

    He spake; the valiant Menelaus smiled,    And kindly touched him with his hand and said:﻿—  

    “Dear son, thou comest of a generous stock;    Thy words declare it. I will change my gifts,    As well I may. Of all that in my house    Are treasured up, the choicest I will give,    And the most precious. I will give a cup    Wrought all of silver save its brim of gold.    It is the work of Vulcan. Phaedimus    The hero, King of Sidon, gave it me,    When I was coming home, and underneath    His roof was sheltered. Now it shall be thine.”  

    So talked they with each other. Meantime came    Those who prepared the banquet to the halls    Of the great monarch. Bringing sheep they came    And strengthening wine. Their wives, who on their brows    Wore showy fillets, brought the bread, and thus    Within the house of Menelaus all    Was bustle, setting forth the evening meal.  

    But in the well-paved court which lay before    The palace of Ulysses, where of late    Their insolence was shown, the suitor train    Amused themselves with casting quoits and spears,    While by themselves Antinoüs, and the youth    Of godlike mien, Eurymachus, who both    Were eminent above the others, sat.    To them Noëmon, son of Phronius, went,    Drew near, bespake Antinoüs and inquired:﻿—  

    “Is it among us known, or is it not,    Antinoüs, when Telemachus returns    From sandy Pylos? Thither he is gone    And in my galley, which I need to cross    To spacious Elis. There I have twelve mares    And hardy mule-colts with them yet untamed,    And some I must subdue to take the yoke.”  

    He spake, and they were both amazed; for they    Had never thought of him as visiting    Neleian Pylos, deeming that the youth    Was somewhere in his fields, among the flocks,    Or haply with the keeper of the swine.  

    Then did Antinoüs, Eupeithes’ son,    Make answer: “Tell me truly when he sailed,    And what young men of Ithaca he chose    To go with him. Were they his slaves, or hired    To be his followers? Tell, for I would know    The whole. Took he thy ship against thy will?    Or didst thou yield it at his first request?”  

    Noëmon, son of Phornius, thus replied:﻿—    “Most willingly I gave it, for what else    Would anyone have done when such a man    Desired it in his need? It would have been    Hard to deny it. For the band of youths    Who followed him, they are the bravest here    Of all our people; and I saw embark,    As their commander, Mentor, or some god    Like Mentor altogether. One thing moves    My wonder. Only yesterday, at dawn,    I met with Mentor here, whom I before    Had seen embarking for the Pylian coast.”  

    Noëmon spake, and to his father’s house    Departed. Both were troubled at his words,    And all the suitors took at once their seats,    And ceased their pastimes. Then Antinoüs spake,    Son of Eupeithes, greatly vexed; his heart    Was darkened with blind rage; his eyes shot fire.  

    “Strange doings these! a great and proud exploit    Performed﻿—this voyage of Telemachus,    Which we had called impossible! The boy,    In spite of us, has had his will and gone,    And carried off a ship, and for his crew    Chosen the bravest of the people here.    He yet will prove a pest. May Jupiter    Crush him ere he can work us further harm!    Now give me a swift barque and twenty men    That I may lie in ambush and keep watch    For his return within the straits between    This isle and rugged Samos; then, I deem,    He will have sought his father to his cost.”  

    He spake; they praised his words and bade him act,    And rose and left their places, entering    The palace of Ulysses. Brief the time    That passed before Penelope was warned    Of what the suitors treacherously planned.    The herald Medon told her all. He heard    In the outer court their counsels while within    They plotted, and he hastened through the house    To bring the tidings to Penelope.    Penelope perceived him as he stepped    Across the threshold, and bespake him thus:﻿—  

    “Why, herald, have the suitor princes sent    Thee hither? comest thou to bid the maids    Of great Ulysses leave their tasks and make    A banquet ready? Would their wooing here    And elsewhere were but ended, and this feast    Were their last feast on earth! Ye who in throngs    Come hither and so wastefully consume    The substance of the brave Telemachus,    Have ye not from your parents, while ye yet    Were children, heard how once Ulysses lived    Among them, never wronging any man    In all the realm by aught he did or said﻿—    As mighty princes often do, through hate    Of some and love of others? Never man    Endured injustice at his hands, but you﻿—    Your vile designs and acts are known; ye bear    No grateful memory of a good man’s deeds.”  

    And then, in turn, experienced Medon spake:﻿—    “O queen, I would this evil were the worst!    The suitors meditate a greater still,    And a more heinous far. May Jupiter    Never permit the crime! Their purpose is    To meet Telemachus, on his return,    And slay him with the sword; for thou must know    That on a voyage to the Pylian coast    And noble Lacedaemon he has sailed,    To gather tidings of his father’s fate.”  

    He spake, and her knees failed her and her heart    Sank as she heard. Long time she could not speak;    Her eyes were filled with tears, and her clear voice    Was choked; yet, finding words at length, she said:﻿—  

    “O herald! wherefore should my son have gone?    There was no need that he should trust himself    To the swift ships, those horses of the sea,    With which men traverse its unmeasured waste.    Was it that he might leave no name on earth?”  

    And then again experienced Medon spake:﻿—    “I know not whether prompted by some god    Or moved by his own heart thy son has sailed    For Pylos, hoping there to hear some news    Of his returning father, or his fate.”  

    Thus having said, the herald, traversing    The palace of Ulysses, went his way,    While a keen anguish overpowered the queen,    Nor could she longer bear to keep her place    Upon her seat﻿—and many seats were there﻿—    But on the threshold of her gorgeous rooms    Lay piteously lamenting. Round her came    Her maidens wailing﻿—all, both old and young,    Who formed her household. These Penelope,    Sobbing in her great sorrow, thus bespake:﻿—  

    “Hear me, my friends, the heavens have cast on me    Griefs heavier than on any others born    And reared with me﻿—me, who had lost by death    Already a most gracious husband, one    Who bore a lion heart and who was graced    With every virtue, greatly eminent    Among the Greeks, and widely famed abroad    Through Hellas and all Argos. Now my son,    He whom I loved, is driven before the storms    From home, inglorious, and I was not told    Of his departure. Ye too, worthless crew!    Ye took no thought, not one of you, to call    Me from my sleep, although ye must have known    Full well when he embarked in his black ship.    And if it had been told me that he planned    This voyage, then, impatient as he was    To sail, he would have certainly remained,    Or else have left me in these halls a corpse.    And now let one of my attendants call    The aged Dolius, whom, when first I came    To this abode, my father gave to me    To be my servant, and who has in charge    My orchards. Let him haste and take his place    Beside Laertes, and to him declare    All that has happened, that he may devise    Some fitting remedy, or go among    The people, to deplore the dark designs    Of those who now are plotting to destroy    The heir of great Ulysses and his own.”  

    Then Eurycleia, the beloved nurse,    Answered: “Dear lady, slay me with the sword,    Or leave me here alive; I will conceal    Nothing that has been done or said. I gave    All that he asked, both bread and delicate wine,    And took a solemn oath, which he required,    To tell thee naught of this till twelve days passed,    Or till thou shouldst thyself inquire and hear    Of his departure, that those lovely cheeks    Might not be stained with tears. Now bathe and put    Fresh garments on, and to the upper rooms    Ascending, with thy handmaids offer prayer    To Pallas, daughter of the god who bears    The aegis. She will then protect thy son,    Even from death. Grieve not the aged man,    Already much afflicted. Sure I am    The lineage of Arcesius has not lost    The favor of the gods, but someone yet    Surviving will possess its lofty halls    And its rich acres, stretching far away.”  

    She spake; the queen repressed her grief, and held    Her eyes from tears. She took the bath and put    Fresh garments on, and, to the upper rooms    Ascending with her maidens, heaped with cakes    A canister, and prayed to Pallas thus:﻿—  

    “Daughter invincible of Jupiter    The Aegis-bearer, hear me. If within    Thy courts the wise Ulysses ever burned    Fat thighs of beeves or sheep, remember it,    And rescue my dear son, and bring to naught    The wicked plots of the proud suitor-crew.”  

    She spake, and wept aloud. The goddess heard    Her prayer. Meantime the suitors filled with noise    The shadowy palace-halls, and there were some    Among that throng of arrogant youths who said:﻿—  

    “Truly the queen, whom we have wooed so long,    Prepares for marriage; little does she know    The bloody death we destine for her son.”  

    So spake they, unaware of what was done    Elsewhere. Antinoüs then stood forth and said:﻿—  

    “Good friends, I warn you all that ye refrain    From boasts like these, lest someone should report    Your words within. Now let us silently    Rise up, and all conspire to put in act    The counsel all so heartily approve.”  

    He spake, and chose a crew of twenty men,    The bravest. To the seaside and the ship    They went, and down to the deep water drew    The ship, and put the mast and sails on board,    And fitted duly to their leathern rings    The oars, and spread the white sail overhead.    Their nimble-handed servants brought them arms,    And there they moored the galley, went on board,    And supped and waited for the evening star.  

    Now in the upper chamber the chaste queen,    Penelope, lay fasting; food or wine    She had not tasted, and her thoughts were still    Fixed on her blameless son. Would he escape    The threatened death, or perish by the hands    Of the insolent suitors? As a lion’s thoughts,    When, midst a crowd of men, he sees with dread    The hostile circle slowly closing round,    Such were her thoughts, when balmy sleep at length    Came creeping over her as on her couch    She lay reclined, her limbs relaxed in rest.  

    Now Pallas framed a new device; she called    A phantom up, in aspect like the dame    Iphthima, whom Eumelus had espoused    In Pherae, daughter of the high-souled chief    Icarius. Her she sent into the halls    Of great Ulysses, that she might beguile    The sorrowful Penelope from tears    And lamentations. By the thong that held    The bolt she slid into the royal bower    And standing by her head bespake the queen:﻿—  

    “Penelope, afflicted as thou art,    Art thou asleep? The ever-blessed gods    Permit thee not to grieve and weep; thy son,    Who has not sinned against them, shall return.”  

    And then discreet Penelope replied,    Still sweetly slumbering at the Gate of Dreams:﻿—  

    “Why, sister, art thou here, who ne’er before    Hast come to me? The home is far away    In which thou dwellest. Thou exhortest me    To cease from grieving, and to lay aside    The painful thoughts that crowd into my mind,    And torture me who have already lost    A noble-minded, lionhearted spouse,    One eminent among Achaia’s sons    For every virtue, and whose fame was spread    Through Hellas and through Argos. Now my son,    My best beloved, goes to sea﻿—a boy,    Unused to hardships, and unskilled to deal    With strangers. More I sorrow for his sake    Than for his father’s. I am filled with fear,    And tremble lest he suffer wrong from those    Among whom he has gone, or on the deep,    Where he has enemies who lie in wait    To slay him ere he reach his home again.”  

    And then the shadowy image spake again:﻿—    “Be of good courage; let not fear o’ercome    Thy spirit, for there goes with him a guide    Such as all others would desire to have    Beside them ever, trusting in her power﻿—    Pallas Athene, and she looks on thee    With pity. From her presence I am sent,    Her messenger, declaring this to thee.”  

    Again discreet Penelope replied:﻿—    “If then thou be a goddess and hast heard    A goddess speak these words, declare, I pray,    Of that ill-fated one, if yet he live    And look upon the sun, or else have died    And passed to the abodes beneath the earth.”  

    Once more the shadowy image spake: “Of him    Will I say nothing, whether living yet    Or dead; no time is this for idle words.”  

    She said, and from the chamber glided forth    Beside the bolt, and mingled with the winds.    Then quickly from her couch of sleep arose    The daughter of Icarius, for her heart    Was glad, so plainly had the dream conveyed    Its message in the stillness of the night.  

    Meanwhile the suitors on their ocean-path    Went in their galley, plotting cruelly    To slay Telemachus. A rocky isle    Far in the middle sea, between the coast    Of Ithaca and craggy Samos, lies,    Named Asteris; of narrow bounds, yet there    A sheltered haven is to which two straits    Give entrance. There the Achaians lay in wait.  

            Book V  Departure of Ulysses from Calypso  

  Mercury despatched by Jupiter to Calypso with a message commanding her to send away Ulysses﻿—A raft contructed by Ulysses﻿—His departure on the raft﻿—A storm raised by Neptune, and the raft destroyed﻿—Escape of Ulysses from the tempest, and his landing on the isle of Scheria, inhabited by the Phaeacians.

      Aurora, rising from her couch beside    The famed Tithonus, brought the light of day    To men and to immortals. Then the gods    Came to their seats in council. With them came    High-thundering Jupiter, amongst them all    The mightiest. Pallas, mindful of the past,    Spake of Ulysses and his many woes,    Grieved that he still was with the island nymph:﻿—    “O father Jove, and all ye blessed ones    Who live forever! let not sceptred king    Henceforth be gracious, mild, and merciful    And righteous; rather be he deaf to prayer    And prone to deeds of wrong, since no one now    Remembers the divine Ulysses more    Among the people over whom he ruled    Benignly, like a father. Still he lies,    Weighed down by many sorrows, in the isle    And dwelling of Calypso, who so long    Constrains his stay. To his dear native land    Depart he cannot; ship arrayed with oars    And seamen has he none, to bear him o’er    The breast of the broad ocean. Nay, even now,    Against his well-beloved son a plot    is laid, to slay him as he journeys home    From Pylos the divine, and from the walls    Of famous Sparta, whither he had gone    To gather tidings of his father’s fate.”  

    Then answered her the Ruler of the storms:﻿—    “My child, what words are these that pass thy lips?    Was not thy long-determined counsel this﻿—    That in good time Ulysses should return,    To be avenged? Guide, then, Telemachus    Wisely﻿—for so thou canst﻿—that, all unharmed,    He reach his native land, and, in their barques,    Homeward the suitor-train retrace their way.”  

    He spake, and turned to Hermes, his dear son:﻿—    “Hermes﻿—for thou in this my messenger    Art, as in all things﻿—to the bright-haired nymph    Make known my steadfast purpose﻿—the return    Of suffering Ulysses. Neither gods    Nor men shall guide his voyage. On a raft,    Made firm with bands, he shall depart and reach,    After long hardships, on the twentieth day,    The fertile shore of Scheria, on whose isle    Dwell the Phaeacians, kinsmen of the gods.    They like a god shall honor him, and thence    Send him to his loved country in a ship,    With ample gifts of brass and gold, and store    Of raiment﻿—wealth like which he ne’er had brought    From conquered Ilion, had he reached his home    Safely, with all his portion of the spoil.    So is it preordained that he behold    His friends again, and stand once more within    His high-roofed palace, on his native soil.”  

    He spake; the herald Argicide obeyed,    And hastily beneath his feet he bound    The fair, ambrosial golden sandals, worn    To bear him over ocean like the wind,    And o’er the boundless land. His wand he took,    Wherewith he softly seals the eyes of men,    And opens them at will from sleep. With this    In hand, the mighty Argus-queller flew,    And, lighting on Pieria, from the sky    Plunged downward to the deep, and skimmed its face    Like hovering seamew, that on the broad gulfs    Of the unfruitful ocean seeks her prey,    And often dips her pinions in the brine;    So Hermes flew along the waste of waves.  

    But when he reached that island, far away,    Forth from the dark-blue ocean-swell he stepped    Upon the sea-beach, walking till he came    To the vast cave in which the bright-haired nymph    Made her abode. He found the nymph within;    A fire blazed brightly on the hearth, and far    Was wafted o’er the isle the fragrant smoke    Of cloven cedar, burning in the flame.    And cypress-wood. Meanwhile, in her recess,    She sweetly sang, as busily she threw    The golden shuttle through the web she wove.    And all about the grotto alders grew,    And poplars, and sweet-smelling cypresses.    In a green forest, high among whose boughs    Birds of broad wing, wood-owls, and falcons built    Their nests, and crows, with voices sounding far,    All haunting for their food the ocean-side.    A vine, with downy leaves and clustering grapes,    Crept over all the cavern rock. Four springs    Poured forth their glittering waters in a row,    And here and there went wandering side by side.    Around were meadows of soft green, o’ergrown    With violets and parsley. ’Twas a spot    Where even an immortal might awhile    Linger, and gaze with wonder and delight.    The herald Argus-queller stood, and saw,    And marvelled; but as soon as he had viewed    The wonders of the place, he turned his steps,    Entering the broad-roofed cave. Calypso there,    The glorious goddess, saw him as he came,    And knew him; for the ever-living gods    Are to each other known, though one may dwell    Far from the rest. Ulysses, large of heart,    Was not within. Apart, upon the shore,    He sat and sorrowed, where he oft in tears    And sighs and vain repinings passed the hours,    Gazing with wet eyes on the barren deep.    Now, placing Hermes on a shining seat    Of state, Calypso, glorious goddess, said:  

    “Thou of the golden wand, revered and loved,    What, Hermes, brings thee hither? Passing few    Have been thy visits. Make thy pleasure known.    My heart enjoins me to obey, if aught    That thou commandest be within my power;    But first accept the offerings due a guest.”  

    The goddess, speaking thus, before him placed    A table, where the heaped ambrosia lay,    And mingled the red nectar. Ate and drank    The herald Argus-queller, and, refreshed,    Answered the nymph, and made his message known:﻿—  

    “Art thou a goddess, and dost ask of me,    A god, why came I hither? Yet, since thou    Requirest, I will truly tell the cause.    I came unwillingly, at Jove’s command;    For who of choice would traverse the wide waste    Of the salt ocean, with no city near    Where men adore the gods with solemn rites    And chosen hecatombs. No god has power    To elude or to resist the purposes    Of aegis-bearing Jove. With thee abides,    He bids me say, the most unhappy man    Of all who round the city of Priam waged    The battle through nine years, and, in the tenth,    Laying it waste, departed for their homes.    But in their voyage they provoked the wrath    Of Pallas, who called up the furious winds    And angry waves against them. By his side    Sank all his gallant comrades in the deep.    Him did the winds and waves drive hither. Him    Jove bids thee send away with speed; for here    He must not perish, far from all he loves.    So is it preordained that he behold    His friends again, and stand once more within    His high-roofed palace, on his native soil.”  

    He spake; Calypso, glorious goddess, heard,    And shuddered, and with winged words replied:﻿—  

    “Ye are unjust, ye gods, and, envious far    Beyond all other beings, cannot bear    That ever goddess openly should make    A mortal man her consort. Thus it was    When once Aurora, rosy-fingered, took    Orion for her husband; ye were stung,    Amid your blissful lives, with envious hate,    Till chaste Diana, of the golden throne,    Smote him with silent arrows from her bow,    And slew him in Ortygia. Thus, again,    When bright-haired Ceres, swayed by her own heart,    In fields which bore three yearly harvests, met    Iäsion as a lover, this was known    Erelong to Jupiter, who flung from high    A flaming thunderbolt, and laid him dead.    And now ye envy me, that with me dwells    A mortal man. I saved him as he clung    Alone upon his floating keel; for Jove    Had cloven with a bolt of fire from heaven    His galley in the midst of the black sea,    And all his gallant comrades perished there.    Him kindly I received; I cherished him,    And promised him a life that ne’er should know    Decay or death. But since no god has power    To elude or to withstand the purposes    Of aegis-bearing Jove, let him depart﻿—    If so the sovereign moves him and commands﻿—    Over the barren deep. I send him not;    For neither ship arrayed with oars have I,    Nor seamen, o’er the boundless waste of waves    To bear him hence. My counsel I will give,    And nothing will I hide that he should know,    To place him safely on his native shore.”  

    The herald Argus-queller answered her:﻿—    “Dismiss him thus, and bear in mind the wrath    Of Jove, lest it be kindled against thee.”  

    Thus having said, the mighty Argicide    Departed; and the nymph, who now had heard    The doom of Jove, sought the greathearted man,    Ulysses. Him she found beside the deep,    Seated alone, with eyes from which the tears    Were never dried; for now no more the nymph    Delighted him; he wasted his sweet life    In yearning for his home. Night after night    He slept constrained within the hollow cave,    The unwilling by the fond; and day by day    He sat upon the rocks that edged the shore,    And in continual weeping and in sighs    And vain repinings wore the hours away,    Gazing through tears upon the barren deep.    The glorious goddess stood by him and spake:﻿—  

    “Unhappy! sit no longer sorrowing here,    Nor waste life thus. Lo! I most willingly    Dismiss thee hence. Rise, hew down trees, and bind    Their trunks with brazen clamps into a raft,    And fasten planks above, a lofty floor,    That it may bear thee o’er the dark-blue deep.    Bread will I put on board, water, and wine﻿—    Red wine, that cheers the heart﻿—and wrap thee well    In garments, and send after thee the wind,    That safely thou attain thy native shore,    If so the gods permit thee, who abide    In the broad heaven above, and better know    By far than I, and far more wisely judge.”  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, as she spake    Shuddered, and thus with winged words replied:﻿—  

    “Some other purpose than to send me home    Is in thy heart, O goddess, bidding me    To cross this frightful sea upon a raft﻿—    This perilous sea, where never even ships    Pass with their rapid keels, though Jove bestow    The wind that glads the seaman. Nay, I climb    No raft, against thy wish, unless thou swear    The great oath of the gods that thou in this    Dost meditate no other harm to me.”  

    He spake; Calypso, glorious goddess, smiled,    And smoothed his forehead with her hand, and said:﻿—  

    “Perverse, and slow to see where guile is not!    How could thy heart permit thee thus to speak?    Now bear me witness, Earth, and ye broad Heavens    Above us, and ye waters of the Styx    That flow beneath us, mightiest oath of all,    And most revered by all the blessed gods,    That I design no other harm to thee,    But that I plan for thee, and counsel thee    What I would do were I in need like thine.    I bear a juster mind; my bosom holds    A pitying heart, and not a heart of steel.”  

    Thus having said, the glorious goddess moved    Away with hasty steps, and where she trod    He followed, till they reached the vaulted cave﻿—    The goddess and the hero. There he took    The seat whence Hermes had just risen. The nymph    Brought forth whatever mortals eat and drink    To set before him. She right opposite    To that of great Ulysses took her seat.    Ambrosia there her maidens laid, and there    Poured nectar. Both put forth their hands, and took    The ready viands, till at length the calls    Of hunger and of thirst were satisfied;    Calypso, glorious goddess, then began:﻿—  

    “Son of Laertes, man of many wiles,    Highborn Ulysses! thus wilt thou depart    Home to thy native country? Then farewell;    But, couldst thou know the sufferings Fate ordains    For thee ere yet thou landest on its shore,    Thou wouldst remain to keep this home with me    And be immortal, strong as is thy wish    To see thy wife﻿—a wish that day by day    Possesses thee. I cannot deem myself    In face or form less beautiful than she;    For never with immortals can the race    Of mortal dames in form or face compare.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered her:﻿—  

    “Bear with me, gracious goddess; well I know    All thou couldst say. The sage Penelope    In feature and in stature comes not nigh    To thee, for she is mortal﻿—deathless thou,    And ever young; yet day by day I long    To be at home once more, and pine to see    The hour of my return. Even though some god    Smite me on the black ocean, I shall bear    The stroke, for in my bosom dwells a mind    Patient of suffering; much have I endured,    And much survived, in tempests on the deep,    And in the battle; let this happen too.”  

    He spake; the sun went down; the night came on;    And now the twain withdrew to a recess    Deep in the vaulted cave, where, side by side,    They took their rest. But when the child of Dawn,    Aurora, rosy-fingered, looked abroad,    Ulysses put his vest and mantle on;    The nymph too, in a robe of silver-white,    Ample, and delicate, and beautiful,    Arrayed herself, and round about her loins    Wound a fair golden girdle, drew a veil    Over her head, and planned to send away    Magnanimous Ulysses. She bestowed    A heavy axe, of steel and double-edged,    Well fitted to the hand, the handle wrought    Of olive-wood, firm set and beautiful.    A polished adze she gave him next, and led    The way to a far corner of the isle,    Where lofty trees, alders and poplars, stood,    And firs that reached the clouds, sapless and dry    Long since, and fitter thus to ride the waves.    Then, having shown where grew the tallest trees,    Calypso, glorious goddess, sought her home.  

    Trees then he felled, and soon the task was done.    Twenty in all he brought to earth, and squared    Their trunks with the sharp steel, and carefully    He smoothed their sides, and wrought them by a line.    Calypso, gracious goddess, having brought    Wimbles, he bored the beams, and, fitting them    Together, made them fast with nails and clamps.    As when some builder, skilful in his art,    Frames for a ship of burden the broad keel,    Such ample breadth Ulysses gave the raft.    Upon the massy beams he reared a deck,    And floored it with long planks from end to end.    On this a mast he raised, and to the mast    Fitted a yard; he shaped a rudder next,    To guide the raft along her course, and round    With woven work of willow-boughs he fenced    Her sides against the dashings of the sea.    Calypso, gracious goddess, brought him store    Of canvas, which he fitly shaped to sails,    And, rigging her with cords and ropes and stays,    Heaved her with levers into the great deep.  

    ’Twas the fourth day. His labors now were done,    And on the fifth the goddess from her isle    Dismissed him, newly from the bath, arrayed    In garments given by her, that shed perfumes.    A skin of dark red wine she put on board,    A larger one of water, and for food    A basket, stored with viands such as please    The appetite. A friendly wind and soft    She sent before. The great Ulysses spread    His canvas joyfully to catch the breeze,    And sat and guided with nice care the helm,    Gazing with fixed eye on the Pleiades,    Boötes setting late, and the Great Bear,    By others called the Wain, which, wheeling round,    Looks ever toward Orion, and alone    Dips not into the waters of the deep.    For so Calypso, glorious goddess, bade    That on his ocean journey he should keep    That constellation ever on his left.    Now seventeen days were in the voyage past,    And on the eighteenth shadowy heights appeared,    The nearest point of the Phaeacian land,    Lying on the dark ocean like a shield.  

    But mighty Neptune, coming from among    The Ethiopians, saw him. Far away    He saw, from mountain-heights of Solyma,    The voyager, and burned with fiercer wrath,    And shook his head, and said within himself:﻿—  

    “Strange! now I see the gods have new designs    For this Ulysses, formed while I was yet    In Ethiopia. He draws near the land    Of the Phaeacians, where it is decreed    He shall o’erpass the boundary of his woes;    But first, I think, he will have much to bear.”  

    He spake, and round about him called the clouds    And roused the ocean﻿—wielding in his hand    The trident﻿—summoned all the hurricanes    Of all the winds, and covered earth and sky    At once with mists, while from above the night    Fell suddenly. The east wind and the south    Pushed forth at once, with the strong-blowing west,    And the clear north rolled up his mighty waves.    Ulysses trembled in his knees and heart,    And thus to his great soul, lamenting, said:﻿—  

    “What will become of me? unhappy man!    I fear that all the goddess said was true,    Foretelling what disasters should o’ertake    My voyage ere I reach my native land.    Now are her words fulfilled. How Jupiter    Wraps the great heaven in clouds and stirs the deep    To tumult! Wilder grow the hurricanes    Of all the winds, and now my fate is sure.    Thrice happy, four times happy, they who fell    On Troy’s wide field, warring for Atreus’ sons:    O, had I met my fate and perished there,    That very day on which the Trojan host,    Around the dead Achilles, hurled at me    Their brazen javelins, I had then received    Due burial, and great glory with the Greeks;    Now must I die a miserable death.”  

    As thus he spake, upon him, from on high,    A huge and frightful billow broke; it whirled    The raft around, and far from it he fell.    His hands let go the rudder; a fierce rush    Of all the winds together snapped in twain    The mast; far off the yard and canvas flew    Into the deep; the billow held him long    Beneath the waters, and he strove in vain    Quickly to rise to air from that huge swell    Of ocean, for the garments weighed him down    Which fair Calypso gave him. But at length    Emerging, he rejected from his throat    The bitter brine that down his forehead streamed.    Even then, though hopeless with dismay, his thought    Was on the raft; and, struggling through the waves,    He seized it, sprang on board, and, seated there,    Escaped the threatened death. Still to and fro    The rolling billows drave it. As the wind    In autumn sweeps the thistles o’er the field,    Clinging together, so the blasts of heaven    Hither and thither drove it o’er the sea.    And now the south wind flung it to the north    To buffet; now the east wind to the west.  

    Ino Leucothea saw him clinging there﻿—    The delicate-footed child of Cadmus, once    A mortal, speaking with a mortal voice,    Though now within the ocean gulfs she shares    The honors of the gods. With pity she    Beheld Ulysses struggling thus distressed,    And, rising from the abyss below, in form    A cormorant, the sea-nymph took her perch    On the well-banded raft, and thus she said:﻿—  

    “Ah, luckless man! how hast thou angered thus    Earthshaking Neptune, that he visits thee    With these disasters? Yet he cannot take,    Although he seek it earnestly, thy life.    Now do my bidding, for thou seemest wise.    Laying aside thy garments, let the raft    Drift with the winds, while thou, by strength of arm,    Makest thy way in swimming to the land    Of the Phaeacians, where thy safety lies.    Receive this veil, and bind its heavenly woof    Beneath thy breast, and have no further fear    Of hardship or of danger. But, as soon    As thou shalt touch the island, take it off,    And turn away thy face, and fling it far    From where thou standest into the black deep.”  

    The goddess gave the veil as thus she spoke,    And to the tossing deep went down, in form    A cormorant; the black wave covered her.    But still Ulysses, mighty sufferer,    Pondered, and thus to his great soul he said:﻿—  

    “Ah me! perhaps some god is planning here    Some other fraud against me, bidding me    Forsake my raft. I will not yet obey,    For still far off I see the land in which    ’Tis said my refuge lies. This will I do,    For this seems wisest While the fastenings last    That hold these timbers, I will keep my place    And bide the tempest here; but when the waves    Shall dash my raft in pieces, I will swim,    For nothing better will remain to do.”  

    As he revolved this purpose in his mind,    Earthshaking Neptune sent a mighty wave,    Horrid and huge and high, and where he sat    It smote him. As a violent wind uplifts    The dry chaff heaped upon a threshing-floor,    And sends it scattered through the air abroad,    So did that wave fling loose the ponderous beams.    To one of these, Ulysses, clinging fast,    Bestrode it, like a horseman on his steed;    And now he took the garments off, bestowed    By fair Calypso, binding round his breast    The veil, and forward plunged into the deep,    With palms outspread, prepared to swim. Meanwhile    Neptune beheld him﻿—Neptune, mighty king﻿—    And shook his head, and said within himself:﻿—  

    “Go thus, and laden with mischances roam    The waters till thou come among the race    Cherished by Jupiter, but well I deem    Thou wilt not find thy share of suffering light.”  

    Thus having said he urged his coursers on,    With their fair-flowing manes, until he came    To Aegae, where his glorious palace stands.  

    But Pallas, child of Jove, had other thoughts.    She stayed the course of every wind beside,    And bade them rest, and lulled them into sleep,    But summoned the swift north to break the waves,    That so Ulysses, the highborn, escaped    From death and from the fates, might be the guest    Of the Phaeacians﻿—men who love the sea.    Two days and nights among the mighty waves    He floated, oft his heart foreboding death.    But when the bright-haired Eos had fulfilled    The third day’s course, and all the winds were laid,    And calm was on the watery waste, he saw    That land was near, as, lifted on the crest    Of a huge swell, he looked with sharpened sight;    And as a father’s life preserved makes glad    His children’s hearts, when long time he has lain    Sick, wrung with pain, and wasting by the power    Of some malignant genius, till at length    The gracious gods bestow a welcome cure,    So welcome to Ulysses was the sight    Of woods and fields. By swimming on he thought    To climb and tread the shore; but when he drew    So near that one who shouted could be heard    From land, the sound of ocean on the rocks    Came to his ear﻿—for there huge breakers roared    And spouted fearfully, and all around    Was covered with the sea-foam. Haven here    Was none for ships, nor sheltering creek, but shores    Beetling from high, and crags and walls of rock.    Ulysses trembled both in knees and heart,    And thus to his great soul, lamenting, said:﻿—  

    “Now woe is me! as soon as Jove has shown    What I had little hoped to see, the land,    And I through all these waves have ploughed my way,    I find no issue from the hoary deep.    For sharp rocks border it, and all around    Roar the wild surges; slippery cliffs arise    Close to deep gulfs, and footing there is none    Where I might plant my steps and thus escape.    All effort now were fruitless to resist    The mighty billow hurrying me away    To dash me on the pointed rocks. If yet    I strive, by swimming further, to descry    Some sloping shore or harbor of the isle,    I fear the tempest, lest it hurl me back,    Heavily groaning, to the fishy deep;    Or huge sea-monster, from the multitude    Which sovereign Amphitritè feeds, be sent    Against me by some god﻿—for well I know    The power who shakes the shores is wroth with me.”  

    While he revolved these doubts within his mind,    A huge wave hurled him toward the rugged coast.    Then had his limbs been flayed, and all his bones    Broken at once, had not the blue-eyed maid,    Minerva, prompted him. Borne toward the rock,    He clutched it instantly with both his hands,    And panting clung till that huge wave rolled by,    And so escaped its fury. Back it came,    And smote him once again, and flung him far    Seaward. As to the claws of Polypus,    Plucked from its bed, the pebbles thickly cling,    So flakes of skin, from off his powerful hands,    Were left upon the rock. The mighty surge    O’erwhelmed him; he had perished ere his time﻿—    Hapless Ulysses!﻿—but the blue-eyed maid,    Pallas, informed his mind with forecast. Straight    Emerging from the wave that shoreward rolled,    He swam along the coast and eyed it well,    In hope of sloping beach or sheltered creek.    But when, in swimming, he had reached the mouth    Of a soft-flowing river, here appeared    The spot he wished for, smooth, without a rock,    And here was shelter from the wind. He felt    The current’s flow, and thus devoutly prayed:﻿—  

    “Hear me, O sovereign power, whoe’er thou art!    To thee, the long-desired, I come. I seek    Escape from Neptune’s threatenings on the sea.    The deathless gods respect the prayer of him    Who looks to them for help, a fugitive,    As I am now, when to thy stream I come,    And to thy knees, from many a hardship past.    O thou that here art ruler, I declare    Myself thy suppliant; be thou merciful.”  

    He spoke: the river stayed his current, checked    The billows, smoothed them to a calm, and gave    The swimmer a safe landing at his mouth.    Then dropped his knees and sinewy arms at once,    Unstrung, for faint with struggling was his heart.    His body was all swol’n; the brine gushed forth    From mouth and nostrils; all unnerved he lay,    Breathless and speechless; utter weariness    O’ermastered him. But when he breathed again,    And his flown senses had returned, he loosed    The veil that Ino gave him from his breast,    And to the salt flood cast it. A great wave    Bore it far down the stream; the goddess there    In her own hands received it. He, meanwhile,    Withdrawing from the brink, lay down among    The reeds, and kissed the harvest-bearing earth,    And thus to his great soul, lamenting, said:﻿—  

    “Ah me! what must I suffer more? what yet    Will happen to me? If by the river’s side    I pass the unfriendly watches of the night,    The cruel cold and dews that steep the bank    May, in this weakness, end me utterly,    For chilly blows this river-air at dawn;    But should I climb this hill, to sleep within    The shadowy wood, among thick shrubs, if cold    And weariness allow me, then I fear,    That, while the pleasant slumbers o’er me steal,    I may become the prey of savage beasts.”  

    Yet, as he longer pondered, this seemed best.    He rose, and sought the wood, and found it near    The water, on a height, o’erlooking far    The region round. Between two shrubs that sprang    Both from one spot he entered﻿—olive-trees,    One wild, one fruitful. The damp-blowing wind    Ne’er pierced their covert; never blazing sun    Darted his beams within, nor pelting shower    Beat through, so closely intertwined they grew.    Here entering, Ulysses heaped a bed    Of leaves with his own hands; he made it broad    And high, for thick the leaves had fallen around.    Two men and three, in that abundant store,    Might bide the winter storm, though keen the cold.    Ulysses, the great sufferer, on his couch    Looked and rejoiced, and placed himself within,    And heaped the leaves high o’er him and around,    As one who, dwelling in the distant fields,    Without a neighbor near him, hides a brand    In the dark ashes, keeping carefully    The seeds of fire alive, lest he, perforce,    To light his hearth must bring them from afar;    So did Ulysses in that pile of leaves    Bury himself, while Pallas o’er his eyes    Poured sleep, and closed his lids, that he might take,    After his painful toils, the fitting rest.  

            Book VI  Ulysses Discovered by Nausicaä  

  Nausicaä, daughter of Alcinoüs, king of the Phaeacians, directed by Pallas to go to the river and wash her marriage robes﻿—Sports of her maidens after the washing is performed﻿—Ulysses awakened by the noise, relieved and clothed by Nausicaä, and bidden to follow her into the city, and there make his suit to the queen, the wife of Alcinoüs.

      Thus overcome with toil and weariness,    The noble sufferer Ulysses slept,    While Pallas hastened to the realm and town    Peopled by the Phaeacians, who of yore    Abode in spacious Hypereia, near    The insolent race of Cyclops, and endured    Wrong from their mightier hands. A godlike chief,    Nausithoüs, led them, to a new abode,    And planted them in Scheria, far away    From plotting neighbors. With a wall he fenced    Their city, built them dwellings there, and reared    Fanes to the gods, and changed the plain to fields.    But he had bowed to death, and had gone down    To Hades, and Alcinoüs, whom the gods    Endowed with wisdom, governed in his stead.    Now to his palace, planning the return    Of the magnanimous Ulysses, came    The blue-eyed goddess Pallas, entering    The gorgeous chamber where a damsel slept﻿—    Nausicaä, daughter of the large-souled king    Alcinoüs, beautiful in form and face    As one of the immortals. Near her lay,    And by the portal, one on either side,    Fair as the Graces, two attendant maids.    The shining doors were shut. But Pallas came    As comes a breath of air, and stood beside    The damsel’s head and spake. In look she seemed    The daughter of the famous mariner    Dymas, a maiden whom Nausicaä loved,    The playmate of her girlhood. In her shape    The blue-eyed goddess stood, and thus she said:﻿—  

    “Nausicaä, has thy mother then brought forth    A careless housewife? Thy magnificent robes    Lie still neglected, though thy marriage day    Is near, when thou art to array thyself    In seemly garments, and bestow the like    On those who lead thee to the bridal rite;    For thus the praise of men is won, and thus    Thy father and thy gracious mother both    Will be rejoiced. Now with the early dawn    Let us all hasten to the washing-place.    I too would go with thee, and help thee there,    That thou mayst sooner end the task, for thou    Not long wilt be unwedded. Thou art wooed    Already by the noblest of the race    Of the Phaeacians, for thy birth, like theirs,    Is of the noblest. Make thy suit at morn    To thy illustrious father, that he bid    His mules and car be harnessed to convey    Thy girdles, robes, and mantles marvellous    In beauty. That were seemlier than to walk,    Since distant from the town the lavers lie.”  

    Thus having said, the blue-eyed Pallas went    Back to Olympus, where the gods have made,    So saith tradition, their eternal seat.    The tempest shakes it not, nor is it drenched    By showers, and there the snow doth never fall.    The calm clear ether is without a cloud;    And in the golden light, that lies on all,    Days after day the blessed gods rejoice.    Thither the blue-eyed goddess, having given    Her message to the sleeping maid, withdrew.  

    Soon the bright morning came. Nausicaä rose,    Clad royally, as marvelling at her dream    She hastened through the palace to declare    Her purpose to her father and the queen.    She found them both within. Her mother sat    Beside the hearth with her attendant maids,    And turned the distaff loaded with a fleece    Dyed in sea-purple. On the threshold stood    Her father, going forth to meet the chiefs    Of the Phaeacians in a council where    Their noblest asked his presence. Then the maid,    Approaching her beloved father, spake:﻿—  

    “I pray, dear father, give command to make    A chariot ready for me, with high sides    And sturdy wheels, to bear to the river-brink,    There to be cleansed, the costly robes that now    Lie soiled. Thee likewise it doth well beseem    At councils to appear in vestments fresh    And stainless. Thou hast also in these halls    Five sons, two wedded, three in boyhood’s bloom,    And ever in the dance they need attire    New from the wash. All this must I provide.”  

    She ended, for she shrank from saying aught    Of her own hopeful marriage. He perceived    Her thought and said: “Mules I deny thee not,    My daughter, nor aught else. Go then; my grooms    Shall make a carriage ready with high sides    And sturdy wheels, and a broad rack above.”  

    He spake, and gave command. The grooms obeyed,    And, making ready in the outer court    The strong-wheeled chariot, led the harnessed mules    Under the yoke and made them fast; and then    Appeared the maiden, bringing from her bower    The shining garments. In the polished car    She piled them, while with many pleasant meats    And flavoring morsels for the day’s repast    Her mother filled a hamper, and poured wine    Into a goatskin. As her daughter climbed    The car, she gave into her hands a cruse    Of gold with smooth anointing oil for her    And her attendant maids. Nausicaä took    The scourge and showy reins, and struck the mules    To urge them onward. Onward with loud noise    They went, and with a speed that slackened not,    And bore the robes and her﻿—yet not alone,    For with her went the maidens of her train.    Now when they reached the river’s pleasant brink,    Where lavers had been hollowed out to last    Perpetually, and freely through them flowed    Pure water that might cleanse the foulest stains,    They loosed the mules, and drove them from the wain    To browse the sweet grass by the eddying stream;    And took the garments out, and flung them down    In the dark water, and with hasty feet    Trampled them there in frolic rivalry.    And when the task was done, and all the stains    Were cleansed away, they spread the garments out    Along the beach and where the stream had washed    The gravel cleanest. Then they bathed, and gave    Their limbs the delicate oil, and took their meal    Upon the river’s border﻿—while the robes    Beneath the sun’s warm rays were growing dry.    And now, when they were all refreshed by food,    Mistress and maidens laid their veils aside    And played at ball. Nausicaä the white-armed    Began a song. As when the archer-queen    Diana, going forth among the hills﻿—    The sides of high Taÿgetus or slopes    Of Erymanthus﻿—chases joyously    Boars and fleet stags, and round her in a throng    Frolic the rural nymphs, Latona’s heart    Is glad, for over all the rest are seen    Her daughter’s head and brow, and she at once    Is known among them, though they all are fair,    Such was this spotless virgin midst her maids.  

    Now when they were about to move for home    With harnessed mules and with the shining robes    Carefully folded, then the blue-eyed maid,    Pallas, bethought herself of this﻿—to rouse    Ulysses and to bring him to behold    The bright-eyed maiden, that she might direct    The stranger’s way to the Phaeacian town.    The royal damsel at a handmaid cast    The ball; it missed, and fell into the stream    Where a deep eddy whirled. All shrieked aloud.    The great Ulysses started from his sleep    And sat upright, discoursing to himself:﻿—  

    “Ah me! upon what region am I thrown?    What men are here﻿—wild, savage, and unjust,    Or hospitable, and who hold the gods    In reverence? There are voices in the air,    Womanly voices, as of nymphs that haunt    The mountain summits, and the river-founts,    And the moist grassy meadows. Or perchance    Am I near men who have the power of speech?    Nay, let me then go forth at once and learn.”  

    Thus having said, the great Ulysses left    The thicket. From the close-grown wood he rent,    With his strong hand, a branch well set with leaves    And wound it as a covering round his waist.    Then like a mountain lion he went forth,    That walks abroad, confiding in his strength,    In rain and wind; his eyes shoot fire; he falls    On oxen, or on sheep, or forest-deer,    For hunger prompts him even to attack    The flock within its closely guarded fold.    Such seemed Ulysses when about to meet    Those fair-haired maidens, naked as he was,    But forced by strong necessity. To them    His look was frightful, for his limbs were foul    With sea-foam yet. To right and left they fled    Along the jutting riverbanks. Alone    The daughter of Alcinoüs kept her place,    For Pallas gave her courage and forbade    Her limbs to tremble. So she waited there.    Ulysses pondered whether to approach    The bright-eyed damsel and embrace her knees    And supplicate, or, keeping yet aloof,    Pray her with soothing words to show the way    Townward and give him garments. Musing thus,    It seemed the best to keep at distance still,    And use soft words, lest, should he clasp her knees,    The maid might be displeased. With gentle words    Skilfully ordered thus Ulysses spake:﻿—  

    “O queen, I am thy suppliant, whether thou    Be mortal or a goddess. If perchance    Thou art of that immortal race who dwell    In the broad heaven, thou art, I deem, most like    To Dian, daughter of imperial Jove,    In shape, in stature, and in noble air.    If mortal and a dweller of the earth,    Thrice happy are thy father and his queen,    Thrice happy are thy brothers; and their hearts    Must overflow with gladness for thy sake,    Beholding such a scion of their house    Enter the choral dance. But happiest he    Beyond them all, who, bringing princely gifts,    Shall bear thee to his home a bride; for sure    I never looked on one of mortal race,    Woman or man, like thee, and as I gaze    I wonder. Like to thee I saw of late,    In Delos, a young palm-tree growing up    Beside Apollo’s altar; for I sailed    To Delos, with much people following me,    On a disastrous voyage. Long I gazed    Upon it wonder-struck, as I am now﻿—    For never from the earth so fair a tree    Had sprung. So marvel I, and am amazed    At thee, O lady, and in awe forbear    To clasp thy knees. Yet much have I endured.    It was but yestereve that I escaped    From the black sea, upon the twentieth day,    So long the billows and the rushing gales    Farther and farther from Ogygia’s isle    Had borne me. Now upon this shore some god    Casts me, perchance to meet new sufferings here;    For yet the end is not, and many things    The gods must first accomplish. But do thou,    queen, have pity on me, since to thee    I come the first of all. I do not know    A single dweller of the land beside.    Show me, I pray, thy city; and bestow    Some poor old robe to wrap me﻿—if, indeed,    In coming hither, thou hast brought with thee    Aught poor or coarse. And may the gods vouchsafe    To thee whatever blessing thou canst wish,    Husband and home and wedded harmony.    There is no better, no more blessed state,    Than when the wife and husband in accord    Order their household lovingly. Then those    Repine who hate them, those who wish them well    Rejoice, and they themselves the most of all.”    And then the white-armed maid Nausicaä said:﻿—    “Since then, O stranger, thou art not malign    Of purpose nor weak-minded﻿—yet, in truth,    Olympian Jupiter bestows the goods    Of fortune on the noble and the base    To each one at his pleasure; and thy griefs    Are doubtless sent by him, and it is fit    That thou submit in patience﻿—now that thou    Hast reached our lands, and art within our realm,    Thou shalt not lack for garments nor for aught    Due to a suppliant stranger in his need.    The city I will show thee, and will name    Its dwellers﻿—the Phaeacians﻿—they possess    The city; all the region lying round    Is theirs, and I am daughter of the prince    Alcinoüs, large of soul, to whom are given    The rule of the Phaeacians and their power.”  

    So spake the damsel, and commanded thus    Her fair-haired maids: “Stay! whither do ye flee,    My handmaids, when a man appears in sight?    Ye think, perhaps, he is some enemy.    Nay, there is no man living now, nor yet    Will live, to enter, bringing war, the land    Of the Phaeacians. Very dear are they    To the great gods. We dwell apart, afar    Within the unmeasured deep, amid its waves    The most remote of men; no other race    Hath commerce with us. This man comes to us    A wanderer and unhappy, and to him    Our cares are due. The stranger and the poor    Are sent by Jove, and slight regards to them    Are grateful. Maidens, give the stranger food    And drink, and take him to the riverside    To bathe where there is shelter from the wind.”  

    So spake the mistress; and they stayed their flight    And bade each other stand, and led the chief    Under a shelter as the royal maid,    Daughter of stout Alcinoüs, gave command,    And laid a cloak and tunic near the spot    To be his raiment, and a golden cruse    Of limpid oil. Then, as they bade him bathe    In the fresh stream, the noble chieftain said:﻿—  

    “Withdraw, ye maidens, hence, while I prepare    To cleanse my shoulders from the bitter brine,    And to anoint them; long have these my limbs    Been unrefreshed by oil. I will not bathe    Before you. I should be ashamed to stand    Unclothed in presence of these bright-haired maids.”  

    He spake; they hearkened and withdrew, and told    The damsel what he said. Ulysses then    Washed the salt spray of ocean from his back    And his broad shoulders in the flowing stream,    And wiped away the sea-froth from his brows.    And when the bath was over, and his limbs    Had been anointed, and he had put on    The garments sent him by the spotless maid,    Jove’s daughter, Pallas, caused him to appear    Of statelier size and more majestic mien,    And bade the locks that crowned his head flow down,    Curling like blossoms of the hyacinth.    As when some skilful workman trained and taught    By Vulcan and Minerva in his art    Binds the bright silver with a verge of gold,    And graceful is his handiwork, such grace    Did Pallas shed upon the hero’s brow    And shoulders, as he passed along the beach,    And, glorious in his beauty and the pride    Of noble bearing, sat aloof. The maid    Admired, and to her bright-haired women spake:﻿—  

    “Listen to me, my maidens, while I speak.    This man comes not among the godlike sons    Of the Phaeacian stock against the will    Of all the gods of heaven. I thought him late    Of an unseemly aspect; now he bears    A likeness to the immortal ones whose home    Is the broad heaven. I would that I might call    A man like him my husband, dwelling here,    And here content to dwell. Now hasten, maids,    And set before the stranger food and wine.”  

    She spake; they heard and cheerfully obeyed,    And set before Ulysses food and wine.    The patient chief Ulysses ate and drank    Full eagerly, for he had fasted long.  

    White-armed Nausicaä then had other cares.    She placed the smoothly folded robes within    The sumptuous chariot, yoked the firm-hoofed mules,    And mounted to her place, and from the seat    Spake kindly, counselling Ulysses thus:﻿—  

    “Now, stranger, rise and follow to the town,    And to my royal father’s palace I    Will be thy guide, where, doubt not, thou wilt meet    The noblest men of our Phaeacian race.    But do as I advise﻿—for not inapt    I deem thee. While we traverse yet the fields    Among the tilth, keep thou among my train    Of maidens, following fast behind the mules    And chariot. I will lead thee in the way.    But when our train goes upward toward the town,    Fenced with its towery wall, and on each side    Embraced by a fair haven, with a strait    Of narrow entrance, where our well-oared barques    Have each a mooring-place along the road,    And there round Neptune’s glorious fane extends    A marketplace, surrounded by huge stones,    Dragged from the quarry hither, where is kept    The rigging of the barques﻿—sailcloth and ropes﻿—    And oars are polished there﻿—for little reck    Phaeacians of the quiver and the bow,    And give most heed to masts and shrouds and ships    Well poised, in which it is their pride to cross    The foamy deep﻿—when there I would not bring    Rude taunts upon myself, for in the crowd    Are brutal men. One of the baser sort    Perchance might say, on meeting us: ‘What man,    Handsome and lusty-limbed, is he who thus    Follows Nausicaä? where was it her luck    To find him? will he be her husband yet?    Perhaps she brings some wanderer from his ship,    A stranger from strange lands, for we have here    No neighbors; or, perhaps, it is a god    Called down by fervent prayer from heaven to dwell    Henceforth with her. ’Tis well if she have found    A husband elsewhere, since at home she meets    Her many noble wooers with disdain;    They are Phaeacians.’ Thus the crowd would say,    And it would bring reproach upon my name.    I too would blame another who should do    The like, and, while her parents were alive,    Without their knowledge should consort with men    Before her marriage. Stranger, now observe    My words, and thou shalt speedily obtain    Safe-conduct from my father, and be sent    Upon thy voyage homeward. We shall reach    A beautiful grove of poplars by the way,    Sacred to Pallas; from it flows a brook,    And round it lies a meadow. In this spot    My father has his country-grounds, and here    His garden flourishes, as far from town    As one could hear a shout. There sit thou down    And wait till we are in the city’s streets    And at my father’s house. When it shall seem    That we are there, arise and onward fare    To the Phaeacian city, and inquire    Where dwells Alcinoüs the large-souled king,    My father; ’tis not hard to find; a child    Might lead thee thither. Of the houses reared    By the Phaeacians there is none like that    In which Alcinoüs the hero dwells.    When thou art once within the court and hall,    Go quickly through the palace till thou find    My mother where she sits beside the hearth,    Leaning against a column in its blaze,    And twisting threads, a marvel to behold,    Of bright sea-purple, while her maidens sit    Behind her. Near her is my father’s throne,    On which he sits at feasts, and drinks the wine    Like one of the immortals. Pass it by    And clasp my mother’s knees; so mayst thou see    Soon and with joy the day of thy return,    Although thy home be far. For if her mood    Be kindly toward thee, thou mayst hope to greet    Thy friends once more, and enter yet again    Thy own fair palace in thy native land.”  

    Thus having said, she raised the shining scourge    And struck the mules, that quickly left behind    The river. On they went with easy pace    And even steps. The damsel wielded well    The reins, and used the lash with gentle hand,    So that Ulysses and her train of maids    On foot could follow close. And now the sun    Was sinking when they came to that fair grove    Sacred to Pallas. There the noble chief    Ulysses sat him down, and instantly    Prayed to the daughter of imperial Jove:﻿—  

    “O thou unconquerable child of Jove    The Aegis-bearer! hearken to me now,    Since late thou wouldst not listen to my prayer,    What time the mighty shaker of the shores    Pursued and wrecked me! Grant me to receive    Pity and kindness from Phaeacia’s sons.”  

    So prayed he, supplicating. Pallas heard    The prayer, but came not to him openly.    Awe of her father’s brother held her back;    For he would still pursue with violent hate    Ulysses, till he reached his native land.  

            Book VII  Reception of Ulysses by Alcinoüs  

  Return of Nausicaä to the city, followed by Ulysses﻿—Palace and garden of Alcinoüs﻿—Reception of Ulysses by the queen and her husband﻿—Narrative given by Ulysses of his voyage and shipwreck.

      So prayed Ulysses the great sufferer.    The strong mules bore the damsel toward the town,    And when she reached her father’s stately halls    She stopped beneath the porch. Her brothers came    Around her, like in aspect to the gods,    And loosed the mules, and bore the garments in.    She sought her chamber, where an aged dame    Attendant there, an Epirote, and named    Eurymedusa, lighted her a fire.    She by the well-oared galleys had been brought    Beforetime from Epirus, and was given    To king Alcinoüs, ruler over all    Phaeacia’s sons, who hearkened to his voice    As if he were a god. ’Twas she who reared    White-armed Nausicaä in the royal halls,    Tended her hearth, and dressed her evening meal.  

    Now rose Ulysses up, and townward turned    His steps, while friendly Pallas wrapt his way    In darkness, lest someone among the sons    Of the Phaeacians with unmannerly words    Might call to him or ask him who he was.    And just as he was entering that fair town    The blue-eyed Pallas met him, in the form    Of a young virgin with an urn. She stood    Before him, and Ulysses thus inquired:﻿—  

    “Wilt thou, my daughter, guide me to the house    Where dwells Alcinoüs, he who rules this land?    I am a stranger, who have come from far    After long hardships, and of all who dwell    Within this realm I know not even one.”  

    Pallas, the blue-eyed goddess, thus replied:﻿—    “Father and stranger, I will show the house;    The dwelling of my own good father stands    Close by it. Follow silently, I pray,    And I will lead. Look not on any man    Nor ask a question; for the people here    Affect not strangers, nor do oft receive    With kindly welcome him who comes from far.    They trust in their swift barques, which to and fro,    By Neptune’s favor, cross the mighty deep.    Their galleys have the speed of wings or thought.”  

    Thus Pallas spake, and quickly led the way.    He followed in her steps. They saw him not﻿—    Those trained Phaeacian seamen﻿—for the power    That led him, Pallas of the amber hair,    Forbade the sight, and threw a friendly veil    Of darkness over him. Ulysses saw,    Wondering, the haven and the gallant ships,    The marketplace where heroes thronged, the walls    Long, lofty, and beset with palisades,    A marvel to the sight. But when they came    To the king’s stately palace, thus began    The blue-eyed goddess, speaking to the chief:﻿—  

    “Father and stranger, here thou seest the house    Which thou hast bid me show thee. Thou wilt find    The princes, nurslings of the gods, within,    Royally feasting. Enter, and fear not;    The bold man ever is the better man,    Although he come from far. Thou first of all    Wilt see the queen. Aretè is the name    The people give her. She is of a stock    The very same from which Alcinoüs    The king derives his lineage. For long since    Nausithoüs, its founder, was brought forth    To Neptune, the great Shaker of the shores,    By Peribaea, fairest of her sex,    And youngest daughter of Eurymedon,    The large of soul, who ruled the arrogant brood    Of giants, and beheld that guilty race    Cut off, and perished by a fate like theirs.    Her Neptune wooed; she bore to him a son,    Large-souled Nausithoüs, whom Phaeacia owned    Its sovereign. To Nausithoüs were born    Rhexenor and Alcinoüs. He who bears    The silver bow, Apollo, smote to death    Rhexenor, newly wedded, in his home.    He left no son, and but one daughter, named    Aretè; her Alcinoüs made his wife,    And honored her as nowhere else on earth    Is any woman honored who bears charge    Over a husband’s household. From their hearts    Her children pay her reverence, and the king    And all the people, for they look on her    As if she were a goddess. When she goes    Abroad into the streets, all welcome her    With acclamations. Never does she fail    In wise discernment, but decides disputes    Kindly and justly between man and man.    And if thou gain her favor, there is hope    That thou mayst see thy friends once more, and stand    In thy tall palace on thy native soil.”  

    The blue-eyed Pallas, having spoken thus,    Departed o’er the barren deep. She left    The pleasant isle of Scheria, and repaired    To Marathon and to the spacious streets    Of Athens, entering there the massive halls    Where dwelt Erectheus, while Ulysses toward    The gorgeous palace of Alcinoüs turned    His steps, yet stopped and pondered ere he crossed    The threshold. For on every side beneath    The lofty roof of that magnanimous king    A glory shone as of the sun or moon.    There from the threshold, on each side, were walls    Of brass that led towards the inner rooms,    With blue steel cornices. The doors within    The massive building were of gold, and posts    Of silver on the brazen threshold stood,    And silver was the lintel, and above    Its architrave was gold; and on each side    Stood gold and silver mastiffs, the rare work    Of Vulcan’s practised skill, placed there to guard    The house of great Alcinoüs, and endowed    With deathless life, that knows no touch of age.    Along the walls within, on either side,    And from the threshold to the inner rooms,    Were firmly planted thrones on which were laid    Delicate mantles, woven by the hands    Of women. The Phaeacian princes here    Were seated; here they ate and drank, and held    Perpetual banquet. Slender forms of boys    In gold upon the shapely altars stood,    With blazing torches in their hands to light    At eve the palace guests; while fifty maids    Waited within the halls, where some in querns    Ground small the yellow grain; some wove the web    Or twirled the spindle, sitting, with a quick    Light motion, like the aspen’s glancing leaves.    The well-wrought tissues glistened as with oil.    As far as the Phaeacian race excel    In guiding their swift galleys o’er the deep,    So far the women in their woven work    Surpass all others. Pallas gives them skill    In handiwork and beautiful design.    Without the palace-court, and near the gate,    A spacious garden of four acres lay.    A hedge enclosed it round, and lofty trees    Flourished in generous growth within﻿—the pear    And the pomegranate, and the apple-tree    With its fair fruitage, and the luscious fig    And olive always green. The fruit they bear    Falls not, nor ever fails in winter time    Nor summer, but is yielded all the year.    The ever-blowing west-wind causes some    To swell and some to ripen; pear succeeds    To pear; to apple apple, grape to grape,    Fig ripens after fig. A fruitful field    Of vines was planted near; in part it lay    Open and basking in the sun, which dried    The soil, and here men gathered in the grapes,    And there they trod the winepress. Farther on    Were grapes unripened yet, which just had cast    The flower, and others still which just began    To redden. At the garden’s furthest bound    Were beds of many plants that all the year    Bore flowers. There gushed two fountains: one of them    Ran wandering through the field; the other flowed    Beneath the threshold to the palace-court,    And all the people filled their vessels there.    Such were the blessings which the gracious gods    Bestowed on King Alcinoüs and his house.  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, standing there,    Admired the sight; and when he had beheld    The whole in silent wonderment, he crossed    The threshold quickly, entering the hall    Where the Phaeacian peers and princes poured    Wine from their goblets to the sleepless one,    The Argus-queller, to whose deity    They made the last libations when they thought    Of slumber. The great sufferer, concealed    In a thick mist, which Pallas raised and cast    Around him, hastened through the hall and came    Close to Aretè and Alcinoüs,    The royal pair. Then did Ulysses clasp    Aretè’s knees, when suddenly the cloud    Raised by the goddess vanished. All within    The palace were struck mute as they beheld    The man before them. Thus Ulysses prayed:﻿—  

    “Aretè, daughter of the godlike chief    Rhexenor! to thy husband I am come    And to thy knees, from many hardships borne,    And to these guests, to whom may the good gods    Grant to live happily, and to hand down,    Each one to his own children, in his home,    The wealth and honors which the people’s love    Bestowed upon him. Grant me, I entreat,    An escort, that I may behold again    And soon my own dear country. I have passed    Long years in sorrow, far from all I love.”  

    He ended, and sat down upon the hearth    Among the ashes, near the fire, and all    Were silent utterly. At length outspake    Echeneus, oldest and most eloquent chief    Of the Phaeacians; large his knowledge was    Of things long past. With generous intent,    And speaking to the assembly, he began:﻿—  

    “Alcinoüs, this is not a seemly sight﻿—    A stranger sitting on the hearth among    The cinders. All the others here await    Thy order, and move not. I pray thee, raise    The stranger up, and seat him on a throne    Studded with silver. Be thy heralds called,    And bid them mingle wine, which we may pour    To Jove, the god of thunders, who attends    And honors every suppliant. Let the dame    Who oversees the palace feast provide    Our guest a banquet from the stores within.”  

    This when the reverend king Alcinoüs heard,    Forthwith he took Ulysses by the hand﻿—    That man of wise devices﻿—raised him up    And seated him upon a shining throne,    From which he bade Laodamas arise,    His manly son, whose seat was next to his.  

    “Now mingle wine, Protonoüs, in a vase,    For all within the palace, to be poured    To Jove, the god of thunders, who attends    And honors every suppliant.” As he spake    Protonoüs mingled the delicious wines,    And passed from right to left, distributing    The cups to all; and when they all had poured    A part to Jove, and all had drunk their fill,    Alcinoüs took the word, and thus he said:﻿—  

    “Princes and chiefs of the Phaeacians, hear,    I speak as my heart bids me. Since the feast    Is over, take your rest within your homes.    Tomorrow shall the Senators be called    In larger concourse. We will pay our guest    Due honor in the palace, worshipping    The gods with solemn sacrifice. And then    Will we bethink us how to send him home,    That with no hindrance and no hardship borne    Under our escort he may come again    Gladly and quickly to his native land,    Though far away it lie, and that no wrong    Or loss may happen to him ere he set    Foot on its soil; and there must he endure    Whatever, when his mother brought him forth,    Fate and the unrelenting Sisters spun    For the newborn. But should he prove to be    One of the immortals who has come from heaven,    Then have the gods a different design.    For hitherto the gods have shown themselves    Visibly at our solemn hecatombs,    And sat with us, and feasted like ourselves,    And when the traveller meets with them alone,    They never hide themselves; for we to them    Are near of kin, as near as is the race    Of Cyclops and the savage giant brood.”  

    Ulysses the sagacious answered him:﻿—    “Nay, think not so, Alcinoüs. I am not    In form or aspect as the immortals are,    Whose habitation is the ample heaven.    But I am like whomever thou mayst know,    Among mankind, inured to suffering;    To them shouldst thou compare me. I could tell    Of bitterer sorrows yet, which I have borne;    Such was the pleasure of the gods. But now    Leave me, whatever have my hardships been,    To take the meal before me. Naught exceeds    The impatient stomach’s importunity    When even the afflicted and the sorrowful    Are forced to heed its call. So even now,    Midst all the sorrow that is in my heart,    It bids me eat and drink, and put aside    The thought of my misfortunes till itself    Be satiate. But, ye princes, with the dawn    Provide for me, in my calamity,    The means to reach again my native land.    For, after all my hardships, I would die    Willingly, could I look on my estates,    My servants, and my lofty halls once more.”  

    He ended; they approved his words, and bade    Set forward on his homeward way the guest    Who spake so wisely. When they all had made    Libations and had drunk, they each withdrew    To sleep at home, and left the noble chief    Ulysses in the palace, where with him    Aretè and her godlike husband sat,    While from the feast the maidens bore away    The chargers. The white-armed Aretè then    Began to speak; for when she cast her eyes    On the fair garments which Ulysses wore,    She knew the mantle and the tunic well,    Wrought by herself and her attendant maids,    And thus with winged words bespake the chief:﻿—  

    “Stranger, I first must ask thee who thou art,    And of what race of men. From whom hast thou    Received those garments? Sure thou dost not say    That thou art come from wandering o’er the sea.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:﻿—    “ ’Twere hard, O sovereign lady, to relate    In order all my sufferings, for the gods    Of heaven have made them many; yet will I    Tell all thou askest of me, and obey    Thy bidding. Far within the ocean lies    An island named Ogygia, where abides    Calypso, artful goddess, with bright locks,    Daughter of Atlas, and of dreaded power.    No god consorts with her, nor anyone    Of mortal birth. But me in my distress    Some god conveyed alone to her abode,    When, launching his white lightning, Jupiter    Had cloven in the midst of the black sea    My galley. There my gallant comrades all    Perished, but I in both my arms held fast    The keel of my good ship, and floated on    Nine days till, on the tenth, in the dark night,    The gods had brought me to Ogygia’s isle,    Where dwells Calypso of the radiant hair    And dreaded might, who kindly welcomed me,    And cherished me, and would have made my life    Immortal, and beyond the power of age    In all the coming time. And there I wore    Seven years away, still moistening with my tears    The ambrosial raiment which the goddess gave.    But when the eighth year had begun its round    She counselled my departure, whether Jove    Had so required, or she herself had changed    Her purpose. On a raft made strong with clamps    She placed me, sent on board an ample store    Of bread and pleasant wine, and made me put    Ambrosial garments on, and gave a soft    And favorable wind. For seventeen days    I held my steady course across the deep,    And on the eighteenth day the shadowy heights    Of your own isle appeared, and then my heart,    Ill-fated as I was, rejoiced. Yet still    Was I to struggle with calamities    Sent by earthshaking Neptune, who called up    The winds against me, and withstood my way,    And stirred the boundless ocean to its depths.    Nor did the billows surfer me to keep    My place, but swept me, groaning, from the raft,    Whose planks they scattered. Still I labored through    The billowy depth, and swam, till wind and wave    Drove me against your coast. As there I sought    To land, I found the surges hurrying me    Against huge rocks that lined the frightful shore,    But, turning back, I swam again and reached    A river and the landing-place I wished.    Smooth, without rocks, and sheltered from the wind.    I swooned, but soon revived. Ambrosial night    Came on. I left the Jove-descended stream    And slept among the thickets, drawing round    My limbs the withered leaves, while on my lids    A deity poured bounteously the balm    Of slumber. All night long, among the leaves,    I slept, with all that sorrow in my heart,    Till morn, till noon. Then as the sun went down    The balmy slumber left me, and I saw    Thy daughter’s handmaids sporting on the shore,    And her among them, goddess-like. To her    I came a suppliant, nor did she receive    My suit unkindly as a maid so young    Might do, for youth is foolish. She bestowed    Food and red wine abundantly, and gave,    When I had bathed, the garments I have on.    Thus is my tale of suffering truly told.”  

    And then Alcinoüs answered him and said:﻿—    “Stranger, one duty hath my child o’erlooked﻿—    To bid thee follow hither with her maids,    Since thou didst sue to her the first of all.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, thus replied:﻿—    “Blame not for that, O hero, I entreat,    Thy faultless daughter. She commanded me    To follow with her maids, but I refrained    For fear and awe of thee, lest, at the sight,    Thou mightest be displeased; for we are prone    To dark misgivings﻿—we, the sons of men.”    Again Alcinoüs spake: “The heart that beats    Within my bosom is not rashly moved    To wrath, and better is the temperate mood.    This must I say, O Father Jupiter,    And Pallas and Apollo! I could wish    That, being as thou art, and of like mind    With me, thou wouldst receive to be thy bride    My daughter, and be called my son-in-law,    And here abide. A palace I would give,    And riches, shouldst thou willingly remain.    Against thy will let no Phaeacian dare    To keep thee here. May Father Jove forbid!    And that thou mayst be sure of my intent,    I name tomorrow for thy voyage home.    Sleep in thy bed till then; and they shall row    O’er the calm sea thy galley, till thou come    To thine own land and home, or wheresoe’er    Thou wilt, though further off the coast should be    Than far Euboea, most remote of lands﻿—    So do the people of our isle declare,    Who saw it when they over sea conveyed    The fair-haired Rhadamanthus, on his way    To visit Tityus, son of Earth. They went    Thither, accomplishing with little toil    Their voyage in the compass of a day,    And brought the hero to our isle again.    Now shalt thou learn, and in thy heart confess,    How much our galleys and our youths excel    With bladed oars to stir the whirling brine”  

    So spake the king, and the great sufferer    Ulysses heard with gladness, and preferred    A prayer, and called on Jupiter and said:﻿—  

    “Grant, Father Jove, that all the king has said    May be fulfilled! so shall his praise go forth    Over the foodful earth, and never die,    And I shall see my native land again.”  

    So they conferred. White-armed Aretè spake,    And bade her maidens in the portico    Place couches, and upon them lay fair rugs    Of purple dye, and tapestry on these,    And for the outer covering shaggy cloaks.    Forth from the hall they issued, torch in hand;    And when with speed the ample bed was made,    They came and summoned thus the chief to rest:﻿—  

    “Rise, stranger, go to rest; thy bed is made.”    Thus spake the maidens, and the thought of sleep    Was welcome to Ulysses. So that night    On his deep couch the noble sufferer    Slumbered beneath the sounding portico.    Alcinoüs laid him down in a recess    Within his lofty palace, near to whom    The queen his consort graced the marriage-bed.  

            Book VIII  Festivals in Honor of Ulysses  

  A general council of the Phaeacians, in which it is determined to send Ulysses home to Ithaca﻿—A solemn feast﻿—Lay of the Trojan War, sung by Demodocus, the minstrel﻿—Public games﻿—Ulysses conquers in throwing the discus﻿—The amour of Mars and Venus sung by Demodocus﻿—His song of the Trojan horse and the fall of Troy.

      When Morn appeared, the rosy-fingered child    Of Dawn, Alcinoüs, mighty and revered,    Rose from his bed. Ulysses, noble chief,    Spoiler of cities, also left his couch.    Alcinoüs, mighty and revered, went forth    Before, and led him to the marketplace    Of the Phaeacians, built beside the fleet,    And there on polished stones they took their seats    Near to each other. Pallas, who now seemed    A herald of the wise Alcinoüs, went    Through all the city, planning how to send    Magnanimous Ulysses to his home,    And came and stood by every chief and said:﻿—  

    “Leaders and chiefs of the Phaeacians, come    Speedily to the marketplace, and there    Hear of the stranger who from wandering o’er    The deep has come where wise Alcinoüs holds    His court; in aspect he is like the gods.”  

    She spake, and every mind and heart was moved,    And all the marketplace and all its seats    Were quickly filled with people. Many gazed,    Admiring, on Laertes’ well-graced son;    For on his face and form had Pallas shed    A glory, and had made him seem more tall    And of an ampler bulk, that he might find    Favor with the Phaeacians, and be deemed    Worthy of awe and able to achieve    The many feats which the Phaeacian chiefs,    To try the stranger’s prowess, might propose.  

    And now when all the summoned had arrived,    Alcinoüs to the full assembly spake:﻿—  

    “Princes and chiefs of the Phaeacians, hear:    I speak the promptings of my heart. This guest﻿—    I know him not﻿—has come to my abode,    A wanderer﻿—haply from the tribes who dwell    In the far East, or haply from the West﻿—    And asked an escort and safe-conduct home;    And let us make them ready, as our wont    Has ever been. No stranger ever comes    Across my threshold who is suffered long    To pine for his departure. Let us draw    A dark-hulled ship down to the holy sea    On her first voyage. Let us choose her crew    Among the people, two-and-fifty youths    Of our best seamen. Then make fast the oars    Beside the benches, leave them there, and come    Into our palace and partake in haste    A feast which I will liberally spread    For all of you. This I command the youths;    But you, ye sceptred princes, come at once    To my fair palace, that we there may pay    The honors due our guest; let none refuse.    Call also the divine Demodocus,    The bard, on whom a deity bestowed    In ample measure the sweet gift of song,    Delightful when the spirit prompts the lay.”  

    He spake, and led the way; the sceptred train    Of princes followed him. The herald sought    Meantime the sacred bard. The chosen youths    Fifty-and-two betook them to the marge    Of the unfruitful sea; and when they reached    The ship and beach they drew the dark hull down    To the deep water, put the mast on board    And the ship’s sails, and fitted well the oars    Into the leathern rings, and, having moored    Their barque in the deep water, went with speed    To their wise monarch in his spacious halls.    There portico and court and hall were thronged    With people, young and old in multitude;    And there Alcinoüs sacrificed twelve sheep,    Eight white-toothed swine, and two splayfooted beeves.    And these they flayed, and duly dressed, and made    A noble banquet ready. Then appeared    The herald, leading the sweet singer in,    Him whom the Muse with an exceeding love    Had cherished, and had visited with good    And evil, quenched his eyesight and bestowed    Sweetness of song. Pontonoüs mid the guests    Placed for the bard a silver-studded throne,    Against a lofty column hung his harp    Above his head, and taught him how to find    And take it down. Near him the herald set    A basket and fair table, and a cup    Of wine, that he might drink when he desired;    Then all put forth their hands and shared the feast.  

    And when their thirst and hunger were allayed,    The Muse inspired the bard to sing the praise    Of heroes; ’twas a song whose fame had reached    To the high heaven, a story of the strife    Between Ulysses and Achilles, son    Of Peleus, wrangling at a solemn feast    Made for the gods. They strove with angry words,    And Agamemnon, king of men, rejoiced    To hear the noblest of the Achaian host    Contending; for all this had been foretold    To him in sacred Pythia by the voice    Of Phoebus, when the monarch to inquire    At the oracle had crossed the rock which formed    Its threshold. Then began the train of woes    Which at the will of sovereign Jupiter    Befell the sons of Ilium and of Greece.  

    So sang renowned Demodocus. Meanwhile    Ulysses took into his brawny hands    An ample veil of purple, drawing it    Around his head to hide his noble face,    Ashamed that the Phaeacians should behold    The tears that flowed so freely from his lids.    But when the sacred bard had ceased his song,    He wiped the tears away and laid the veil    Aside, and took a double beaker filled    With wine, and poured libations to the gods.    Yet when again the minstrel sang, and all    The chiefs of the Phaeacian people, charmed    To hear his music, bade the strain proceed,    Again Ulysses hid his face and wept.    No other eye beheld the tears he shed.    Alcinoüs only watched him, and perceived    His grief, and heard the sighs he drew, and spake    To the Phaeacians, lovers of the sea:﻿—  

    “Now that we all, to our content, have shared    The feast and heard the harp, whose notes so well    Suit with a liberal banquet, let us forth    And try our skill in games, that this our guest,    Returning to his country, may relate    How in the boxing and the wrestling match,    In leaping and in running, we excel.”  

    He spake, and went before; they followed him.    Then did the herald hang the clear-toned harp    Again on high, and taking by the hand    Demodocus, he led him from the place,    Guiding him in the way which just before    The princes of Phaeacia trod to see    The public games. Into the marketplace    They went; a vast innumerable crowd    Pressed after. Then did many a valiant youth    Arise﻿—Acroneus and Ocyalus,    Elatreus, Nauteus, Prymneus, after whom    Upstood Anchialus, and by his side    Eretmeus, Ponteus, Proreus, Thoön, rose;    Anabasineüs and Amphialus,    A son of Polyneius, Tecton’s son;    Then rose the son of Naubolus, like Mars    In warlike port, Euryalus by name,    And goodliest both in feature and in form    Of all Phaeacia’s sons save one alone,    Laodamas the faultless. Next three sons    Of King Alcinoüs rose: Laodamas,    Halius, and Clytoneius, like a god    In aspect. Some of these began the games,    Contending in the race. For them a course    Was marked from goal to goal. They darted forth    At once and swiftly, raising, as they ran,    The dust along the plain. The swiftest there    Was Clytoneius in the race. As far    As mules, in furrowing the fallow ground,    Gain on the steers, he ran before the rest,    And reached the crowd, and left them all behind.    Others in wrestling strove laboriously﻿—    And here Euryalus excelled them all;    But in the leap Amphialus was first;    Elatreus flung the quoit with firmest hand;    And in the boxer’s art Laodamas,    The monarch’s valiant son, was conqueror.  

    This when the admiring multitude had seen,    Thus spake the monarch’s son, Laodamas:﻿—  

    “And now, my friends, inquire we of our guest    If he has learned and practised feats like these.    For he is not ill-made in legs and thighs    And in both arms, in firmly planted neck    And strong-built frame; nor does he seem to lack    A certain youthful vigor, though impaired    By many hardships﻿—for I know of naught    That more severely tries the strongest man,    And breaks him down, than perils of the sea.”  

    Euryalus replied: “Laodamas,    Well hast thou said, and rightly: go thou now    And speak to him thyself, and challenge him.”  

    The son of King Alcinoüs, as he heard,    Came forward, and bespake Ulysses thus:﻿—  

    “Thou also, guest and father, try these feats,    If thou perchance wert trained to them. I think    Thou must be skilled in games, since there is not    A greater glory for a man while yet    He lives on earth than what he hath wrought out,    By strenuous effort, with his feet and hands.    Try, then, thy skill, and give no place to grief.    Not long will thy departure be delayed;    Thy barque is launched; the crew are ready here.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:﻿—    “Why press me, O Laodamas! to try    These feats, when all my thoughts are of my woes,    And not of games? I, who have borne so much    Of pain and toil, sit pining for my home    In your assembly, supplicating here    Your king and all the people of your land.”  

    Then spake Euryalus with chiding words:﻿—    “Stranger, I well perceive thou canst not boast,    As many others can, of skill in games;    But thou art one of those who dwell in ships    With many benches, rulers o’er a crew    Of sailors﻿—a mere trader looking out    For freight, and watching o’er the wares that form    The cargo. Thou hast doubtless gathered wealth    By rapine, and art surely no athlete.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, frowned and said:﻿—    “Stranger, thou speakest not becomingly,    But like a man who recks not what he says.    The gods bestow not equally on all    The gifts that men desire﻿—the grace of form,    The mind, the eloquence. One man to sight    Is undistinguished, but on him the gods    Bestow the power of words. All look on him    Gladly; he knows whereof he speaks; his speech    Is mild and modest; he is eminent    In all assemblies, and, whene’er he walks    The city, men regard him as a god.    Another in the form he wears is like    The immortals, yet has he no power to speak    Becoming words. So thou hast comely looks﻿—    A god would not have shaped thee otherwise    Than we behold thee﻿—yet thy wit is small,    And thy unmannerly words have angered me    Even to the heart. Not quite unskilled am I    In games, as thou dost idly talk, and once,    When I could trust my youth and my strong arms,    I think that in these contests I was deemed    Among the first. But I am now pressed down    With toil and sorrow; much have I endured    In wars with heroes and on stormy seas.    Yet even thus, a sufferer as I am,    Will I essay these feats; for sharp have been    Thy words, and they provoke me to the proof.”  

    He spake, and rising with his mantle on    He seized a broader, thicker, heavier quoit,    By no small odds, than the Phaeacians used,    And swinging it around with vigorous arm    He sent it forth; it sounded as it went;    And the Phaeacians, skilful with the oar    And sail, bent low as o’er them, from his hand,    Flew the swift stone beyond the other marks.    And Pallas, in a human form, set up    A mark where it descended, and exclaimed:﻿—  

    “Stranger! a blind man, groping here, could find    Thy mark full easily, since it is not    Among the many, but beyond them all.    Then fear thou nothing in this game at least;    For no Phaeacian here can throw the quoit    As far as thou, much less exceed thy cast.”  

    She spake; Ulysses the great sufferer    Heard, and rejoiced to know he had a friend    In that great circle. With a lighter heart    Thus said the chief to the Phaeacian crowd:﻿—  

    “Follow that cast, young men, and I will send    Another stone, at once, as far, perchance,    Or further still. If there are others yet    Who feel the wish, let them come forward here﻿—    For much your words have chafed me﻿—let them try    With me the boxing or the wrestling match,    Or footrace; there is naught that I refuse﻿—    Any of the Phaeacians. I except    Laodamas; he is my host, and who    Would enter such a contest with a friend?    A senseless, worthless man is he who seeks    A strife like this with one who shelters him    In a strange land; he mars the welcome given.    As for the rest, there is no rival here    Whom I reject or scorn; for I would know    Their prowess, and would try my own with theirs    Before you all. At any of the games    Practised among mankind I am not ill,    Whatever they may be. The polished bow    I well know how to handle. I should be    The first to strike a foe by arrows sent    Among a hostile squadron, though there stood    A crowd of fellow-warriors by my side    And also aimed their shafts. The only one    Whose skill in archery excelled my own,    When we Achaians drew the bow at Troy,    Was Philoctetes; to all other men    On earth that live by bread I hold myself    Superior. Yet I claim no rivalry    With men of ancient times﻿—with Hercules    And Eurytus the Oechalian, who defied    The immortals to a contest with the bow.    Therefore was mighty Eurytus cut off.    Apollo, angry to be challenged, slew    The hero. I can hurl a spear beyond    Where others send an arrow. All my fear    Is for my feet, so weakened have I been    Among the stormy waves with want of food    At sea, and thus my limbs have lost their strength.”  

    He ended here, and all the assembly sat    In silence; King Alcinoüs only spake:﻿—  

    “Stranger, since thou dost speak without offence,    And but to assert the prowess of thine arm,    Indignant that amid the public games    This man should rail at thee, and since thy wish    Is only that all others who can speak    Becomingly may not in time to come    Dispraise that prowess, now, then, heed my words,    And speak of them within thy palace halls    To other heroes when thou banquetest    Beside thy wife and children, and dost think    Of things that we excel in﻿—arts which Jove    Gives us, transmitted from our ancestors.    In boxing and in wrestling small renown    Have we, but we are swift of foot; we guide    Our galleys bravely o’er the deep; we take    Delight in feasts; we love the harp, the dance,    And change of raiment, the warm bath and bed.    Rise, then, Phaeacian masters of the dance,    And tread your measures, that our guest may tell    His friends at home how greatly we surpass    All other men in seamanship, the race,    The dance, the art of song. Go, one of you,    And bring Demodocus his clear-toned harp,    That somewhere in our palace has been left.”  

    Thus spake the godlike king. The herald rose    To bring the sweet harp from the royal house.    Then the nine umpires also rose, who ruled    The games; they smoothed the floor, and made the ring    Of gazers wider. Next the herald came,    And brought Demodocus the clear-toned harp.    The minstrel went into the midst, and there    Gathered the graceful dancers; they were youths    In life’s first bloom. With even steps they smote    The sacred floor. Ulysses, gazing, saw    The twinkle of their feet and was amazed.    The minstrel struck the chords and gracefully    Began the lay: he sang the loves of Mars    And Venus of the glittering crown, who first    Had met each other stealthily beneath    The roof of Vulcan. Mars with many gifts    Won her, and wronged her spouse, the King of Fire;    But from the Sun, who saw their guilt, there came    A messenger to Vulcan. When he heard    The unwelcome tidings, planning his revenge,    He hastened to his smithy, where he forged    Chains that no power might loosen or might break,    Made to hold fast forever. When the snare    In all its parts was finished, he repaired,    Angry with Mars, to where the marriage-bed    Stood in his chamber. To the posts he tied    The encircling chains on every side, and made    Fast to the ceiling many, like the threads    Spun by the spider, which no eye could see,    Not even of the gods, so artfully    He wrought them. Then, as soon as he had wrapped    The snare about the bed, he feigned to go    To Lemnos nobly built, most dear to him    Of all the lands. But Mars, the god who holds    The shining reins, had kept no careless watch,    And when he saw the great artificer    Depart he went with speed to Vulcan’s house,    Drawn thither by the love of her who wears    The glittering crown. There Cytherea sat,    Arrived that moment from a visit paid.    Entering, he took her by the hand and said:﻿—  

    “Come, my beloved, let us to the couch.    Vulcan is here no longer; he is gone,    And is among the Sintians, men who speak    A barbarous tongue, in Lemnos far away.”  

    He spake, and she approved his words, and both    Lay down upon the bed, when suddenly    The network, wrought by Vulcan’s skilful hand,    Caught them, and clasped them round, nor could they lift    Or move a limb, and saw that no escape    Was possible. And now approached the King    Of Fire, returning ere he reached the isle    Of Lemnos, for the Sun in his behalf    Kept watch and told him all. He hastened home    In bitterness of heart, but when he reached    The threshold stopped. A fury without bounds    Possessed him, and he shouted terribly,    And called aloud on all the gods of heaven:﻿—  

    “O Father Jove, and all ye blessed ones,    And deathless! Come, for here is what will move    Your laughter, yet is not to be endured.    Jove’s daughter, Venus, thus dishonors me,    Lame as I am, and loves the butcher Mars;    For he is well to look at, and is sound    Of foot, while I am weakly﻿—but for this    Are none but my two parents to be blamed,    Who never should have given me birth. Behold    Where lie embraced the lovers in my bed﻿—    A hateful sight. Yet they will hardly take    Even a short slumber there, though side by side,    Enamored as they are; nor will they both    Be drowsy very soon. The net and chains    Will hold them till her father shall restore    All the large gifts which, on our marriage-day,    I gave him to possess the impudent minx    His daughter, who is fair, indeed, but false.”  

    He spake, and to the brazen palace flocked    The gods; there Neptune came, who shakes the earth;    There came beneficent Hermes; there too came    Apollo, archer-god; the goddesses,    Through womanly reserve, remained at home.    Meantime the gods, the givers of all good,    Stood in the entrance; and as they beheld    The cunning snare of Vulcan, there arose    Infinite laughter from the blessed ones,    And one of them bespake his neighbor thus:﻿—  

    “Wrong prospers not; the slow o’ertakes the swift.    Vulcan the slow has trapped the fleetest god    Upon Olympus, Mars; though lame himself,    His net has taken the adulterer,    Who now must pay the forfeit of his crime.”  

    So talked they with each other. Then the son    Of Jove, Apollo, thus to Hermes said:﻿—  

    “Hermes, thou son and messenger of Jove,    And bountiful of gifts, couldst thou endure,    Fettered with such strong chains as these, to lie    Upon a couch with Venus at thy side?”  

    The herald-god, the Argus-queller, thus    Made answer: “Nay, I would that it were so,    O archer-king, Apollo; I could bear    Chains thrice as many, and of infinite strength,    And all the gods and all the goddesses    Might come to look upon me, I would keep    My place with golden Venus at my side.”  

    He spake, and all the immortals laughed to hear.    Neptune alone laughed not, but earnestly    Prayed Vulcan, the renowned artificer,    To set Mars free, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “Release thy prisoner. What thou dost require    I promise here﻿—that he shall make to thee    Due recompense in presence of the gods.”  

    Illustrious Vulcan answered: “Do not lay,    Earthshaking Neptune, this command on me,    Since little is the worth of pledges given    For worthless debtors. How could I demand    My right from thee among the assembled gods,    If Mars, set free, escape from debt and chains?”  

    Again the god who shakes the earth replied:﻿—    “Vulcan, though Mars deny the forfeit due,    And take to flight, it shall be paid by me.”  

    Again illustrious Vulcan said: “Thy word    I ought not and I seek not to decline.”  

    He spake, and then the might of Vulcan loosed    The net, and, freed from those strong fetters, both    The prisoners sprang away. Mars flew to Thrace,    And laughter-loving Venus to the isle    Of Cyprus, where at Paphos stand her grove    And perfumed altar. Here the Graces gave    The bath, anointed with ambrosial oil    Her limbs﻿—such oil as to the eternal gods    Lends a fresh beauty, and arrayed her last    In graceful robes, a marvel to behold.  

    So sang the famous bard, while inly pleased    Ulysses heard, and pleased were all the rest,    Phaeacia’s sons, expert with oar and sail.  

    Alcinoüs called his sons Laodamas    And Halius forth, and bade them dance alone,    For none of all the others equalled them.    Then taking a fair purple ball, the work    Of skilful Polybus, and, bending back,    One flung it toward the shadowy clouds on high,    The other springing upward easily    Grasped it before he touched the ground again.    And when they thus had tossed the ball awhile,    They danced upon the nourishing earth, and oft    Changed places with each other, while the youths,    That stood within the circle filled the air    With their applauses; mighty was the din.    Then great Ulysses to Alcinoüs said:﻿—    “O King Alcinoüs! mightiest of the race    For whom thou hast engaged that they excel    All others in the dance, what thou hast said    Is amply proved. I look and am amazed.”  

    Well pleased Alcinoüs the mighty heard,    And thus to his seafaring people spake:﻿—  

    “Leaders and chiefs of the Phaeacians, hear!    Wise seems the stranger. Haste we to bestow    Gifts that may well beseem his liberal hests.    Twelve honored princes in our land bear sway,    The thirteenth prince am I. Let each one bring    A well-bleached cloak, a tunic, and beside    Of precious gold a talent. Let them all    Be brought at once, that, having seen them here,    Our guest may with a cheerful heart partake    The evening meal. And let Euryalus,    Who spake but now so unbecomingly,    Appease him both with words and with a gift.”  

    He spake; they all approved, and each one sent    His herald with a charge to bring the gifts,    And thus Euryalus addressed the king:﻿—  

    “O King Alcinoüs, mightiest of our race,    I will obey thee, and will seek to appease    Our guest. This sword of brass will I bestow,    With hilt of silver, and an ivory sheath    New wrought, which he may deem a gift of price.”  

    He spake, and gave the silver-studded sword    Into his hand, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “Stranger and father, hail! If any word    That hath been uttered gave offence, may storms    Sweep it away forever. May the gods    Give thee to see thy wife again, and reach    Thy native land, where all thy sufferings    And this long absence from thy friends shall end!”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, thus replied:﻿—    “Hail also, friend! and may the gods confer    On thee all happiness, and may the time    Never arrive when thou shalt miss the sword    Placed in my hands with reconciling word!”  

    He spake, and slung the silver-studded sword    Upon his shoulders. Now the sun went down,    And the rich presents were already brought.    The noble heralds came and carried them    Into the palace of Alcinoüs, where    His blameless sons received and ranged them all    In fair array before the queenly dame    Their mother. Meantime had the mighty king    Alcinoüs to his palace led the way,    Where they who followed took the lofty seats,    And thus Alcinoüs to Aretè said:﻿—  

    “Bring now a coffer hither, fairly shaped,    The best we have, and lay a well-bleached cloak    And tunic in it; set upon the fire    A brazen caldron for our guest, to warm    The water of his bath, that having bathed    And viewed the gifts which the Phaeacian chiefs    Have brought him, ranged in order, he may sit    Delighted at the banquet and enjoy    The music. I will give this beautiful cup    Of gold, that he, in memory of me,    May daily in his palace pour to Jove    Libations, and to all the other gods.”    He spake; Aretè bade her maidens haste    To place an ample tripod on the fire.    Forthwith upon the blazing fire they set    A laver with three feet, and in it poured    Water, and heaped fresh fuel on the flames.    The flames crept up the vessel’s swelling sides,    And warmed the water. Meantime from her room    Aretè brought a beautiful chest, in which    She laid the presents destined for her guest﻿—    Garments and gold which the Phaeacians gave﻿—    And laid the cloak and tunic with the rest,    And thus in winged words addressed the chief:﻿—  

    “Look to the lid thyself, and cast a cord    Around it, lest, upon thy voyage home,    Thou suffer loss, when haply thou shalt take    A pleasant slumber in the dark-hulled ship.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, heard, and straight    He fitted to its place the lid, and wound    And knotted artfully around the chest    A cord, as queenly Circè long before    Had taught him. Then to call him to the bath    The housewife of the palace came. He saw    Gladly the steaming laver, for not oft    Had he been cared for thus, since he had left    The dwelling of the nymph with amber hair,    Calypso, though attended while with her    As if he were a god. Now when the maids    Had seen him bathed, and had anointed him    With oil, and put his sumptuous mantle on,    And tunic, forth he issued from the bath,    And came to those who sat before their wine.    Nausicaä, goddess-like in beauty, stood    Beside a pillar of that noble roof,    And looking on Ulysses as he passed,    Admired, and said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “Stranger, farewell, and in thy native land    Remember thou hast owed thy life to me.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answering said:﻿—    “Nausicaä, daughter of the large-souled king    Alcinoüs! so may Jove, the Thunderer,    Husband of Juno, grant that I behold    My home, returning safe, as I will make    To thee as to a goddess day by day    My prayer; for, lady, thou hast saved my life.”  

    He spake, and near Alcinoüs took his place    Upon a throne. And now they served the feast    To each, and mingled wine. A herald led    Thither the gentle bard Demodocus,    Whom all the people honored. Him they placed    Amidst the assembly, where he leaned against    A lofty column. Sage Ulysses then    Carved from the broad loin of a white-tusked boar    A part, where yet a mass of flesh remained    Bordered with fat, and to the herald said:﻿—  

    “Bear this, O herald, to Demodocus,    That he may eat. Him, even in my grief,    Will I embrace, for worthily the bards    Are honored and revered o’er all the earth    By every race of men. The Muse herself    Hath taught them song; she loves the minstrel tribe.”  

    He spake; the herald laid the flesh before    Demodocus the hero, who received    The gift well pleased. Then all the guests put forth    Their hands and shared the viands on the board;    And when their thirst and hunger were allayed,    Thus to the minstrel sage Ulysses spake:﻿—  

    “Demodocus, above all other men    I give thee praise, for either has the Muse,    Jove’s daughter, or Apollo, visited    And taught thee. Truly hast thou sung the fate    Of the Achaian warriors﻿—what they did    And suffered﻿—all their labors as if thou    Hadst been among them, or hadst heard the tale    From an eyewitness. Now, I pray, proceed,    And sing the invention of the wooden horse    Made by Epeius with Minerva’s aid,    And by the chief Ulysses artfully    Conveyed into the Trojan citadel,    With armed warriors in its womb to lay    The city waste. And I, if thou relate    The story rightly, will at once declare    To all that largely hath some bounteous god    Bestowed on thee the holy gift of song.”  

    He spake; the poet felt the inspiring god,    And sang, beginning where the Argives hurled    Firebrands among their tents, and sailed away    In their good galleys, save the band that sat    Beside renowned Ulysses in the horse,    Concealed from sight, amid the Trojan crowd,    Who now had drawn it to the citadel.    So there it stood, while, sitting round it, talked    The men of Troy, and wist not what to do.    By turns three counsels pleased them﻿—to hew down    The hollow trunk with the remorseless steel;    Or drag it to a height, and cast it thence    Headlong among the rocks; or, lastly, leave    The enormous image standing and unharmed,    An offering to appease the gods. And this    At last was done; for so had fate decreed    That they should be destroyed whene’er their town    Should hold within its walls the horse of wood,    In which the mightiest of the Argives came    Among the sons of Troy to smite and slay.    Then sang the bard how, issuing from the womb    Of that deceitful horse, the sons of Greece    Laid Ilium waste; how each in different ways    Ravaged the town, while, terrible as Mars,    Ulysses, joined with Menelaus, sought    The palace of Deiphobus, and there    Maintained a desperate battle, till the aid    Of mighty Pallas made the victory his.  

    So sang renowned Demodocus; the strain    Melted to tears Ulysses, from whose lids    They dropped and wet his cheeks. As when a wife    Weeps her beloved husband, slain before    His town and people, fighting to defend    Them and his own dear babes from deadly harm,    She sees him gasp and die, and at the sight    She falls with piercing cries upon his corpse,    Meantime the victors beat her on the back    And shoulders with their spears, and bear her off    To toil and grieve in slavery, where her cheeks    In that long bitter sorrow lose their bloom;    So from the eyelids of Ulysses fell    The tears, yet fell unnoticed by them all    Save that Alcinoüs, sitting at his side,    Saw them, and heard his heavy sighs, and thus    Bespake his people, masters of the oar:﻿—  

    “Princes and chiefs of the Phaeacian race,    Give ear. Let now Demodocus lay by    His clear-toned harp. The matter of his song    Delights not all alike. Since first we sat    At meat, and since our noble bard began    His lay, our guest has never ceased to grieve;    Some mighty sorrow weighs upon his heart.    Now let the bard refrain, that we may all    Enjoy the banquet, both our guest and we    Who welcome him, for it is fitting thus.    And now are all things for our worthy guest    Made ready, both the escort and these gifts,    The pledges of our kind regard. A guest,    A suppliant, is a brother, even to him    Who bears a heart not easy to be moved.    No longer, then, keep back with studied art    What I shall ask; ’twere better far to speak    With freedom. Tell the name thy mother gave,    Thy father, and all those who dwell within,    And round thy city. For no living man    Is nameless from the time that he is born.    Humble or high in station, at their birth    The parents give them names. Declare thy land,    Thy people, and thy city, that our ships    May learn, and bear thee to the place; for here    In our Phaeacian ships no pilots are,    Nor rudders, as in ships of other lands.    Ours know the thoughts and the intents of men.    To them all cities and all fertile coasts    Inhabited by men are known; they cross    The great sea scudding fast, involved in mist    And darkness, with no fear of perishing    Or meeting harm. I heard Nausithoüs,    My father, say that Neptune was displeased    With us for safely bearing to their homes    So many men, and that he would destroy    In after time some good Phaeacian ship,    Returning from a convoy, in the waves    Of the dark sea, and leave her planted there,    A mountain huge and high, before our town.    So did the aged chieftain prophesy;    The god, as best may please him, will fulfil    My father’s words, or leave them unfulfilled.    Now tell me truly whither thou hast roamed,    And what the tribes of men that thou hast seen;    Tell which of them are savage, rude, unjust,    And which are hospitable and revere    The blessed gods. Declare why thou didst weep    And sigh when hearing what unhappy fate    Befell the Argive and Achaian host    And town of Troy. The gods decreed it; they    Ordain destruction to the sons of men,    A theme of song thereafter. Hadst thou not    Some valiant kinsman who was slain at Troy?    A son-in-law? the father of thy wife?    Nearest of all are they to us, save those    Of our own blood. Or haply might it be    Some bosom-friend, one eminently graced    With all that wins our love; for not less dear    Than if he were a brother should we hold    The wise and gentle man who is our friend.”  

            Book IX  The Ciconians, Lotus-Eaters, and Cyclops  

  The adventures of Ulysses after the fall of Troy related by him at the request of Alcinoüs﻿—His attack on the Ciconians and the destruction of their city﻿—Rally and reinforcement of the Ciconians, who slaughter many of the companions of Ulysses﻿—The lotus-eaters, who subsist on flowers﻿—Arrival of Ulysses at the land of the cyclops﻿—Polyphemus and his barbarities﻿—Revenge of Ulysses, who puts out the single eye of Polyphemus and escapes.

      Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:﻿—    “O King Alcinoüs, most renowned of men!    A pleasant thing it is to hear a bard    Like this, endowed with such a voice, so like    The voices of the gods. Nor can I deem    Aught more delightful than the general joy    Of a whole people when the assembled guests    Seated in order in the royal halls    Are listening to the minstrel, while the board    Is spread with bread and meats, and from the jars    The cupbearer draws wine and fills the cups.    To me there is no more delightful sight.  

    “But now thy mind is moved to ask of me    The story of the sufferings I have borne,    And that will wake my grief anew. What first,    What next, shall I relate? what last of all?    For manifold are the misfortunes cast    Upon me by the immortals. Let me first    Declare my name, that ye may know, and I    Perchance, before my day of death shall come,    May be your host, though dwelling far away.    I am Ulysses, and my father’s name    Laertes; widely am I known to men    As quick in shrewd devices, and my fame    Hath reached to heaven. In sunny Ithaca    I dwell, where high Neritus, seen afar,    Rustles with woods. Around are many isles,    Well peopled, near each other. Samos there    Lies, with Dulichium, and Zacynthus dark    With forests. Ithaca, with its low shores,    Lies highest toward the setting sun; the rest    Are on the side where first the morning breaks.    A rugged region ’tis, but nourishes    Nobly its youths, nor have I ever seen    A sweeter spot on earth. Calypso late,    That glorious goddess, in her grotto long    Detained me from it, and desired that I    Should be her husband; in her royal home    Aeëan Circè, mistress of strange arts,    Detained me also, and desired that I    Should be her husband﻿—yet they could not move    The purpose of my heart. For there is naught    More sweet and dear than our own native land    And parents, though perchance our lot be cast    In a rich home, yet far from our own kin    And in a foreign land. Now let me speak    Of the calamitous voyage which the will    Of Jove ordained on my return from Troy.  

    “The wind that blew me from the Trojan shore    Bore me to the Ciconians, who abode    In Ismarus. I laid the city waste    And slew its dwellers, carried off their wives    And all their wealth and parted them among    My men, that none might want an equal share.    And then I warned them with all haste to leave    The region. Madmen! they obeyed me not.  

    “And there they drank much wine, and on the beach    Slew many sheep and many slow-paced steers    With crumpled horns. Then the Ciconians called    To their Ciconian neighbors, braver men    Than they, and more in number, whose abode    Was on the mainland, trained to fight from steeds,    Or, if need were, on foot. In swarms they came,    Thick as new leaves or morning flowers in spring.    Then fell on our unhappy company    An evil fate from Jove, and many griefs.    They formed their lines, and fought at our good ships,    Where man encountered man with brazen spears.    While yet ’twas morning, and the holy light    Of day waxed brighter, we withstood the assault    And kept our ground, although more numerous they.    But when the sun was sloping toward the west    The enemy prevailed; the Achaian band    Was routed, and was made to flee. That day    There perished from each galley of our fleet    Six valiant men; the rest escaped with life.  

    “Onward we sailed, lamenting bitterly    Our comrades slain, yet happy to escape    From death ourselves. Nor did we put to sea    In our good ships until we thrice had called    Aloud by name each one of our poor friends    Who fell in battle by Ciconian hands.    The Cloud-compeller, Jove, against us sent    The north-wind in a hurricane, and wrapped    The earth and heaven in clouds, and from the skies    Fell suddenly the night. With stooping masts    Our galleys scudded; the strong tempest split    And tore the sails; we drew and laid them down    Within the ships, in fear of utter wreck,    And toward the mainland eagerly we turned    The rudders. There we lay two days and nights,    Worn out with grief and hardship. When at length    The fair-haired Morning brought the third day round,    We raised the masts, and, spreading the white sails    To take the wind, we sat us down. The wind    Carried us forward with the pilot’s aid;    And then should I have reached my native land    Safely, had not the currents and the waves    Of ocean and the north-wind driven me back,    What time I strove to pass Maleia’s cape,    And swept me to Cytherae from my course.  

    “Still onward driven before those baleful winds    Across the fishy deep for nine whole days,    On the tenth day we reached the land where dwell    The Lotus-eaters, men whose food is flowers.    We landed on the mainland, and our crews    Near the fleet galleys took their evening meal.    And when we all had eaten and had drunk    I sent explorers forth﻿—two chosen men,    A herald was the third﻿—to learn what race    Of mortals nourished by the fruits of earth    Possessed the land. They went and found themselves    Among the Lotus-eaters soon, who used    No violence against their lives, but gave    Into their hands the lotus plant to taste.    Whoever tasted once of that sweet food    Wished not to see his native country more,    Nor give his friends the knowledge of his fate.    And then my messengers desired to dwell    Among the Lotus-eaters, and to feed    Upon the lotus, never to return.    By force I led them weeping to the fleet,    And bound them in the hollow ships beneath    The benches. Then I ordered all the rest    Of my beloved comrades to embark    In haste, lest, tasting of the lotus, they    Should think no more of home. All straightway went    On board, and on the benches took their place,    And smote the hoary ocean with their oars.  

    “Onward we sailed with sorrowing hearts, and reached    The country of the Cyclops, an untamed    And lawless race, who, trusting to the gods,    Plant not, nor plough the fields, but all things spring    For them untended﻿—barley, wheat, and vines    Yielding large clusters filled with wine, and nursed    By showers from Jove. No laws have they; they hold    No councils. On the mountain heights they dwell    In vaulted caves, where each one rules his wives    And children as he pleases; none give heed    To what the others do. Before the port    Of that Cyclopean land there is an isle,    Low-lying, neither near nor yet remote﻿—    A woodland region, where the wild goats breed    Innumerable; for the foot of man    Disturbs them not, and huntsmen toiling through    Thick woods, or wandering over mountain heights,    Enter not here. The fields are never grazed    By sheep, nor furrowed by the plough, but lie    Untilled, unsown, and uninhabited    By man, and only feed the bleating goats.    The Cyclops have no barques with crimson prows,    Nor shipwrights skilled to frame a galley’s deck    With benches for the rowers, and equipped    For any service, voyaging by turns    To all the cities, as is often done    By men who cross the deep from place to place,    And make a prosperous region of an isle.    No meagre soil is there; it well might bear    All fruits in their due time. Along the shore    Of the gray deep are meadows smooth and moist.    The vine would flourish long; the ploughman’s task    Is easy, and the husbandman would reap    Large harvests, for the mould is rich below.    And there is a safe haven, where no need    Of cable is; no anchor there is cast,    Nor hawsers fastened to the strand, but they    Who enter there remain until it please    The mariners, with favorable wind,    To put to sea again. A limpid stream    Flows from a fount beneath a hollow rock    Into that harbor at its further end,    And poplars grow around it. Thither went    Our fleet; some deity had guided us    Through the dark night, for nothing had we seen.    Thick was the gloom around our barques; the moon    Shone not in heaven, the clouds had quenched her light.    No eye discerned the isle, nor the long waves    That rolled against the shore, till our good ships    Touched land, and, disembarking there, we gave    Ourselves to sleep upon the waterside    And waited for the holy Morn to rise.  

    “And when at length the daughter of the Dawn,    The rosy-fingered Morn, appeared, we walked    Around the isle, admiring as we went.    Meanwhile the nymphs, the daughters of the God    Who bears the aegis, roused the mountain goats,    That so our crews might make their morning meal.    And straightway from our ships we took in hand    Our crooked bows and our long-bladed spears.  

    “ ‘Let all the rest of my beloved friends    Remain, while I, with my own barque and crew,    Go forth to learn what race of men are these,    Whether ill-mannered, savage, and unjust,    Or kind to guests and reverent toward the gods.’    “I spake, and, having ordered all my crew    To go on board and cast the hawsers loose,    Embarked on my own ship. They all obeyed,    And manned the benches, sitting there in rows,    And smote the hoary ocean with their oars.    But when we came upon that neighboring coast,    We saw upon its verge beside the sea    A cave high vaulted, overbrowed with shrubs    Of laurel. There much cattle lay at rest,    Both sheep and goats. Around it was a court,    A high enclosure of hewn stone, and pines    Tall stemmed, and towering oaks. Here dwelt a man    Of giant bulk, who by himself, alone,    Was wont to tend his flocks. He never held    Converse with others, but devised apart    His wicked deeds. A frightful prodigy    Was he, and like no man who lives by bread,    But more like a huge mountain summit, rough    With woods, that towers alone above the rest.  

    “Then, bidding all the others stay and guard    The ship, I chose among my bravest men    Twelve whom I took with me. I had on board    A goatskin of dark wine﻿—a pleasant sort,    Which Maron late, Evanthes’ son, a priest    Of Phoebus, guardian god of Ismarus,    Gave me, when, moved with reverence, we saved    Him and his children and his wife from death.    For his abode was in the thick-grown grove    Of Phoebus. Costly were the gifts he gave﻿—    Seven talents of wrought gold; a chalice all    Of silver; and he drew for me, besides,    Into twelve jars, a choice rich wine, unspoiled    By mixtures, and a beverage for gods.    No one within his dwellings, maids or men,    Knew of it, save the master and his wife,    And matron of the household. Whensoe’er    They drank this rich red wine, he only filled    A single cup with wine, and tempered that    With twenty more of water. From the cup    Arose a fragrance that might please the gods,    And hard it was to put the draught aside.    Of this I took a skin well filled, besides    Food in a hamper﻿—for my thoughtful mind    Misgave me, lest I should encounter one    Of formidable strength and savage mood,    And with no sense of justice or of right.  

    “Soon were we at the cave, but found not him    Within it; he was in the fertile meads,    Tending his flocks. We entered, wondering much    At all we saw. Around were baskets heaped    With cheeses; pens were thronged with lambs and kids,    Each in a separate fold; the elder ones,    The younger, and the newly yeaned, had each    Their place apart. The vessels swam with whey﻿—    Pails smoothly wrought, and buckets into which    He milked the cattle. My companions then    Begged me with many pressing words to take    Part of the cheeses, and, returning, drive    With speed to our good galley lambs and kids    From where they stabled, and set sail again    On the salt sea. I granted not their wish;    Far better if I had. ’Twas my intent    To see the owner of the flocks and prove    His hospitality. No pleasant sight    Was that to be for those with whom I came.  

    “And then we lit a fire, and sacrificed,    And ate the cheeses, and within the cave    Sat waiting, till from pasturing his flocks    He came; a heavy load of well-dried wood    He bore, to make a blaze at suppertime.    Without the den he flung his burden down    With such a crash that we in terror slunk    Into a corner of the cave. He drove    His well-fed flock, all those whose milk he drew,    Under that spacious vault of rock, but left    The males, both goats and rams, without the court.    And then he lifted a huge barrier up,    A mighty weight; not two-and-twenty wains,    Four-wheeled and strong, could move it from the ground:    Such was the enormous rock he raised, and placed    Against the entrance. Then he sat and milked    The ewes and bleating goats each one in turn,    And gave to each its young. Next, half the milk    He caused to curdle, and disposed the curd    In woven baskets; and the other half    He kept in bowls to be his evening drink.    His tasks all ended thus, he lit a fire,    And saw us where we lurked, and questioned us:﻿—  

    “ ‘Who are ye, strangers? Tell me whence ye came    Across the ocean. Are ye men of trade,    Or wanderers at will, like those who roam    The sea for plunder, and, with their own lives    In peril, carry death to distant shores?’  

    “He spake, and we who heard with sinking hearts    Trembled at that deep voice and frightful form,    And thus I answered: ‘We are Greeks who come    From Ilium, driven across the mighty deep    By changing winds, and while we sought our home    Have made a different voyage, and been forced    Upon another course; such was the will    Of Jupiter. We boast ourselves to be    Soldiers of Agamemnon, Atreus’ son,    Whose fame is now the greatest under heaven,    So mighty was the city which he sacked,    So many were the warriors whom he slew;    And now we come as suppliants to thy knees,    And ask thee to receive us as thy guests,    Or else bestow the gifts which custom makes    The stranger’s due. Great as thou art, revere    The gods; for suitors to thy grace are we,    And hospitable Jove, whose presence goes    With every worthy stranger, will avenge    Suppliants and strangers when they suffer wrong.’  

    “I spake, and savagely he answered me:﻿—    ‘Thou art a fool, O stranger, or art come    From some far country﻿—thou who biddest me    Fear or regard the gods. We little care﻿—    We Cyclops﻿—for the Aegis-bearer, Jove,    Or any other of the blessed gods;    We are their betters. Think not I would spare    Thee or thy comrades to avoid the wrath    Of Jupiter, unless it were my choice;    But say﻿—for I would know﻿—where hast thou left    Thy gallant barque in landing? was it near,    Or in some distant corner of the isle?’  

    “He spake to tempt me, but I well perceived    His craft, and answered with dissembling words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Neptune, who shakes the shores, hath wrecked my barque    On rocks that edge thine island, hurling it    Against the headland. From the open sea    The tempest swept it hitherward, and I,    With these, escaped the bitter doom of death.’  

    “I spake; the savage answered not, but sprang,    And, laying hands on my companions, seized    Two, whom he dashed like whelps against the ground.    Their brains flowed out, and weltered where they fell.    He hewed them limb from limb for his repast,    And, like a lion of the mountain wilds,    Devoured them as they were, and left no part﻿—    Entrails nor flesh nor marrowy bones. We wept    To see his cruelties, and raised our hands    To Jove, and hopeless misery filled our hearts.    And when the Cyclops now had filled himself,    Devouring human flesh, and drinking milk    Unmingled, in his cave he laid him down,    Stretched out amid his flocks. The thought arose    In my courageous heart to go to him,    And draw the trenchant sword upon my thigh,    And where the midriff joins the liver deal    A stroke to pierce his breast. A second thought    Restrained me﻿—that a miserable death    Would overtake us, since we had no power    To move the mighty rock which he had laid    At the high opening. So all night we grieved,    Waiting the holy Morn; and when at length    That rosy-fingered daughter of the Dawn    Appeared, the Cyclops lit a fire, and milked    His fair flock one by one, and brought their young    Each to its mother’s side. When he had thus    Performed his household tasks, he seized again    Two of our number for his morning meal.    These he devoured, and then he moved away    With ease the massive rock that closed the cave,    And, driving forth his well-fed flock, he laid    The massive barrier back, as one would fit    The lid upon a quiver. With loud noise    The Cyclops drove that well-fed flock afield,    While I was left to think of many a plan    To do him mischief and avenge our wrongs,    If haply Pallas should confer on me    That glory. To my mind, as I revolved    The plans, this seemed the wisest of them all.  

    “Beside the stalls there lay a massive club    Of olive-wood, yet green, which from its stock    The Cyclops hewed, that he might carry it    When seasoned. As it lay it seemed to us    The mast of some black galley, broad of beam,    With twenty oarsmen, built to carry freight    Across the mighty deep﻿—such was its length    And thickness. Standing by it, I cut off    A fathom’s length, and gave it to my men,    And bade them smooth its sides, and they obeyed    While I made sharp the smaller end, and brought    The point to hardness in the glowing fire;    And then I hid the weapon in a heap    Of litter, which lay thick about the cave.    I bade my comrades now decide by lot    Which of them all should dare, along with me,    To lift the stake, and with its point bore out    Our enemy’s eye, when softly wrapped in sleep.    The lot was cast, and fell on those whom most    I wished with me﻿—four men, and I the fifth.  

    “At eve the keeper of these fair-woolled flocks    Returned, and brought his well-fed sheep and goats    Into the spacious cavern, leaving none    Without it, whether through some doubt of us    Or through the ordering of some god. He raised    The massive rock again, and laid it close    Against the opening. Then he sat and milked    The ewes and bleating goats, each one in turn,    And gave to each her young. When he had thus    Performed his household tasks, he seized again    Two of our number for his evening meal.    Then drew I near, and bearing in my hand    A wooden cup of dark red wine I said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Take this, O Cyclops, after thy repast    Of human flesh, and drink, that thou mayst know    What liquor was concealed within our ship.    I brought it as an offering to thee,    For I had hope that thou wouldst pity us,    And send us home. Yet are thy cruelties    Beyond all limit. Wicked as thou art,    Hereafter who, of all the human race,    Will dare approach thee, guilty of such wrong?’  

    “As thus I spake, he took the cup and drank.    The luscious wine delighted mightily    His palate, and he asked a second draught.  

    “ ‘Give me to drink again, and generously,    And tell thy name, that I may make a gift    Such as becomes a host. The fertile land    In which the Cyclops dwell yields wine, ’tis true,    And the large grapes are nursed by rains from Jove,    But nectar and ambrosia are in this.’  

    “He spake; I gave him of the generous juice    Again, and thrice I filled and brought the cup,    And thrice the Cyclops in his folly drank.    But when I saw the wine begin to cloud    His senses, I bespake him blandly thus:﻿—  

    “ ‘Thou hast inquired, O Cyclops, by what name    Men know me. I will tell thee, but do thou    Bestow in turn some hospitable gift,    As thou hast promised. Noman is my name,    My father and my mother gave it me,    And Noman am I called by all my friends.’  

    “I ended, and he answered savagely:﻿—    ‘Noman shall be the last of all his band    Whom I will eat, the rest will I devour    Before him. Let that respite be my gift.’  

    “He spake, and, sinking backward at full length,    Lay on the ground, with his huge neck aside;    All-powerful sleep had overtaken him.    Then from his mouth came bits of human flesh    Mingled with wine, and from his drunken throat    Rejected noisily. I put the stake    Among the glowing coals to gather heat,    And uttered cheerful words, encouraging    My men, that none might fail me through their fears.    And when the olive-wood began to blaze﻿—    For though yet green it freely took the lire﻿—    I drew it from the embers. Round me stood    My comrades, whom some deity inspired    With calm, high courage. In their hands they took    And thrust into his eye the pointed bar,    While perched upon a higher stand than they    I twirled it round. As when a workman bores    Some timber of a ship, the men who stand    Below him with a strap, on either side    Twirl it, and round it spins unceasingly,    So, thrusting in his eye that pointed bar,    We made it turn. The blood came streaming forth    On the hot wood; the eyelids and the brow    Were scalded by the vapor, and the roots    Of the scorched eyeball crackled with the fire.    As when a smith, in forging axe or adze,    Plunges, to temper it, the hissing blade    Into cold water, strengthening thus the steel,    So hissed the eyeball of the Cyclops round    That olive stake. He raised a fearful howl;    The rocks rang with it, and we fled from him    In terror. Plucking from his eye the stake    All foul and dripping with the abundant blood,    He flung it madly from him with both hands.    Then called he to the Cyclops who in grots    Dwelt on that breezy height. They heard his voice    And came by various ways, and stood beside    The cave, and asked the occasion of his grief.  

    “ ‘What hurts thee, Polyphemus, that thou thus    Dost break our slumbers in the ambrosial night    With cries? Hath any of the sons of men    Driven off thy flocks in spite of thee, or tried    By treachery or force to take thy life?’  

    “Huge Polyphemus answered from his den:﻿—    ‘O friends! ’tis Noman who is killing me;    By treachery Noman kills me; none by force’  

    “Then thus with winged words they spake again:﻿—    ‘If no man does thee violence, and thou    Art quite alone, reflect that none escape    Diseases; they are sent by Jove. But make    Thy prayer to Father Neptune, ocean’s king.’  

    “So spake they and departed. In my heart    I laughed to think that by the name I took,    And by my shrewd device, I had deceived    The Cyclops. Meantime, groaning and in pain,    And groping with his hands, he moved away    The rock that barred the entrance. There he sat,    With arms outstretched, to seize whoever sought    To issue from the cavern with the flock,    So dull of thought he deemed me. Then I planned    How best to save my comrades and myself    From death. I framed a thousand stratagems    And arts﻿—for here was life at stake, and great    The danger was. At last I fixed on this.  

    “The rams were plump and beautiful, and large    With thick dark fleeces. These I silently    Bound to each other, three and three, with twigs    Of which that prodigy of lawless guilt,    The Cyclops, made his bed. The middle ram    Of every three conveyed a man; the two,    One on each side, were there to make him safe.    Thus each of us was borne by three; but I    Chose for myself the finest one of all,    And seized him by the back, and, slipping down    Beneath his shaggy belly, stretched myself    At length, and clung with resolute heart, and hands    That firmly clenched the rich abundant fleece.    Then sighed we for the holy Morn to rise.  

    “And when again the daughter of the Dawn,    The rosy-fingered Morn, looked forth, the males    Went forth to pasture, while the ewes remained    Within the stables, bleating, yet unmilked,    For heavy were their udders. Carefully    The master handled, though in grievous pain,    The back of everyone that rose and passed,    Yet, slow of thought, perceived not that my men    Were clinging hid beneath their woolly breasts.    As the last ram of all the flock went out,    His thick fleece heavy with my weight, and I    In agitated thought, he felt his back,    And thus the giant Polyphemus spake:﻿—  

    “ ‘My favorite ram, how art thou now the last    To leave the cave? It hath not been thy wont    To let the sheep go first, but thou didst come    Earliest to feed among the flowery grass,    Walking with stately strides, and thou wert first    At the fresh stream, and first at eve to seek    The stable; now thou art the last of all.    Grievest thou for thy master, who has lost    His eye, put out by a deceitful wretch    And his vile crew, who stupefied me first    With wine﻿—this Noman﻿—who, if right I deem,    Has not escaped from death. O, didst thou think    As I do, and hadst but the power of speech    To tell me where he hides from my strong arm,    Then should his brains, dashed out against the ground,    Be scattered here and there; then should my heart    Be somewhat lighter, even amid the woes    Which Noman, worthless wretch, has brought on me!’  

    “He spake, and sent him forth among the rest;    And when we were a little way beyond    The cavern and the court, I loosed my hold    Upon the animal and unbound my men.    Then quickly we surrounded and drove off,    Fat sheep and stately paced, a numerous flock,    And brought them to our ship, where joyfully    Our friends received us, though with grief and tears    For those who perished. Yet I suffered not    That they should weep, but, frowning, gave command    By signs to lift with speed the fair-woolled sheep    On board, and launch our ship on the salt sea.    They went on board, where each one took his place    Upon the benches, and with diligent oars    Smote the gray deep; and when we were as far    As one upon the shore could hear a shout,    Thus to the Cyclops tauntingly I called:﻿—    “ ‘Ha! Cyclops! those whom in thy rocky cave    Thou, in thy brutal fury, hast devoured,    Were friends of one not unexpert in war;    Amply have thy own guilty deeds returned    Upon thee. Cruel one! who didst not fear    To eat the strangers sheltered by thy roof,    Jove and the other gods avenge them thus.’  

    “I spake; the anger in his bosom raged    More fiercely. From a mountain peak he wrenched    Its summit, hurling it to fall beside    Our galley, where it almost touched the helm.    The rock dashed high the water where it fell,    And the returning billow swept us back    And toward the shore. I seized a long-stemmed pike    And pushed it from the shore, encouraging    The men to bend with vigor to their oars    And so escape. With nods I gave the sign.    Forward to vigorous strokes the oarsmen leaned    Till we were out at sea as far from land    As when I spake before, and then again    I shouted to the Cyclops, though my crew    Strove to prevent it with beseeching words,    And one man first and then another said:﻿—  

    “ ’O most unwise! why chafe that savage man    To fury﻿—him who just has cast his bolt    Into the sea, and forced us toward the land    Where we had well-nigh perished? Should he hear    A cry from us, or even a word of speech,    Then would he fling a rock to crush our heads    And wreck our ship, so fatal is his cast.’  

    “He spake, but moved not my courageous heart;    And then I spake again, and angrily:﻿—    “ ‘Cyclops, if any man of mortal birth    Note thine unseemly blindness, and inquire    The occasion, tell him that Laertes’ son,    Ulysses, the destroyer of walled towns,    Whose home is Ithaca, put out thine eye.’  

    “I spake; he answered with a wailing voice:﻿—    ‘Now, woe is me! the ancient oracles    Concerning me have come to pass. Here dwelt    A seer named Telemus Eurymides,    Great, good, and eminent in prophecy,    And prophesying he grew old among    The Cyclops. He foretold my coming fate﻿—    That I should lose my sight, and by the hand    And cunning of Ulysses. Yet I looked    For one of noble presence, mighty strength,    And giant stature landing on our coast.    Now a mere weakling, insignificant    And small of stature, has put out my eye,    First stupefying me with wine. Yet come    Hither, I pray, Ulysses, and receive    The hospitable gifts which are thy due;    And I will pray to Neptune, and entreat    The mighty god to guide thee safely home.    His son am I, and he declares himself    My father. He can heal me if he will,    And no one else of all the immortal gods    Or mortal men can give me back my sight.’  

    “He spake; I answered: ‘Rather would I take    Thy life and breath, and send thee to the abode    Of Hades, where thou wouldst be past the power    Of even Neptune to restore thine eye.’  

    “As thus I said, the Cyclops raised his hands,    And spread them toward the starry heaven, and thus    Prayed to the deity who rules the deep:﻿—  

    “ ‘Hear, dark-haired Neptune, who dost swathe the earth!    If I am thine, and thou dost own thyself    My father, grant that this Ulysses ne’er    May reach his native land! But if it be    The will of fate that he behold again    His friends, and enter his own palace-halls    In his own country, late and sorrowful    Be his return, with all his comrades lost,    And in a borrowed ship, and may he find    In his own home new griefs awaiting him.’  

    “He prayed, and Neptune hearkened to his prayer.    And then the Cyclops seized another stone,    Far larger than the last, and swung it round,    And cast it with vast strength. It fell behind    Our black-prowed galley, where it almost struck    The rudder’s end. The sea was dashed on high    Beneath the falling rock, and bore our ship    On toward the shore we sought. When we reached    The island where together in a fleet    Our other galleys lay, we found our friends    Sitting where they had waited long in grief.    We touched the shore and drew our galley up    On the smooth sand, and stepped upon the beach;    And taking from on board the sheep that formed    Part of the Cyclops’ flock, divided them,    That none might be without an equal share.    When all the rest were shared, my warrior friends    Decreed the ram to me. Of him I made    Upon the beach a sacrifice to Jove    The Cloud-compeller, Saturn’s son, whose rule    Is over all; to him I burned the thighs.    He heeded not the offering; even then    He planned the wreck of all my gallant ships,    And death of my dear comrades. All that day    Till set of sun we sat and feasted high    Upon the abundant meats and delicate wine.    But when the sun went down, and darkness crept    Over the earth, we slumbered on the shore;    And when again the daughter of the Dawn,    The rosy-fingered Morn, looked forth, I called    My men with cheerful words to climb the decks    And cast the hawsers loose. With speed they went    On board and manned the benches, took in hand    The oars and smote with them the hoary deep.    Onward in sadness, glad to have escaped,    We sailed, yet sorrowing for our comrades lost.”  

            Book X  Aeolus, the Lestrigonians, and Circè  

  Arrival of Ulysses at the land of Aeolus, who gives him the winds in a bag﻿—Folly of the seamen, who untie the bag while Ulysses is asleep﻿—A tempest﻿—Disastrous encounter with the gigantic laestrigons﻿—Arrival at the island of Circè﻿—Transformation of the Greeks to swine, and recovery of their former shape﻿—Preparations for a journey to the region of the dead.

      “We reached the Aeolian isle, where Aeolus,    Dear to the gods, a son of Hippotas,    Made his abode. It was a floating isle;    A wall of brass enclosed it, and smooth rocks    Edged it around. Twelve children in his halls    Were born, six daughters and six blooming sons;    He gave his daughters to his sons for wives.    And they with their dear father and his queen    Banquet from day to day, with endless change    Of meats before them. In his halls all day    The sound of pipes is in the perfumed air;    At night the youths beside their modest wives    Sleep on fair couches spread with tapestry.    So coming to his town and fair abode,    I found a friendly welcome. One full month    The monarch kept me with him, and inquired    Of all that might concern the fate of Troy,    The Argive fleet, and the return to Greece,    And just as it befell I told him all.    And when I spake to him of going thence,    And prayed him to dismiss me, he complied,    And helped to make us ready for the sea.    The bladder of a bullock nine years old    He gave, in which he had compressed and bound    The stormy winds of air; for Saturn’s son    Had given him empire o’er the winds, with power    To calm them or to rouse them at his will.    This in our roomy galley he made fast    With a bright chain of silver, that no breath    Of ruder air might blow. He only left    The west wind free to waft our ships and us    Upon our way. But that was not to be;    We perished by a folly of our own.  

    “Nine days we held our way, both day and night;    And now appeared in sight our native fields    On the tenth night, where on the shore we saw    Men kindling fires. Meantime a pleasant sleep    Had overcome my weary limbs, for long    Had I been guiding with incessant toil    The rudder, nor would trust it to the hand    Of any other, such was my desire    To reach our country by the shortest way.    Then talked my crew among themselves, and said    That I had brought with me from Aeolus,    The large-souled son of Hippotas, rich gifts    Of gold and silver. Standing side by side    And looking at each other, thus they said:﻿—  

    “ ‘How wonderfully is our chief revered    And loved by all men, wander where he will    Into what realm soever! From the coast    Of Troy he sailed with many precious things,    His share of spoil, while we, who with him went    And with him came, are empty-handed yet;    And now hath Aeolus, to show how much    He prizes him, bestowed the treasures here.    Come, let us see them; let us know how much    Of gold and silver is concealed in this.’  

    “Thus speaking to each other, they obeyed    The evil counsel. They untied the sack,    And straight the winds rushed forth and seized the ship,    And swept the crews, lamenting bitterly,    Far from their country out upon the deep;    And then I woke, and in my noble mind    Bethought me whether I should drop at once    Into the deep and perish, or remain    And silently endure and keep my place    Among the living. I remained, endured,    And covered with my mantle lay within    My galley, while the furious whirlwind bore    Back to the Aeolian isle our groaning crews.  

    “We landed on the coast, and to our barques    Brought water. Then my men prepared a meal    Beside the fleet; and having tasted food    And wine, I took a herald and a friend,    And, hastening to the sumptuous palace-halls    Of Aeolus, I found him with his wife    And children banqueting. We sat us down    Upon the threshold at the palace-doors,    And they were all astonished, and inquired:﻿—  

    “ ‘Why art thou here? What god thine enemy    Pursues thee, O Ulysses! whom we sent    So well prepared to reach thy native land,    Thy home, or any place that pleased thee most?’  

    “They spake, and sorrowfully I replied:﻿—    ‘The fault is all with my unthinking crew    And my own luckless slumber. Yet, my friends,    Repair the mischief, for ye have the power.’  

    “Thus with submissive words I spake, but they    Sat mute, the father only answered me:﻿—  

    “ ‘Hence with thee! Leave our island instantly,    Vilest of living men! It may not be    That I receive or aid as he departs    One who is hated by the blessed gods﻿—    And thou art hated by the gods. Away!’  

    “He spake, and sent us from the palace-door    Lamenting. Sorrowfully went we on.    And now with rowing hard and long﻿—the fruit    Of our own folly﻿—all our crews lost heart,    And every hope of safe return was gone.  

    “Six days and nights we sailed; the seventh we came    To lofty Laestrigoni with wide gates,    The city of Lamos, where, on going forth,    The shepherd calls to shepherd entering in.    There might a man who never yields to sleep    Earn double wages, first in pasturing herds,    And then in tending sheep; for there the fields    Grazed in the daytime are by others grazed    At night. We reached its noble haven, girt    By towering rocks that rise on every side,    And the bold shores run out to form its mouth﻿—    A narrow entrance. There the other crews    Stationed their barques, and moored them close beside    Each other, in that hill-encircled port.    No billow, even the smallest, rises there;    The water glimmers with perpetual calm.    I only kept my dark-hulled ship without,    And bound its cable to a jutting rock.  

    “I climbed a rugged headland, and looked forth.    No marks of tilth appeared, the work of men    Or oxen, only smokes that from below    Rose in the air. And then I sent forth scouts    To learn what race of men who live by bread    Inhabited the land. Two chosen men    I sent, a herald made the third; and these    Went inland by a level path, on which    The wains brought fuel from the woody heights    Into the city. On their way they met,    Before the town, a damsel with an ewer﻿—    The stately daughter of Antiphates,    The Laestrigonian, who was coming down    To where Artacia’s smoothly flowing fount    Gave water for the city. They drew near    And spake, and asked her who was sovereign there,    And who his people. Straight she pointed out    A lofty pile in which her father dwelt.    They entered that proud palace, and beheld,    Tall as a mountain peak, the monarch’s wife,    And shuddered at the sight. With eager haste    She called her husband, King Antiphates,    From council. With a murderous intent    He came, and, seizing one of my poor friends,    Devoured him, while the other two betook    Themselves to sudden flight and reached the ships.    And then he raised a fearful yell that rang    Through all the city. The strong Laestrigons    Rushed forth by thousands from all sides, more like    To giants than to common men. They hurled    Stones of enormous weight from cliffs above,    And cries of those who perished and the crash    Of shattered galleys rose. They speared our friends    Like fishes for their horrid feasts, and thus    Bore them away. While those within the port    Were slaughtered, drawing my good sword I cut    The hawsers fastened to my ship’s blue prow,    And cheered my men, and bade them fling themselves    Upon the oars, that so we might escape    Our threatened fate. They heard, and plied their oars    Like men who rowed for life. The galley shot    Forth from these beetling rocks into the sea    Full gladly; all the others perished there.  

    “Onward we sailed, with sorrow in our hearts    For our lost friends, though glad to be reprieved    From death. And now we landed at an isle﻿—    Aeaea, where the fair-haired Circè dwelt,    A goddess high in rank and skilled in song,    Own sister of the wise Aeaetes. Both    Were children of the source of light, the Sun,    And Persè, Ocean’s daughter, brought them forth.    We found a haven here, where ships might lie;    And guided by some deity we brought    Our galley silently against the shore,    And disembarked, and gave two days and nights    To rest, unmanned with hardship and with grief.  

    “When bright-haired Morning brought the third day round,    I took my spear and my good sword, and left    The ship, and climbed a height, in hope to spy    Some trace of human toil, or hear some voice.    On a steep precipice I stood, and saw    From the broad earth below a rising smoke,    Where midst the thickets and the forest-ground    Stood Circè’s palace. Seeing that dark smoke,    The thought arose within my mind that there    I should inquire. I pondered till at last    This seemed the wisest﻿—to return at once    To my good ship upon the ocean-side,    And give my crew their meal, and send them forth    To view the region. Coming to the spot    Where lay my well-oared barque, some pitying god    Beneath whose eye I wandered forth alone    Sent a huge stag into my very path,    High-horned, which from his pasture in the wood    Descended to the riverside to drink,    For grievously he felt the hot sun’s power.    Him as he ran I smote; the weapon pierced,    Just at the spine, the middle of his back.    The brazen blade passed through, and with a moon    He fell amid the dust, and yielded up    His life. I went to him, and set my foot    Against him, and plucked forth the brazen spear,    And left it leaning there. And then I broke    Lithe osiers from the shrubs, and twined of these    A rope, which, doubled, was an ell in length.    With that I tied the enormous creature’s feet,    And slung him on my neck, and brought him thus    To my black ship. I used the spear to prop    My steps, since he no longer could be borne    Upon the shoulder, aided by the hand,    Such was the animal’s bulk. I flung him down    Before the ship, encouraging my men    With cheerful words, and thus I said to each:﻿—  

    “ ‘My friends, we will not, wretched as we are,    Go down to Pluto’s realm before our time.    While food and wine are yet within the hold    Of our good galley, let us not forget    Our daily meals, and famine-stricken pine.’  

    “I spake; they all obeyed, and at my word    Came forth, and standing by the barren deep    Admired the stag, for he was huge of bulk;    And when their eyes were tired with wondering,    My people washed their hands, and soon had made    A noble banquet ready. All that day    Till set of sun we sat and feasted there    Upon the abundant meat and delicate wine;    And when the sun went down, and darkness came,    We slept upon the shore. But when the Morn,    The rosy-fingered child of Dawn, looked forth,    I called a council of my men and spake:﻿—  

    “ ‘Give ear, my friends, amid your sufferings,    To words that I shall say. We cannot here    Know which way lies the west, nor where the east,    Nor where the sun, that shines for all mankind,    Descends below the earth, nor where again    He rises from it. Yet will we consult,    If room there be for counsel﻿—which I doubt,    For when I climbed that height I overlooked    An isle surrounded by the boundless deep﻿—    An isle low lying. In the midst I saw    Smoke rising from a thicket of the wood.’  

    “I spake; their courage died within their hearts    As they remembered what Antiphates,    The Laestrigon, had done, and what foul deeds    The cannibal Cyclops, and they wept aloud.    Tears flowed abundantly, but tears were now    Of no avail to our unhappy band.  

    “Numbering my well-armed men, I made of them    Two equal parties, giving each its chief.    Myself commanded one; Eurylochus,    The hero, took the other in his charge.  

    “Then in a brazen helm we shook the lots;    The lot of brave Eurylochus leaped forth,    And he with two-and-twenty of our men    Went forward with quick steps, and yet in tears,    While we as sorrowful were left behind.  

    “They found the fair abode where Circè dwelt,    A palace of hewn stone within the vale,    Yet nobly seated. There were mountain wolves    And lions round it, which herself had tamed    With powerful drugs; yet these assaulted not    The visitors, but, wagging their long tails,    Stood on their hinder feet, and fawned on them,    Like mastiffs on their master when he comes    From banqueting and brings them food. So fawned    The strong-clawed wolves and lions on my men.    With fear my men beheld those beasts of prey,    Yet went, and, standing in the portico    Of the bright-haired divinity, they heard    Her sweet voice singing, as within she threw    The shuttle through the wide immortal web,    Such as is woven by the goddesses﻿—    Delicate, bright of hue, and beautiful.  

    “Polites then, a chief the most beloved    And most discreet of all my comrades, spake:﻿—  

    “ ‘Someone is here, my friends, who sweetly sings,    Weaving an ample web, and all the floor    Rings to her voice. Whoever she may be,    Woman or goddess, let us call to her.’  

    “He spake; aloud they called, and forth she came    And threw at once the shining doors apart,    And bade my comrades enter. Without thought    They followed her. Eurylochus alone    Remained without, for he suspected guile.    She led them in and seated them on thrones.    Then mingling for them Pramnian wine with cheese,    Meal, and fresh honey, and infusing drugs    Into the mixture﻿—drugs which made them lose    The memory of their home﻿—she handed them    The beverage and they drank. Then instantly    She touched them with a wand, and shut them up    In sties, transformed to swine in head and voice,    Bristles and shape, though still the human mind    Remained to them. Thus sorrowing they were driven    Into their cells, where Circè flung to them    Acorns of oak and ilex, and the fruit    Of cornel, such as nourish wallowing swine.  

    “Back came Eurylochus to our good ship    With news of our poor comrades and their fate,    He strove to speak, but could not; he was stunned    By that calamity; his eyes were filled    With tears, and his whole soul was given to grief.    We marvelled greatly; long we questioned him,    And thus he spake of our lost friends at last:﻿—  

    “ ‘Through yonder thickets, as thou gav’st command,    Illustrious chief! we went, until we reached    A stately palace of hewn stones, within    A vale, yet nobly seated. Someone there,    Goddess or woman, weaving busily    An ample web, sang sweetly as she wrought.    My comrades called aloud, and forth she came,    And threw at once the shining doors apart,    And bade us enter. Without thought the rest    Followed, while I alone, suspecting guile,    Remained without. My comrades, from that hour,    Were seen no more; not one of them again    Came forth, though long I sat and watched for them.’  

    “He spake; I slung my silver-studded sword    Upon my shoulders﻿—a huge blade of brass﻿—    And my bow with it, and commanded him    To lead the way. He seized and clasped my knees    With both his hands in attitude of prayer,    And sorrowfully said these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Take me not thither; force me not to go,    O foster-child of Jove! but leave me here;    For thou wilt not return, I know, nor yet    Deliver one of our lost friends. Our part    Is to betake ourselves to instant flight    With these who yet remain, and so escape.’  

    “He spake, and I replied: ‘Eurylochus,    Remain thou here, beside our roomy ship,    Eating and drinking. I shall surely go.    A strong necessity is laid on me.’  

    “I spake, and from the ship and shore went up    Into the isle; and when I found myself    Within that awful valley, and not far    From the great palace in which Circè dwelt,    The sorceress, there met me on my way    A youth; he seemed in manhood’s earJy prime,    When youth has most of grace. He took my hand    And held it, and, accosting me, began:﻿—  

    “ ‘Rash mortal! whither art thou wandering thus    Alone among the hills, where every place    Is strange to thee? Thy comrades are shut up    In Circè’s palace in close cells like swine.    Com’st thou to set them free? Nay, thou like them    Wilt rather find thyself constrained to stay.    Let me bestow the means to make thee safe    Against that mischief. Take this potent herb,    And bear it with thee to the palace-halls    Of Circè, and it shall avert from thee    The threatened evil. I will now reveal    The treacherous arts of Circè. She will bring    A mingled draught to thee, and drug the bowl,    But will not harm thee thus; the virtuous plant    I gave thee will prevent it. Hear yet more:    When she shall smite thee with her wand, draw forth    Thy good sword from thy thigh and rush at her    As if to take her life, and she will crouch    In fear, and will solicit thine embrace.    Refuse her not, that so she may release    Thy comrades, and may send thee also back    To thine own land; but first exact of her    The solemn oath which binds the blessed gods,    That she will meditate no other harm    To thee, nor strip thee of thy manly strength.’  

    “The Argus-queller spake, and plucked from earth    The potent plant and handed it to me,    And taught me all its powers. The root is black,    The blossom white as milk. Among the gods    Its name is Moly; hard it is for men    To dig it up; the gods find nothing hard.  

    “Back through the woody island Hermes went    Toward high Olympus, while I took my way    To Circè’s halls, yet with a beating heart.    There, as I stood beneath the portico    Of that bright-haired divinity, I called    Aloud; the goddess heard my voice and came,    And threw at once the shining doors apart,    And prayed me to come in. I followed her,    Yet grieving still. She led me in and gave    A seat upon a silver-studded throne,    Beautiful, nobly wrought, and placed beneath    A footstool, and prepared a mingled draught    Within a golden chalice, and infused    A drug with mischievous intent. She gave    The cup; I drank it off; the charm wrought not,    And then she smote me with her wand and said:﻿—    ‘Go to the sty, and with thy fellows sprawl.’  

    “She spake; but drawing forth the trusty sword    Upon my thigh, I rushed at her as if    To take her life. She shrieked and, stooping low,    Ran underneath my arm and clasped my knees,    And uttered piteously these winged words:﻿—    “ ‘Who art thou? of what race and of what land,    And who thy parents? I am wonder-struck    To see that thou couldst drink that magic juice    And yield not to its power. No living man,    Whoever he might be, that tasted once    Those drugs, or passed them o’er his lips, has yet    Withstood them. In thy breast a spirit dwells    Not to be thus subdued. Art thou not then    Ulysses, master of wise stratagems,    Whose coming hither, on his way from Troy,    In his black galley, oft has been foretold    By Hermes of the golden wand? But sheathe    Thy sword and share my couch, that, joined in love,    Each may hereafter trust the other’s faith.’  

    “She spake, and I replied: ‘How canst thou ask,    O Circè, that I gently deal with thee,    Since thou, in thine own palace, hast transformed    My friends to swine, and plottest even now    To keep me with thee, luring me to pass    Into thy chamber and to share thy couch,    That thou mayst strip me of my manly strength    I come not to thy couch till thou engage,    O goddess, by a solemn oath, that thou    Wilt never seek to do me further harm.’  

    “I spake; she straightway took the oath required,    And, after it was uttered and confirmed,    Up to her sumptuous couch I went. Meanwhile    Four diligent maidens ministered within    The palace﻿—servants of the household they,    Who had their birth from fountains and from groves,    And sacred rivers flowing to the sea.    One spread the thrones with gorgeous coverings;    Above was purple arras, and beneath    Were linen webs; another, setting forth    The silver tables just before the thrones,    Placed on them canisters of gold; a third    Mingled the rich wines in a silver bowl,    And placed the golden cups; and, last, the fourth    Brought water from the fountain, and beneath    A massive tripod kindled a great fire    And warmed the water. When it boiled within    The shining brass, she led me to the bath,    And washed me from the tripod. On my head    And shoulders pleasantly she shed the streams    That from my members took away the sense    Of weariness, unmanning body and mind.    And when she thus had bathed me and with oil    Anointed me, she put a princely cloak    And tunic on me, led me in, and showed    My seat﻿—a stately silver-studded throne,    High-wrought﻿—and placed a footstool for my feet.    Then came a handmaid with a golden ewer,    And from it poured pure water for my hands    Into a silver laver. Next she placed    A polished table near to me, on which    The matron of the palace laid the feast,    With many delicacies from her store,    And bade me eat. The banquet pleased me not.    My thoughts were elsewhere; dark imaginings    Were in my mind. When Circè marked my mood.    As in a gloomy revery I sat,    And put not forth my hands to touch the feast,    She came to me and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Why sittest thou like one who has no power    Of speech, Ulysses, wrapt in thoughts that gnaw    Thy heart, and tasting neither food nor wine?    Still dost thou dream of fraud? It is not well    That thou shouldst fear it longer, since I pledged    Myself against it with a mighty oath.’  

    “She spake, and I replied: ‘What man whose heart    Is faithful could endure to taste of food    Or wine till he should see his captive friends    Once more at large? If with a kind intent    Thou bidst me eat and drink, let me behold    With mine own eyes my dear companions free.’  

    “I spake; and Circè took her wand and went    Forth from her halls, and, opening the gate    That closed the sty, drove forth what seemed a herd    Of swine in their ninth year. They ranged themselves    Before her, and she went from each to each    And shed on them another drug. Forthwith    Fell from their limbs the bristles which had grown    All over them, when mighty Circè gave    At first the baleful potion. Now again    My friends were men, and younger than before,    And of a nobler mien and statelier growth.    They knew me all; and each one pressed my hand    In his, and there were tears and sobs of joy    That sounded through the palace. Circè too    Was moved, the mighty goddess; she drew near    And stood by me, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Ulysses! go to thy good ship beside    The sea and draw it up the beach, and hide    The goods and weapons in the caverns there,    And come thou back and bring with thee thy friends.’  

    “She spake, and easily my generous mind    Was moved by what she said. Forthwith I went    To my good ship beside the sea, and found    My friends in tears, lamenting bitterly.    As in some grange the calves come leaping round    A herd of kine returning to the stall    From grassy fields where they have grazed their fill,    Nor can the stall contain the young which spring    Around their mothers with continual bleat;    So when my comrades saw me through their tears,    They sprang to meet me, and their joy was such    As if they were in their own native land    And their own city, on the rugged coast    Of Ithaca, where they were born and reared;    And as they wept they spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘O foster-child of Jove! we welcome thee    On thy return with a delight as great    As if we all had reached again the land    That gave us birth, our Ithaca. And now    Tell by what death our other friends have died.’  

    “They spake; I answered with consoling words:﻿—    ‘First draw our galley up the beach, and hide    Our goods and all our weapons in the caves,    And then let all make haste to follow me,    And see our friends in Circè’s sacred halls,    Eating and drinking at the plenteous board.’  

    “I spake; and cheerfully my men obeyed,    Save that Eurylochus alone essayed    To hold them back, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Ah, whither are we going, wretched ones?    Are ye so eager for an evil fate,    That ye must go where Circè dwells, who waits    To turn us into lions, swine, or wolves,    Forced to remain and guard her spacious house?    So was it with the Cyclops, when our friends    Went with this daring chief to his abode,    And perished there through his foolhardiness.’  

    “He spake; and then I thought to draw my sword    From my stout thigh, and with the trenchant blade    Strike off his head and let it fall to earth,    Though he were my near kinsman; yet the rest    Restrained me, each one speaking kindly words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Nay, foster-child of Jove! if thou consent,    This man shall stay behind and with the ship,    And he shall guard the ship, but lead us thou    To where the sacred halls of Circè stand.’  

    “They spake, and from the ship and shore went up    Into the land, nor was Eurylochus    Left with the ship; he followed, for he feared    My terrible threat. Meantime had Circè bathed    My comrades at the palace, and with oil    Anointed them, and robed them in fair cloaks    And tunics. There we found them banqueting.    When they and those who came with me beheld    Each other, and the memory of the past    Came back to them, they wept abundantly,    And all the palace echoed with their sobs.    And then the mighty goddess came and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Prolong thou not these sorrows. Well I know    What ye have suffered on the fishy deep,    And all the evil that malignant men    Have done to you on land. Now take the food    Before you, drink the wine, till ye receive    Into your hearts the courage that was yours    When long ago ye left your fatherland,    The rugged Ithaca. Ye are unnerved    And spiritless with thinking constantly    On your long wanderings, and your minds allow    No space for mirth, for ye have suffered much.’  

    “She spake; her words persuaded easily    Our generous minds, and there from day to day    We lingered a full year, and banqueted    Nobly on plenteous meats and delicate wines.    But when the year was ended, and the hours    Renewed their circle, my beloved friends    From Circè’s palace called me forth and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Good chief, do not forget thy native land,    If fate indeed permit that ever thou    Return in safety to that lofty pile    Thy palace in the country of thy birth.’  

    “So spake they, and my generous mind was moved.    All that day long until the set of sun    We sat and feasted on the abundant meats    And delicate wines; and when the sun went down    They took their rest within the darkened halls,    While I to Circè’s sumptuous couch went up,    A suppliant at her knees. The goddess heard    My prayer, as thus in winged words I said:﻿—  

    “ ‘O Circè! make, I pray, the promise good    Which thou hast given, to send me to my home.    My heart is pining for it, and the hearts    Of all my friends, who weary out my life    Lamenting round me when thou art not nigh.’  

    “I spake; the mighty goddess thus replied:﻿—    ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Ulysses! ye must not remain with me    Unwillingly; but ye have yet to make    Another voyage, and must visit first    The abode of Pluto, and of Proserpine    His dreaded queen, and there consult the soul    Of the blind seer Tiresias﻿—him of Thebes﻿—    Whose intellect was spared; for Proserpine    Gave back to him in death the power of mind,    That only he might know of things to come.    The rest are shades that flit from place to place.’  

    “Thus spake the goddess; and my heart was wrung    With sorrow, and I sat upon the couch    And wept, nor could I longer wish to live    And see the light of day. But when my grief,    With shedding tears and tossing where I sat,    Was somewhat spent, I spake to Circè thus:﻿—  

    “ ‘O Circè, who will guide me when I make    This voyage? for no galley built by man    Has ever yet arrived at Pluto’s realm.’  

    “I spake; the mighty goddess answered me:﻿—    ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Take thou no thought of who shall guide thy barque,    But raise the mast and spread the glimmering sail,    And seat thyself, and let the north-wind waft    Thy galley on. As soon as thou shalt cross    Océanus, and come to the low shore    And groves of Proserpine, the lofty groups    Of poplars, and the willows that let fall    Their withered fruit, moor thou thy galley there    In the deep eddies of Océanus,    And pass to Pluto’s comfortless abode.    There into Acheron are poured the streams    Of Pyriphlegethon, and of that arm    Of Styx, Cocytus. At the place where meet    The ever-roaring waters stands a rock;    Draw near to that, and there I bid thee scoop    In earth a trench, a cubit long and wide.    And round about it pour to all the dead    Libations﻿—milk and honey first, and next    Rich wine, and lastly water, scattering    White meal upon them. Offer there thy prayer    Fervently to that troop of airy forms,    And make the vow that thou wilt sacrifice,    When thou at last shalt come to Ithaca,    A heifer without blemish, barren yet,    In thine own courts, and heap the altar-pyre    With things of price; and to the seer alone,    Tiresias, by himself, a ram whose fleece    Is wholly black, the best of all thy flocks.    And after thou hast duly offered prayer    To all the illustrious nations of the dead,    Then sacrifice a ram and a black ewe,    Their faces turned toward Erebus, but thine    The other way and toward the river streams.    Thither the souls of those who died will flock    In multitudes. Then call thy friends, and give    Command to flay in haste the sheep that lie    Slain by the cruel brass, and, burning there    The carcasses, pay worship to the gods﻿—    The powerful Pluto and dread Proserpine.    Draw then the sword upon thy thigh, and sit,    And suffer none of all those airy forms    To touch the blood until thou first bespeak    Tiresias. He will come, and speedily﻿—    The leader of the people﻿—and will tell    What voyage thou must make, what length of way    Thou yet must measure, and will show thee how    Thou mayst return across the fishy deep.’  

    “She spake; and while she spake the Morn looked forth    Upon her golden throne. The Nymph bestowed    On me a cloak and tunic, and arrayed    Herself in a white robe with ample folds﻿—    A delicate web and graceful. Round her loins    She clasped a shining zone of gold, and hung    A veil upon her forehead. Forth I went    Throughout the palace and aroused my friends,    And thus I said in cheerful tones to each:﻿—  

    “ ‘No longer give yourselves to idle rest    And pleasant slumber; we are to depart.    The gracious Circè counsels us to go.’  

    “I spake, and easily their generous minds    Inclined to me. Yet brought I not away    All my companions safely from the isle.    Elpenor was the youngest of our band,    Not brave in war was he, nor wise in thought.    He, overcome with wine, and for the sake    Of coolness, had lain down to sleep, apart    From all the rest, in Circè’s sacred house;    And as my friends bestirred themselves, the noise    And tumult roused him; he forgot to come    By the long staircase; headlong from the roof    He plunged; his neck was broken at the spine,    And his soul went to the abode of death.  

    “My friends came round me, and I said to them:﻿—    Haply your thought may be that you are bound    For the dear country of your birth; but know    That Circè sends us elsewhere, to consult    The Theban seer, Tiresias, in the abode    Of Pluto and the dreaded Proserpine.’  

    “I spake, and their hearts failed them as they heard;    They sat them down, and wept, and tore their hair,    But fruitless were their sorrow and their tears.  

    “Thus as we sadly moved to our good ship    Upon the seashore, weeping all the while,    Circè, meantime, had visited its deck,    And there had bound a ram and a black ewe    By means we saw not; for what eye discerns    The presence of a deity, who moves    From place to place, and wills not to be seen?”  

            Book XI  Visit of Ulysses to the Land of the Dead  

  Voyage to the land of the dead﻿—Interview with Tiresias, the seer﻿—The heroes and heroines whom Ulysses saw there﻿—Interview with his mother, and with Agamemnon, Achilles, and others﻿—Occupations of the dead﻿—Punishments of the guilty.

      “Now, when we reached our galley by the shore,    We drew it first into the mighty deep,    And set the mast and sails, and led on board    The sheep, and sorrowfully and in tears    Embarked ourselves. The fair-haired and august    Circè, expert in music, sent with us    A kindly fellow-voyager﻿—a wind    That breathed behind the dark-prowed barque, and swelled    The sails; and now, with all things in their place    Throughout the ship, we sat us down﻿—the breeze    And helmsman guiding us upon our way.    All day our sails were stretched, as o’er the deep    Our vessel ran; the sun went down; the paths    Of the great sea were darkened, and our barque    Reached the far confines of Océanus.  

    “There lies the land, and there the people dwell    Of the Cimmerians, in eternal cloud    And darkness. Never does the glorious sun    Look on them with his rays, when he goes up    Into the starry sky, nor when again    He sinks from heaven to earth. Unwholesome night    O’erhangs the wretched race. We touched the land,    And, drawing up our galley on the beach,    Took from on board the sheep, and followed on    Beside the ocean-stream until we reached    The place of which the goddess Circè spake.  

    “Here Perimedes and Eurylochus    Held in their grasp the victims, while I drew    The trusty sword upon my thigh, and scooped    A trench in earth, a cubit long and wide,    Round which we stood, and poured to all the dead    Libations﻿—milk and honey first, and next    Rich wine, and lastly water, scattering    White meal upon them. Then I offered prayer    Fervently to that troop of airy forms,    And made a vow that I would sacrifice,    When I at last should come to Ithaca,    A heifer without blemish, barren yet,    In my own courts, and heap the altar-pyre    With things of price, and to the seer alone,    Tiresias, by himself, a ram whose fleece    Was wholly black, the best of all my flocks.  

    “When I had worshipped thus with praver and vows    The nations of the dead, I took the sheep    And pierced their throats above the hollow trench.    The blood flowed dark; and thronging round me came    Souls of the dead from Erebus﻿—young wives    And maids unwedded, men worn out with years    And toil, and virgins of a tender age    In their new grief, and many a warrior slain    In battle, mangled by the spear, and clad    In bloody armor, who about the trench    Flitted on every side, now here, now there,    With gibbering cries, and I grew pale with fear.    Then calling to my friends, I bade them flay    The victims lying slaughtered by the knife,    And, burning them with fire, invoke the gods﻿—    The mighty Pluto and dread Proserpine.    Then from my thigh I drew the trusty sword,    And sat me down, and suffered none of all    Those airy phantoms to approach the blood    Until I should bespeak the Theban seer.  

    “And first the soul of my companion came,    Elpenor, for he was not buried yet    In earth’s broad bosom. We had left him dead    In Circè’s halls, unwept and unentombed.    We had another task. But when I now    Beheld I pitied him, and, shedding tears,    I said these winged words: ‘How earnest thou,    Elpenor, hither into these abodes    Of night and darkness? Thou hast made more speed,    Although on foot, than I in my good ship.’  

    “I spake; the phantom sobbed and answered me:﻿—    ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Ulysses! ’twas the evil doom decreed    By some divinity, and too much wine,    That wrought my death. I laid myself to sleep    In Circè’s palace, and, remembering not    The way to the long stairs that led below,    Fell from the roof, and by the fall my neck    Was broken at the spine; my soul went down    To Hades. I conjure thee now, by those    Whom thou hast left behind and far away,    Thy consort and thy father﻿—him by whom    Thou when a boy wert reared﻿—and by thy son    Telemachus, who in thy palace-halls    Is left alone﻿—for well I know that thou,    In going hence from Pluto’s realm, wilt moor    Thy gallant vessel in the Aeaean isle﻿—    That there, O king, thou wilt remember me,    And leave me not when thou departest thence    Unwept, unburied, lest I bring on thee    The anger of the gods. But burn me there    With all the armor that I wore, and pile,    Close to the hoary deep, a mound for me﻿—    A hapless man of whom posterity    Shall hear. Do this for me, and plant upright    Upon my tomb the oar with which I rowed,    While yet a living man, among thy friends.’  

    “He spake and I replied: ‘Unhappy youth,    All this I duly will perform for thee.’  

    “And then the soul of Anticleia came﻿—    My own dead mother, daughter of the king    Autolycus, large-minded. Her I left    Alive, what time I sailed for Troy, and now    I wept to see her there, and pitied her,    And yet forbade her, though with grief, to come    Near to the blood till I should first accost    Tiresias. He too came, the Theban seer,    Tiresias, bearing in his hand a wand    Of gold; he knew me and bespake me thus:﻿—  

    “ ‘Why, O unhappy mortal, hast thou left    The light of day to come among the dead    And to this joyless land? Go from the trench    And turn thy sword away, that I may drink    The blood, and speak the word of prophecy.’  

    “He spake; withdrawing from the trench, I thrust    Into its sheath my silver-studded sword,    And after drinking of the dark red blood    The blameless prophet turned to me and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Illustrious chief Ulysses, thy desire    Is for a happy passage to thy home,    Yet will a god withstand thee. Not unmarked    By Neptune shalt thou, as I deem, proceed    Upon thy voyage. He hath laid up wrath    Against thee in his heart, for that thy hand    Deprived his son of sight. Yet may ye still    Return, though after many hardships borne,    If thou but hold thy appetite in check,    And that of thy companions, when thou bring    Thy gallant barque to the Trinacrian isle,    Safe from the gloomy deep. There will ye find    The beeves and fading wethers of the Sun﻿—    The all-beholding and all-hearing Sun.    If these ye leave unharmed, and keep in mind    The thought of your return, ye may go back,    Though sufferers, to your home in Ithaca;    But if thou do them harm, the event will be    Destruction to thy ship and to its crew;    And thou, if thou escape it, wilt return    Late to thy country, all thy comrades lost,    And in a foreign barque, and thou shalt find    Wrong in thy household﻿—arrogant men who waste    Thy substance, wooers of thy noble wife,    And offering bridal gifts. On thy return    Thou shalt avenge thee of their violent deeds;    And when thou shalt have slain them in thy halls,    Whether by stratagem or by the sword    In open fight, then take a shapely oar    And journey on, until thou meet with men    Who have not known the sea nor eaten food    Seasoned with salt, nor ever have beheld    Galleys with crimson prows, nor shapely oars,    Which are the wings of ships. I will declare    A sign by which to know them, nor canst thou    Mistake it. When a traveller, meeting thee,    Shalt say that thou dost bear a winnowing-fan    Upon thy sturdy shoulder, stop and plant    Thy shapely oar upright in earth, and there    Pay to King Neptune solemn sacrifice﻿—    A ram, a bull, and from his herd of swine    A boar. And then returning to thy home,    See that thou offer hallowed hecatombs    To all the ever-living ones who dwell    In the broad heaven, to each in order due.    So at the last thy death shall come to thee    Far from the sea, and gently take thee off    In a serene old age that ends among    A happy people. I have told thee true.’  

    “He spake, and thus I answered him: ‘The gods,    Tiresias, have decreed as thou hast said.    But tell, and tell me truly﻿—I behold    The soul of my dead mother; there she sits    In silence by the blood, and will not deign    To look upon her son nor speak to him.    Instruct me, mighty prophet, by what means    To make my mother know me for her son.’  

    “I spake, and instantly the seer replied:﻿—    ‘Easily that is told; I give it thee    To bear in mind. Whoever of the dead    Thou sufferest to approach and drink the blood    Will speak the truth; those whom thou dost forbid    To taste the blood will silently withdraw.’  

    “The soul of King Tiresias, saying this,    Passed to the abode of Pluto; he had given    The oracle I asked. I waited still    Until my mother, drawing near again,    Drank the dark blood; she knew me suddenly,    And said in piteous tones these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘How didst thou come, my child, a living man,    Into this place of darkness? Difficult    It is for those who breathe the breath of life    To visit these abodes, through which are rolled    Great rivers, fearful floods﻿—the first of these    Océanus, whose waters none can cross    On foot, or save on board a trusty barque.    Hast thou come hither on thy way from Troy,    A weary wanderer with thy ship and friends?    And hast thou not been yet at Ithaca,    Nor in thine island palace seen thy wife?’  

    “She spake, I answered: ‘ ’Tis necessity,    Dear mother, that has brought me to the abode    Of Pluto, to consult the Theban seer,    Tiresias. Not to the Achaian coast    Have I returned, nor reached our country, yet    Continually I wander; everywhere    I meet misfortune﻿—even from the time    When, in the noble Agamemnon’s train,    I came to Ilium, famed for steeds, and made    War on its dwellers. Tell me now, I pray,    And truly, how it was that fate on thee    Brought the long sleep of death? by slow disease?    Or, stealing on thee, did the archer-queen,    Diana, slay thee with her silent shafts?    And tell me of my father, and the son    Left in my palace. Rests the sway I bore    On them, or has another taken it,    Since men believe I shall return no more?    And tell me of my wedded wife, her thoughts    And purposes, and whether she remains    Yet with my son. Is she the guardian still    Of my estates, or has the noblest chief    Of those Achaians led her thence a bride?’  

    “I spake; my reverend mother answered thus:﻿—    ‘Most certain is it that she sadly dwells    Still in thy palace. Weary days and nights    And tears are hers. No man has taken yet    Thy place as ruler, but Telemachus    Still has the charge of thy domain, and gives    The liberal feasts which it befits a prince    To give, for all invite him. In the fields    Thy father dwells, and never in the town    Is seen; nor beds nor cloaks has he, nor mats    Of rich device, but, all the winter through,    He sleeps where sleep the laborers, on the hearth,    Amid the dust, and wears a wretched garb;    And when the summer comes, or autumn days    Ripen the fruit, his bed is on the ground,    And made of leaves, that everywhere are shed    In the rich vineyards. There he lies and grieves,    And, cherishing his sorrow, mourns thy fate,    And keenly feels the miseries of age.    And thus I underwent my fate and died;    For not the goddess of the unerring bow    Stealing upon me smote me in thy halls    With silent arrows, nor did slow disease    Come o’er me, such as, wasting cruelly    The members, takes at last the life away;    But constant longing for thee, anxious thoughts    Of thee, and memory of thy gentleness,    Ulysses, made an end of my sweet life.’  

    “She spake; I longed to take into my arms    The soul of my dead mother. Thrice I tried,    Moved by a strong desire, and thrice the form    Passed through them like a shadow or a dream.    And then did the great sorrow in my heart    Grow sharper, and in winged words I said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Beloved mother, why wilt thou not keep    Thy place, that I may clasp thee, so that here,    In Pluto’s realm and in each other’s arms,    We each might in the other soothe the sense    Of misery? Hath mighty Proserpine    Sent but an empty shade to meet me here,    That I might only grieve and sigh the more?’  

    “I spake, and then my reverend mother said:﻿—    ‘Believe not that Jove’s daughter Proserpine    Deceives thee. ’Tis the lot of all our race    When they are dead. No more the sinews bind    The bones and flesh, when once from the white bones    The life departs. Then like a dream the soul    Flies off, and flits about from place to place.    But haste thou to the light again, and mark    What I have said, that thou in after days    Mayst tell it to thy wife on thy return.’  

    “Thus we conferred. Meantime the women came    Around me, moved by mighty Proserpine;    In throngs they gathered to the dark red blood.    Then, as I pondered how to question each,    This seemed the wisest﻿—from my sturdy thigh    I plucked the trenchant sword, and suffered not    All that were there to taste the blood at once;    So one by one they came, and each in turn    Declared her lineage. Thus I questioned all.  

    “Then saw I highborn Tyro first, who claimed    To be the daughter of that blameless man    Salmoneus, and who called herself the wife    Of Cretheus, son of Aeolus. She loved    Enipeus, hallowed river, fairest stream    Of all that flow on earth, and often walked    Beside its pleasant waters. He whose arms    Surround the islands, Neptune, once put on    The river’s form, and at its gulfy mouth    Met her; the purple waters stood upright    Around them like a wall, and formed an arch,    And hid the god and woman. There he loosed    The virgin zone of Tyro, shedding sleep    Upon her. Afterward he took her hand    And said: ‘Rejoice, O maiden, in our love,    For with the year’s return shalt thou bring forth    Illustrious sons; the embraces of the gods    Are not unfruitful. Rear them carefully.    And now return to thy abode, and watch    Thy words, and keep thy secret. Thou must know    That I am Neptune, he who shakes the earth.’  

    “He spake, and plunged into the billowy deep.    And she became a mother, and brought forth    Pelias and Neleus, valiant ministers    Of mighty Jupiter. On the broad lands    Of Iäolchos Pelias dwelt, and reared    Vast flocks of sheep, while Neleus made his home    In Pylos midst the sands. The queenly dame,    His mother, meanwhile brought forth other sons    To Cretheus﻿—Aeson first, and Pheres next,    And Amythaon, great in horsemanship.  

    “And after her I saw Antiopè,    The daughter of Asopus﻿—her who made    A boast that she had slumbered in the arms    Of Jove. Two sons she bore﻿—Amphion one,    The other Zethus﻿—and they founded Thebes    With its seven gates, and girt it round with towers;    For, valiant as they were, they could not dwell    Safely in that great town unfenced by towers.  

    “And after her I saw Amphitryon’s wife,    Alcmena, her who brought forth Hercules,    The dauntless hero of the lion-heart﻿—    For she had given herself into the arms    Of mighty Jupiter. I also saw    Megara there, a daughter of the house    Of laughty Creion. Her Amphitryon’s son,    Unamable in strength, had made his wife.  

    “The mother, too, of Oedipus I saw,    Beautiful Epicastè, who in life    Had done unwittingly a heinous deed﻿—    Had married her own son, who, having slain    Her father first, espoused her; but the gods    Published abroad the rumor of the crime.    He in the pleasant town of Thebes bore sway    O’er the Cadmeians; yet in misery    He lived, for so the offended gods ordained.    And she went down to Hades and the gates    That stand forever barred; for, wild with grief,    She slung a cord upon a lofty beam    And perished by it, leaving him to bear    Woes without measure, such as on a son    The furies of a mother might inflict.  

    “And there I saw the dame supremely fair,    Chloris, whom Neleus with large marriage-gifts    Wooed, and brought home a bride; the youngest she    Among the daughters of Iäsus’ son,    Amphion, ruler o’er Orchomenus,    The Minyeian town, and o’er the realm    Of Pylos. Three illustrious sons she bore    To Neleus﻿—Nestor, Chromius, and a chief    Of lofty bearing, Periclymenus.    She brought forth Pero also, marvellous    In beauty, wooed by all the region round;    but Neleus would bestow the maid on none    Save him who should drive off from Phylacè    The beeves, broad-fronted and with crooked horns,    Of valiant Iphicles﻿—a difficult task.    One man alone, a blameless prophet, dared    Attempt it; but he found himself withstood    By fate, and rigid fetters, and a force    Of rustic herdsmen. Months and days went by,    And the full year, led by the hours, came round.    The valiant Iphicles, who from the seer    Had heard the oracles explained, took off    The shackles, and the will of Jove was done.  

    “Then saw I Leda, wife of Tyndarus,    Who bore to Tyndarus two noble sons,    Castor the horseman, Pollux skilled to wield    The cestus. Both of them have still a place    Upon the fruitful earth; for Jupiter    Gave them such honor that they live by turns    Each one a day, and then are with the dead    Each one by turns; they rank among the gods.  

    “The wife of Aloëus next appeared,    Iphidameia, who, as she declared,    Had won the love of Neptune. She brought forth    Two short-lived sons﻿—one like a god in form,    Named Otus; and the other, far renowned,    Named Ephialtes. These the bounteous earth    Nourished to be the tallest of mankind,    And goodliest, save Orion. When the twain    Had seen but nine years of their life, they stood    In breadth of frame nine cubits, and in height    Nine fathoms. They against the living gods    Threatened to wage, upon the Olympian height,    Fierce and tumultuous battle, and to fling    Ossa upon Olympus, and to pile    Pelion, with all its growth of leafy woods,    On Ossa, that the heavens might thus be scaled.    And they, if they had reached their prime of youth,    Had made their menace good. The son of Jove    And amber-haired Latona took their lives    Ere yet beneath their temples sprang the down    And covered with its sprouting tufts the chin.  

    “Phaedra I saw, and Procris, and the child    Of the wise Minos, Ariadne, famed    For beauty, whom the hero Theseus once    From Crete to hallowed Athens’ fertile coast    Led, but possessed her not. Diana gave    Ear to the tale which Bacchus brought to her,    And in the isle of Dia slew the maid.  

    “And Maera I beheld, and Clymenè,    And Eriphylè, hateful in her guilt,    Who sold her husband for a price in gold.    But vainly might I think to name them all﻿—    The wives and daughters of heroic men    Whom I beheld﻿—for first the ambrosial night    Would wear away. And now for me the hour    Of sleep is come, at my good ship among    My friends, or haply here. Meantime the care    For my return is with the gods and you.”  

    He spake, and all were silent: all within    The shadows of those palace-halls were held    Motionless by the charm of what he said.    And thus the white-armed Queen Aretè spake:﻿—  

    “Phaeacians, how appears this man to you    In form, in stature, and well-judging mind?    My guest he is, but each among you shares    The honor of the occasion. Now, I pray,    Dismiss him not in haste, nor sparingly    Bestow your gifts on one in so much need;    For in your dwellings is much wealth, bestowed    Upon you by the bounty of the gods.”  

    Then also Echeneüs, aged chief,    The oldest man of the Phaeacians, spake:﻿—  

    “My friends, the word of our sagacious queen    Errs not, nor is ill-timed, and yours it is    To hearken and obey: but all depends    Upon Alcinoüs﻿—both the word and deed.”  

    And then in turn Alcinoüs spake: “That word    Shall be fulfilled, if I am ruler here    O’er the Phaeacians, skilled in seamanship.    But let the stranger, though he long for home,    Bear to remain till morning, that his store    Of gifts may be complete. To send him home    Shall be the charge of all, but mostly mine,    Since mine it is to hold the sovereign power.”  

    And then the wise Ulysses said: “O King    Alcinoüs, eminent o’er all thy race!    Shouldst thou command me to remain with thee    Even for a twelvemonth, and at length provide    For my return, and give me princely gifts,    Even that would please me; for with fuller hands,    The happier were my lot on my return    To my own land. I should be honored then,    And meet a kinder welcome there from all    Who see me in my Ithaca once more.”  

    And then again in turn Alcinoüs spake:﻿—    “Ulysses, when we look on thee, we feel    No fear that thou art false, or one of those,    The many, whom the dark earth nourishes,    Wandering at large, and forging lies, that we    May not suspect them. Thou hast grace of speech    And noble thoughts, and fitly hast thou told,    Even as a minstrel might, the history    Of all thy Argive brethren and thy own.    Now say, and frankly, didst thou also see    Any of those heroic men who went    With thee to Troy, and in that region met    Their fate? A night immeasurably long    Is yet before us. Let us have thy tale    Of wonders. I could listen till the break    Of hallowed morning, if thou canst endure    So long to speak of hardships thou hast borne.”  

    He spake, and wise Ulysses answered thus:﻿—    “O King Alcinoüs, eminent beyond    All others of thy people. For discourse    There is a time; there is a time for sleep.    If more thou yet wouldst hear, I will not spare    To give the story of the greater woes    Of my companions, who were afterward    Cut off from life; and though they had escaped    The cruel Trojan war, on their return    They perished by a woman’s fraud and guilt.  

    “When chaste Proserpina had made the ghosts    Of women scatter right and left, there came    The soul of Agamemnon, Atreus’ son.    He came attended by a throng of those    Who in the palace of Aegisthus met    A fate like his and died. When he had drunk    The dark red blood, he knew me at a look,    And wailed aloud, and, bursting into tears,    Stretched out his hands to touch me; but no power    Was there of grasp or pressure, such as once    Dwelt in those active limbs. I could not help    But weep at sight of him, for from my heart    I pitied him, and spake these winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Most glorious son of Atreus, king of men!    How, Agamemnon, has the fate that brings    To man the everlasting sleep of death    O’ertaken thee? Did Neptune, calling up    The winds in all their fury, make thy fleet    A wreck, or did thine enemies on land    Smite thee, as thou wert driving off their beeves    And their fair flocks, or fighting to defend    Some city, and the helpless women there?’  

    “I spake, and Agamemnon thus replied:﻿—    ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    ’Twas not that Neptune calling up the winds    In all their fury wrecked me in my fleet,    Nor hostile warriors smote me on the land,    But that Aegisthus, bent upon my death,    Plotted against me with my guilty wife,    And bade me to his house and slew me there,    Even at the banquet, as a hind might slay    A bullock at the stall. With me they slew    My comrades, as a herd of white-toothed swine    Are slaughtered for some man of large estates,    Who makes a wedding or a solemn feast.    Thou hast seen many perish by the sword    In the hard battle, one by one, and yet    Thou wouldst have pitied us, hadst thou beheld    The slain beside the wine-jar, and beneath    The loaded tables, while the pavement swam    With blood. I heard Cassandra’s piteous cry,    The cry of Priam’s daughter, stricken down    By treacherous Clytemnestra at my side.    And there I lay, and, dying, raised my hands    To grasp my sword. The shameless woman went    Her way, nor stayed to close my eyes, nor press    My mouth into its place, although my soul    Was on its way to Hades. There is naught    That lives more horrible, more lost to shame,    Than is the woman who has brought her mind    To compass deeds like these﻿—the wretch who plans    So foul a crime﻿—the murder of the man    Whom she a virgin wedded. I had looked    For a warm welcome from my children here,    And all my household in my ancient home.    This woman, deep in wickedness, hath brought    Disgrace upon herself and all her sex,    Even those who give their thoughts to doing good.’  

    “He spake, and I replied: ‘O, how the God    Who wields the thunder, Jupiter, must hate    The house of Atreus for the women’s sake!    At first we fell by myriads in the cause    Of Helen; Clytemnestra now hath planned    This guile against thee while thou wert afar.’  

    “I spake, and instantly his answer came:﻿—    ‘Therefore be not compliant to thy wife,    Nor let her hear from thee whatever lies    Within thy knowledge. Tell her but a part,    And keep the rest concealed. Yet is thy life,    Ulysses, in no danger from thy spouse;    For wise and well instructed in the rules    Of virtuous conduct is Penelope,    The daughter of Icarius. When we went    To war, we left her a young bride; a babe    Was at her breast, a boy, who now must sit    Among grown men; and fortunate is he,    For certainly his father will behold    The youth on his return, and he embrace    His father, as is meet. But as for me,    My consort suffered not my eyes to feed    Upon the sight of my own son; for first    She slew me. This, then, I admonish thee﻿—    Heed thou my words. Bring not thy ship to land    Openly in thy country, but by stealth,    Since now no longer can we put our trust    In woman. Meantime, tell me of my son,    And faithfully, if thou hast heard of him    As living, whether in Orchomenus,    Or sandy Pylos, or in the broad realm    Of Menelaus, Sparta; for not yet    Has my Orestes passed from earth and life.’  

    ” He spake, and I replied: ‘Why ask of me    That question, O Atrides? I know not    Whether thy son be living or be dead,    And this is not a time for idle words.’  

    “Thus in sad talk we stood, and freely flowed    Our tears. Meanwhile the ghosts of Peleus’ son    Achilles, and Patroclus, excellent    Antilochus, and Ajax, all drew near﻿—    Ajax for form and stature eminent    O’er all the Greeks save Peleus’ faultless son.    Then did the soul of fleet Aeacides    Know me, and thus in winged words he said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Ulysses! what hath moved thee to attempt    This greatest of thy labors? How is it    That thou hast found the courage to descend    To Hades, where the dead, the bodiless forms    Of those whose work is done on earth, abide?’  

    “He spake; I answered: ‘Greatest of the Greeks!    Achilles, son of Peleus! ’Twas to hear    The counsel of Tiresias that I came,    If haply he might tell me by what means    To reach my rugged Ithaca again;    For yet have I not trod my native coast,    Nor even have drawn nigh to Greece. I meet    Misfortunes everywhere. But as for thee,    Achilles, no man lived before thy time,    Nor will hereafter live, more fortunate    Than thou﻿—for while alive we honored thee    As if thou wert a god, and now again    In these abodes thou rulest o’er the dead;    Therefore, Achilles, shouldst thou not be sad.’  

    “I spake; Achilles quickly answered me:﻿—    ‘Noble Ulysses, speak not thus of death,    As if thou couldst console me. I would be    A laborer on earth, and serve for hire    Some man of mean estate, who makes scant cheer,    Rather than reign o’er all who have gone down    To death. Speak rather of my noble son,    Whether or not he yet has joined the wars    To fight among the foremost of the host.    And tell me also if thou aught hast heard    Of blameless Peleus﻿—whether he be yet    Honored among his many Myrmidons,    Or do they hold him now in small esteem    In Hellas and in Phthia, since old age    Unnerves his hands and feet, and I no more    Am there, beneath the sun, to give him aid,    Strong as I was on the wide plain of Troy,    When warring for the Achaian cause I smote    That valiant people. Could I come again,    But for a moment, with my former strength,    Into my father’s palace, I would make    That strength and these unconquerable hands    A terror to the men who do him wrong,    And rob him of the honor due a king.’  

    “He spake; I answered: ‘Nothing have I heard    Of blameless Peleus, but I will relate    The truth concerning Neoptolemus,    Thy son, as thou requirest. Him I took    From Scyros in a gallant barque to join    The well-armed Greeks. Know, then, that when we sat    In council, planning to conduct the war    Against the city of Troy, he always rose    The first to speak, nor were his words unwise.    The godlike Nestor and myself alone    Rivalled him in debate. And when we fought    About the city walls, he loitered not    Among the others in the numerous host,    But hastened on before them, giving place    To no man there in valor. Many men    He slew in desperate combat, whom to name    Were past my power, so many were they all    Whom in the cause of Greece he struck to earth.    Yet one I name, Eurypylus, the son    Of Telephus, who perished by his sword    With many of his band, Citeians, led    To war because of liberal gifts bestowed    Upon their chieftain’s wife; the noblest he    Of men, in form, whom I have ever seen,    Save Memnon. When into the wooden steed,    Framed by Epeius, we the chiefs of Greece    Ascended, and to me was given the charge    Of all things there, to open and to shut    The close-built fraud, while others of high rank    Among the Greeks were wiping off their tears,    And their limbs shook, I never saw thy son    Turn pale in his fine face, or brush away    A tear, but he besought me earnestly    That he might leave our hiding-place, and grasped    His falchion’s hilt, and lifted up his spear    Heavy with brass, for in his mind he smote    The Trojan crowd already. When at last    We had o’erthrown and sacked the lofty town    Of Priam, he embarked upon a ship,    With all his share of spoil﻿—a large reward﻿—    Unhurt, not touched in combat hand to hand,    Nor wounded from afar, as oftentimes    Must be the fortune of a fight, for Mars    Is wont to rage without regard to men.’  

    “I spake. The soul of swift Aeacides    Over the meadows thick with asphodel    Departed with long strides, well pleased to hear    From me the story of his son’s renown.  

    “The other ghosts of those who lay in death    Stood sorrowing by, and each one told his griefs;    But that of Ajax, son of Telamon,    Kept far aloof, displeased that I had won    The victory contending at the fleet    Which should possess the arms of Peleus’ son.    His goddess-mother laid them as a prize    Before us, and the captive sons of Troy    And Pallas were the umpires to award    The victory. And now how much I wish    I had not conquered in a strife like that,    Since for that cause the dark earth hath received    The hero Ajax, who in nobleness    Of form and greatness of exploits excelled    All other Greeks, except the blameless son    Of Peleus. Then I spake in soothing words:﻿—  

    “ ‘O Ajax, son of blameless Telamon!    Wilt thou not even in death forget the wrath    Caused by the strife for those accursed arms?    The gods have made them fatal to the Greeks,    For thou, the bulwark of our host, didst fall,    And we lamented thee as bitterly    When thou wert dead as we had mourned the son    Of Peleus. Nor was any man to blame;    ’Twas Jupiter who held in vehement hate    The army of the warlike Greeks, and laid    This doom upon thee. Now, O king, draw near,    And hear our voice and words, and check, I pray,    The anger rising in thy generous breast.’  

    “I spake; he answered not, but moved away    To Erebus, among the other souls    Of the departed. Yet would I have had    Speech of him, angry as he was, or else    Have spoken to him further, but my wish    Was strong to see yet others of the dead.  

    “Then I beheld the illustrious son of Jove,    Minos, a golden sceptre in his hand,    Sitting to judge the dead, who round the king    Pleaded their causes. There they stood or sat    In Pluto’s halls﻿—a pile with ample gates.  

    “And next I saw the huge Orion drive,    Across the meadows green with asphodel,    The savage beast whom he had slain; he bore    The brazen mace, which no man’s power could break.  

    “And Tityus there I saw﻿—the mighty earth    His mother﻿—overspreading, as he lay,    Nine acres, with two vultures at his side,    That, plucking at his liver, plunged their beaks    Into the flesh; nor did his hands avail    To drive them off, for he had offered force    To Jove’s proud wife Latona, as she went    To Pytho, through the pleasant Panopeus.  

    “And next I looked on Tantalus, a prey    To grievous torments, standing in a lake    That reached his chin. Though painfully athirst,    He could not drink; as often as he bowed    His aged head to take into his lips    The water, it was drawn away, and sank    Into the earth, and the dark soil appeared    Around his feet; a god had dried it up.    And lofty trees drooped o’er him, hung with fruit﻿—    Pears and pomegranates, apples fair to sight,    And luscious figs, and olives green of hue.    And when that ancient man put forth his hands    To pluck them from their stems, the wind arose    And whirled them far among the shadowy clouds.  

    “There I beheld the shade of Sisyphus    Amid his sufferings. With both hands he rolled    A huge stone up a hill. To force it up,    He leaned against the mass with hands and feet;    But, ere it crossed the summit of the hill    A power was felt that sent it rolling back,    And downward plunged the unmanageable rock    Before him to the plain. Again he toiled    To heave it upward, while the sweat in streams    Ran down his limbs, and dust begrimed his brow.  

    “Then I beheld the mighty Hercules﻿—    The hero’s image﻿—for he sits himself    Among the deathless gods, well pleased to share    Their feasts, and Hebe of the dainty feet﻿—    A daughter of the mighty Jupiter    And golden-sandalled Juno﻿—is his wife.    Around his image flitted to and fro    The ghosts with noise, like fear-bewildered birds.    His look was dark as night. He held in hand    A naked bow, a shaft upon the string,    And fiercely gazed, like one about to send    The arrow forth. Upon his breast he wore    The formidable baldric, on whose band    Of gold were sculptured marvels﻿—forms of bears,    Wild boars, grim lions, battles, skirmishings,    And death by wounds, and slaughter. He who wrought    That band had never done the like before,    Nor could thereafter. As I met his eye,    The hero knew me, and, beholding me    With pity, said to me in winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    And yet unhappy; surely thou dost bear    A cruel fate, like that which I endured    While yet I saw the brightness of the sun.    The offspring of Saturnian Jupiter    Am I, and yet was I compelled to serve    One of a meaner race than I, who set    Difficult tasks. He sent me hither once    To bring away the guardian hound; he deemed    No harder task might be. I brought him hence,    I led him up from Hades, with such aid    As Hermes and the blue-eyed Pallas gave.’  

    “Thus having spoken, he withdrew again    Into the abode of Pluto. I remained    And kept my place, in hope there yet might come    Heroes who perished in the early time,    And haply I might look on some of those﻿—    The ancients, whom I greatly longed to see﻿—    On Theseus and Pirithoüs, glorious men,    The children of the gods. But now there flocked    Already round me, with a mighty noise,    The innumerable nations of the dead;    And I grew pale with fear, lest from the halls    Of Pluto the stern Proserpine should send    The frightful visage of the monster-maid,    The Gorgon. Hastening to my ship, I bade    The crew embark, and cast the hawsers loose.    Quickly they went on board, and took their seats    Upon the benches. Through Océanus    The current bore my galley, aided first    By oars and then by favorable gales.”  

            Book XII  The Sirens, Scylla, and Charybdis  

  Return of Ulysses to the island of Circè﻿—Her counsels respecting his homeward voyage﻿—The sirens﻿—Escape from Scylla and Charybdis﻿—His arrival at Trinacria﻿—Slaughter of the oxen of the Sun by his companions﻿—A tempest, in consequence, by which his companions all perish, and he only escapes by swimming to the island of Calypso.

      “Now when our barque had left Océanus    And entered the great deep, we reached the isle    Aeaea, where the Morning, child of Dawn,    Abides, and holds her dances, and the Sun    Goes up from earth. We landed there and drew    Our galley up the beach; we disembarked    And laid us down to sleep beside the sea,    And waited for the holy Morn to rise.  

    “Then when the rosy-fingered Morn appeared,    The child of Dawn, I sent my comrades forth    To bring from Circè’s halls Elpenor’s corse.    And where a headland stretched into the deep    We hewed down trees, and held the funeral rites    With many tears; and having there consumed    The body and the arms with fire, we built    A tomb, and reared a column to the dead,    And on its summit fixed a tapering oar.  

    “All this was duly done; yet was the news    Of our return from Hades not concealed    From Circè. She attired herself in haste    And came; her maids came with her, bringing bread    And store of meats and generous wine; and thus    Spake the wise goddess, standing in the midst:﻿—  

    “ ‘Ah, daring ones! who, yet alive, have gone    Down to the abode of Pluto; twice to die    Is yours, while others die but once. Yet now    Take food, drink wine, and hold a feast today,    And with the dawn of morning ye shall sail;    And I will show the way, and teach you all    Its dangers, so that ye may not lament    False counsels followed, either on the land    Or on the water, to your grievous harm.’  

    “She spake, and our confiding minds were swayed    Easily by her counsels. All that day    Till set of sun we sat and banqueted    Upon the abundant meats and generous wines;    And when the Sun went down, and darkness came,    The crew beside the fastenings of our barque    Lay down to sleep, while Circè took my hand,    Led me apart, and made me sit, and took    Her seat before me, and inquired of all    That I had seen. I told her faithfully,    And then the mighty goddess Circè said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Thus far is well; now needfully attend    To what I say, and may some deity    Help thee remember it! Thou first wilt come    To where the Sirens haunt. They throw a spell    O’er all who pass that way. If unawares    One finds himself so nigh that he can hear    Their voices, round him nevermore shall wife    And lisping children gather, welcoming    His safe return with joy. The Sirens sit    In a green field, and charm with mellow notes    The comer, while beside them lie in heaps    The bones of men decaying underneath    The shrivelled skins. Take heed and pass them by.    First fill with wax well kneaded in the palm    The ears of thy companions, that no sound    May enter. Hear the music, if thou wilt,    But let thy people bind thee, hand and foot,    To the good ship, upright against the mast,    And round it wind the cord, that thou mayst hear    The ravishing notes. But shouldst thou then entreat    Thy men, commanding them to set thee free,    Let them be charged to bind thee yet more fast    With added bands. And when they shall have passed    The Sirens by, I will not judge for thee    Which way to take; consider for thyself;    I tell thee of two ways. There is a pile    Of beetling rocks, where roars the mighty surge    Of dark-eyed Amphitritè; these are called    The Wanderers by the blessed gods. No birds    Can pass them safe, not even the timid doves,    Which bear ambrosia to our father Jove,    But ever doth the slippery rock take off    Someone, whose loss the God at once supplies,    To keep their number full. To these no barque    Guided by man has ever come, and left    The spot unwrecked; the billows of the deep    And storms of fire in air have scattered wide    Timbers of ships and bodies of drowned men.    One only of the barques that plough the deep    Has passed them safely﻿—Argo, known to all    By fame, when coming from Aeaeta home﻿—    And her the billows would have dashed against    The enormous rocks, if Juno, for the sake    Of Jason, had not come to guide it through.  

    “ ‘Two are the rocks; one lifts to the broad heaven    Its pointed summit, where a dark gray cloud    Broods, and withdraws not; never is the sky    Clear o’er that peak, not even in summer days    Or autumn; nor can man ascend its steeps,    Or venture down﻿—so smooth the sides, as if    Man’s art had polished them. There in the midst    Upon the western side toward Erebus    There yawns a shadowy cavern; thither thou,    Noble Ulysses, steer thy barque, yet keep    So far aloof that, standing on the deck,    A youth might send an arrow from a bow    Just to the cavern’s mouth. There Scylla dwells,    And fills the air with fearful yells; her voice    The cry of whelps just littered, but herself    A frightful prodigy﻿—a sight which none    Would care to look on, though he were a god.    Twelve feet are hers, all shapeless; six long necks,    A hideous head on each, and triple rows    Of teeth, close set and many, threatening death.    And half her form is in the cavern’s womb,    And forth from that dark gulf her heads are thrust,    To look abroad upon the rocks for prey﻿—    Dolphin, or dogfish, or the mightier whale,    Such as the murmuring Amphitritè breeds    In multitudes. No mariner can boast    That he has passed by Scylla with a crew    Unharmed; she snatches from the deck, and bears    Away in each grim mouth, a living man.  

    “ ‘Another rock, Ulysses, thou wilt see,    Of lower height, so near her that a spear,    Cast by the hand, might reach it. On it grows    A huge wild fig-tree with luxuriant leaves.    Below, Charybdis, of immortal birth,    Draws the dark water down; for thrice a day    She gives it forth, and thrice with fearful whirl    She draws it in. O, be it not thy lot    To come while the dark water rushes down!    Even Neptune could not then deliver thee.    Then turn thy course with speed toward Scylla’s rock,    And pass that way; ’twere better far that six    Should perish from the ship than all be lost’  

    “She spake, and I replied: ‘O goddess, deign    To tell me truly, cannot I at once    Escape Charybdis and defend my friends    Against the rage of Scylla when she strikes?’  

    “I spake; the mighty goddess answered me:﻿—    ‘Rash man! dost thou still think of warlike deeds,    And feats of strength? And wilt thou not give way    Even to the deathless gods? That pest is not    Of mortal mould; she cannot die, she is    A thing to tremble and to shudder at,    And fierce, and never to be overcome.    There is no room for courage; flight is best.    And if thou shouldst delay beside the rock    To take up arms, I fear lest once again    She fall on thee with all her heads, and seize    As many men. Pass by the monster’s haunt    With all the speed that thou canst make, and call    Upon Crataeis, who brought Scylla forth    To be the plague of men, and who will calm    Her rage, that she assault thee not again.  

    “ ‘Then in thy voyage shalt thou reach the isle    Trinacria, where, in pastures of the Sun,    His many beeves and fading sheep are fed﻿—    Seven herds of oxen, and as many flocks    Of sheep, and fifty in each flock and herd.    They never multiply; they never die.    Two shepherdesses tend them, goddesses,    Nymphs with redundant locks﻿—Lampelia one,    The other Phaëthusa. These the nymph    Naeëra to the overgoing Sun    Brought forth, and when their queenly mother’s care    Had reared them, she appointed them to dwell    In far Trinacria, there to keep the flocks    And oxen of their father. If thy thoughts    Be fixed on thy return, so that thou leave    These flocks and herds unharmed, ye all will come    To Ithaca, though after many toils.    But if thou rashly harm them, I foretell    Destruction to thy ship and all its crew;    And if thyself escape, thou wilt return    Late and in sorrow, all thy comrades lost.’  

    “She spake; the Morning on her golden throne    Looked forth; the glorious goddess went her way    Into the isle, I to my ship, and bade    The men embark and cast the hawsers loose.    And straight they went on board, and duly manned    The benches, smiting as they sat with oars    The hoary waters. Circè, amber-haired,    The mighty goddess of the musical voice,    Sent a fair wind behind our dark-prowed ship    That gayly bore us company, and filled    The sails. When we had fairly ordered all    On board our galley, we sat down, and left    The favoring wind and helm to bear us on,    And thus in sadness I bespake the crew:﻿—  

    “ ‘My friends! it were not well that one or two    Alone should know the oracles I heard    From Circè, great among the goddesses;    And now will I disclose them, that ye all,    Whether we are to die or to escape    The doom of death, may be forewarned. And first    Against the wicked Sirens and their song    And flowery bank she warns us. I alone    May hear their voice, but ye must bind me first    With bands too strong to break, that I may stand    Upright against the mast; and let the cords    Be fastened round it. If I then entreat    And bid you loose me, make the bands more strong.’  

    “Thus to my crew I spake, and told them all    That they should know, while our good ship drew near    The island of the Sirens, prosperous gales    Wafting it gently onward. Then the breeze    Sank to a breathless calm; some deity    Had hushed the winds to slumber. Straightway rose    The men and furled the sails and laid them down    Within the ship, and sat and made the sea    White with the beating of their polished blades,    Made of the fir-tree. Then I took a mass    Of wax and cut it into many parts,    And kneaded each with a strong hand. It grew    Warm with the pressure, and the beams of him    Who journeys round the earth, the monarch Sun.    With this I filled the ears of all my men    From first to last. They bound me, in their turn,    Upright against the mast-tree, hand and foot,    And tied the cords around it. Then again    They sat and threshed with oars the hoary deep.    And when, in running rapidly, we came    So near the Sirens as to hear a voice    From where they sat, our galley flew not by    Unseen by them, and sweetly thus they sang:﻿—  

    “ ‘O world-renowned Ulysses! thou who art    The glory of the Achaians, turn thy barque    Landward, that thou mayst listen to our lay    No man has passed us in his galley yet,    Ere he has heard our warbled melodies.    He goes delighted hence a wiser man;    For all that in the spacious realm of Troy    The Greeks and Trojans by the will of Heaven    Endured we know, and all that comes to pass    In all the nations of the fruitful earth.’  

    ” ’Twas thus they sang, and sweet the strain. I longed    To listen, and with nods I gave the sign    To set me free; they only plied their oars    The faster. Then upsprang Eurylochus    And Perimedes, and with added cords    Bound me, and drew the others still more tight.    And when we now had passed the spot, and heard    No more the melody the Sirens sang,    My comrades hastened from their ears to take    The wax, and loosed the cords and set me free.  

    “As soon as we had left the isle, I saw    Mist and a mountain billow, and I heard    The thunder of the waters. From the hands    Of my affrighted comrades flew the oars,    The deep was all in uproar; but the ship    Stopped there, for all the rowers ceased their task.    I went through all the ship exhorting them    With cheerful words, man after man, and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Reflect, my friends, that we are not untried    In evil fortunes, nor in sadder plight    Are we than when within his spacious cave    The brutal Cyclops held us prisoners;    Yet through my valor we escaped, and through    My counsels and devices, and I think    That ye will live to bear this day’s events    In memory like those. Now let us act.    Do all as I advise; go to your seats    Upon the benches, smiting with your oars    These mighty waves, and haply Jove will grant    That we escape the death which threatens us.    Thee, helmsman, I adjure﻿—and heed my words,    Since to thy hands alone is given in charge    Our gallant vessel’s rudder﻿—steer thou hence    From mist and tumbling waves, and well observe    The rock, lest where it juts into the sea    Thou heed it not, and bring us ail to wreck.’  

    “I spake, and quickly all obeyed my words.    Yet said I naught of Scylla﻿—whom we now    Could not avoid﻿—lest all the crew in fear    Should cease to row, and crowd into the hold.    And then did I forget the stern command    Which Circè gave me, not to arm myself    For combat. In my shining arms I cased    My limbs, and took in hand two ponderous spears,    And went on deck, and stood upon the prow﻿—    For there it seemed to me that Scylla first    Would show herself﻿—that monster of the rocks﻿—    To seize my comrades. Yet I saw her not,    Though weary grew my eyes with looking long    And eagerly upon those dusky cliffs.  

    “Sadly we sailed into the strait, where stood    On one hand Scylla, and the dreaded rock    Charybdis on the other, drawing down    Into her horrid gulf the briny flood;    And as she threw it forth again, it tossed    And murmured as upon a glowing fire    The water in a caldron, while the spray,    Thrown upward, fell on both the summit-rocks;    And when once more she swallowed the salt sea,    It whirled within the abyss, while far below    The bottom of blue sand was seen. My men    Grew pale with fear; we looked into the gulf    And thought our end was nigh. Then Scylla snatched    Six of my comrades from our hollow barque,    The best in valor and in strength of arm.    I looked to my good ship; I looked to them,    And saw their hands and feet still swung in air    Above me, while for the last time on earth    They called my name in agony of heart.    As when an angler on a jutting rock    Sits with his taper rod, and casts his bait    To snare the smaller fish, he sends the horn    Of a wild bull that guards his line afar    Into the water, and jerks out a fish,    And throws it gasping shoreward; so were they    Uplifted gasping to the rocks, and there    Scylla devoured them at her cavern’s mouth,    Stretching their hands to me with piercing cries    Of anguish. ’Twas in truth the saddest sight,    Whatever I have suffered and where’er    Have roamed the waters, that mine eyes have seen.  

    “Escaping thus the rocks, the dreaded haunt    Of Scylla and Charybdis, we approached    The pleasant island of the Sun, where grazed    The oxen with broad foreheads, beautiful,    And flocks of sheep, the fatlings of the god    Who makes the round of heaven. While yet at sea    I heard from my black ship the low of herds    In stables, and the bleatings of the flocks,    And straightway came into my thought the words    Of the blind seer Tiresias, him of Thebes,    And of Aeaean Circè, who had oft    Warned me to shun the island of the god    Whose light is sweet to all. And then I said    To my companions with a sorrowing heart:﻿—  

    “ ‘My comrades, sufferers as ye are, give ear.    I shall disclose the oracles which late    Tiresias and Aeaean Circè gave.    The goddess earnestly admonished me    Not to approach the island of the Sun,    Whose light is sweet to all, for there she said    Some great misfortune lay in wait for us.    Now let us speed the ship and pass the isle.’  

    “I spake; their hearts were broken as they heard,    And bitterly Eurylochus replied:﻿—  

    “ ‘Austere art thou, Ulysses; thou art strong    Exceedingly; no labor tires thy limbs;    They must be made of iron, since thy will    Denies thy comrades, overcome with toil    And sleeplessness, to tread the land again,    And in that isle amid the waters make    A generous banquet. Thou wouldst have us sail    Into the swiftly coming night, and stray    Far from the island, through the misty sea.    By night spring up the mighty winds that make    A wreck of ships, and how can one escape    Destruction, should a sudden hurricane    Rise from the south or the hard-blowing west,    Such as, in spite of all the sovereign gods,    Will cause a ship to founder in the deep?    Let us obey the dark-browed Night, and take    Our evening meal, remaining close beside    Our gallant barque, and go on board again    When morning breaks, and enter the wide sea.’  

    “So spake Eurylochus; the rest approved.    And then I knew that some divinity    Was meditating evil to our band,    And I bespake him thus in winged words:﻿—  

    “ ‘Eurylochus, ye force me to your will,    Since I am only one. Now all of you    Bind yourselves to me firmly, by an oath,    That if ye haply here shall meet a herd    Of beeves or flock of sheep, ye will not dare    To slay a single ox or sheep, but feed    Contented on the stores that Circè gave.’  

    “I spake, and readily my comrades swore    As I required; and when that solemn oath    Was taken, to the land we brought and moored    Our galley in a winding creek, beside    A fountain of sweet water. From the deck    Stepped my companions and made ready there    Their evening cheer. They ate and drank till thirst    And hunger were appeased, and then they thought    Of those whom Scylla from our galley’s deck    Snatched and devoured; they thought and wept till sleep    Stole softly over them amid their tears.    Now came the third part of the night; the stars    Were sinking when the Cloud-compeller Jove    Sent forth a violent wind with eddying gusts,    And covered both the earth and sky with clouds,    And darkness fell from heaven. When Morning came,    The rosy-fingered daughter of the Dawn,    We drew the ship into a spacious grot.    There were the seats of nymphs, and there we saw    The smooth fair places where they danced. I called    A council of my men, and said to them:﻿—  

    “ ‘My friends, in our good ship are food and drink;    Abstain we from these beeves, lest we be made    To suffer; for these herds and these fair flocks    Are sacred to a dreaded god, the Sun﻿—    The all-beholding and all-hearing Sun.’  

    “I spake, and all were swayed by what I said    Full easily. A month entire the gales    Blew from the south, and after that no wind    Save east and south. While yet we had our bread    And ruddy wine, my comrades spared the beeves,    Moved by the love of life. But when the stores    On board our galley were consumed, they roamed    The island in their need, and sought for prey,    And snared with barbed hooks the fish and birds﻿—    Whatever came to hand﻿—till they were gaunt    With famine. Meantime I withdrew alone    Into the isle, to supplicate the gods,    If haply one of them might yet reveal    The way of my return. As thus I strayed    Into the land, apart from all the rest,    I found a sheltered nook where no wind came,    And prayed with washen hands to all the gods    Who dwell in heaven. At length they bathed my lids    In a soft sleep. Meantime, Eurylochus    With fatal counsels thus harangued my men:﻿—  

    “ ‘Hear, my companions, sufferers as ye are,    The words that I shall speak. All modes of death    Are hateful to the wretched race of men;    But this of hunger, thus to meet our fate,    Is the most fearful. Let us drive apart    The best of all the oxen of the Sun,    And sacrifice them to the immortal ones    Who dwell in the broad heaven. And if we come    To Ithaca, our country, we will there    Build to the Sun, whose path is o’er our heads,    A sumptuous temple, and endow its shrine    With many gifts and rare. But if it be    His will, approved by all the other gods,    To sink our barque in anger, for the sake    Of these his high-horned oxen, I should choose    Sooner to gasp my life away amid    The billows of the deep, than pine to death    By famine in this melancholy isle.’  

    “So spake Eurylochus; the crew approved.    Then from the neighboring herd they drove the best    Of all the beeves; for near the dark-prowed ship    The fair broad-fronted herd with crooked horns    Were feeding. Round the victims stood my crew,    And, offering their petitions to the gods,    Held tender oak-leaves in their hands, just plucked    From a tall tree, for in our good ship’s hold    Was no white barley now. When they had prayed,    And slain and dressed the beeves, they hewed away    The thighs and covered them with double folds    Of caul, and laid raw slices over these.    Wine had they not to pour in sacrifice    Upon the burning flesh; they poured instead    Water, and roasted all the entrails thus.    Now when the thighs were thoroughly consumed,    And entrails tasted, all the rest was carved    Into small portions, and transfixed with spits.  

    “Just then the gentle slumber left my lids.    I hurried to the shore and my good ship,    And, drawing near, perceived the savory steam    From the burnt-offering. Sorrowfully then    I called upon the ever-living gods:﻿—  

    “ ‘O Father Jove, and all ye blessed gods,    Who live forever, ’twas a cruel sleep    In which ye lulled me to my grievous harm;    My comrades here have done a fearful wrong.’  

    “Lampetia, of the trailing robes, in haste    Flew to the Sun, who journeys round the earth,    To tell him that my crew had slain his beeves,    And thus in anger he bespake the gods:﻿—  

    “ ‘O Father Jove, and all ye blessed gods    Who never die, avenge the wrong I bear    Upon the comrades of Laertes’ son,    Ulysses, who have foully slain my beeves,    In which I took delight whene’er I rose    Into the starry heaven, and when again    I sank from heaven to earth. If for the wrong    They make not large amends, I shall go down    To Hades, there to shine among the dead.’  

    “The cloud-compelling Jupiter replied:﻿—    ‘Still shine, O Sun! among the deathless gods    And mortal men, upon the nourishing earth.    Soon will I cleave, with a white thunderbolt,    Their galley in the midst of the black sea.’  

    “This from Calypso of the radiant hair    I heard thereafter; she herself, she said,    Had heard it from the herald Mercury.  

    “When to the ship I came, beside the sea,    I sternly chid them all, man after man,    Yet could we think of no redress; the beeves    Were dead; and now with prodigies the gods    Amazed my comrades﻿—the skins moved and crawled,    The flesh both raw and roasted on the spits    Lowed with the voice of oxen. Six whole days    My comrades feasted, taking from the herd    The Sun’s best oxen. When Saturnian Jove    Brought the seventh day, the tempest ceased; the wind    Fell, and we straightway went on board. We set    The mast upright, and, spreading the white sails,    We ventured on the great wide sea again.  

    “When we had left the isle, and now appeared    No other land, but only sea and sky,    The son of Saturn caused a lurid cloud    To gather o’er the galley, and to cast    Its darkness on the deep. Not long our ship    Ran onward, ere the furious west-wind rose    And blew a hurricane. A strong blast snapped    Both ropes that held the mast; the mast fell back;    The tackle dropped entangled to the hold;    The mast, in falling on the galley’s stern,    Dashed on the pilot’s head and crushed the bones,    And from the deck he plunged like one who dives    Into the deep; his gallant spirit left    The limbs at once. Jove thundered from on high,    And sent a thunderbolt into the ship,    That, quaking with the fearful blow, and filled    With stifling sulphur, shook my comrades off    Into the deep. They floated round the ship    Like seamews; Jupiter had cut them off    From their return. I moved from place to place,    Still in the ship, until the tempest’s force    Parted the sides and keel. Before the waves    The naked keel was swept. The mast had snapped    Just at the base, but round it was a thong    Made of a bullock’s hide; with this I bound    The mast and keel together, took my seat    Upon them, and the wild winds bore me on.  

    “The west-wind ceased to rage; but in its stead    The south-wind blew, and brought me bitter grief.    I feared lest I must measure back my way    To grim Charybdis. All night long I rode    The waves, and with the rising sun drew near    The rock of Scylla and the terrible    Charybdis as her gulf was drawing down    The waves of the salt sea. There as I came    I raised myself on high till I could grasp    The lofty fig-tree, and I clung to it    As clings a bat﻿—for I could neither find    A place to plant my feet, nor could I climb,    So distant were the roots, so far apart    The long huge branches overshadowing    Charybdis. Yet I firmly kept my hold    Till she should throw the keel and mast again    Up from the gulf. They, as I waited long,    Came up again, though late﻿—as late as one    Who long has sat adjudging strifes between    Young suitors pleading in the marketplace    Rises and goes to take his evening meal;    So late the timbers of my barque returned,    Thrown from Charybdis. Then I dropped amid    The dashing waves, and came with hands and feet    On those long timbers in the midst, that they    Might bear my weight. I sat on them and rowed    With both my hands. The father of the gods    And mortals suffered not that I should look    On Scylla’s rock again, else had I not    Escaped a cruel death. For nine long days    I floated on the waters; on the tenth    The gods at nightfall bore me to an isle﻿—    Ogygia, where Calypso, amber-haired,    A mighty goddess, skilled in song, abides,    Who kindly welcomed me, and cherished me.    Why should I speak of this? Here in these halls    I gave the history yesterday to thee    And to thy gracious consort, and I hate    To tell again a tale once fully told.”  

            Book XIII  Arrival of Ulysses at Ithaca  

  Departure of Ulysses from the court of Alcinoüs﻿—Arrival of the ship at Ithaca﻿—Ulysses carried on shore by the Phaeacians while asleep, and left﻿—His treasures landed also﻿—The ship, while returning, transformed by Neptune into a rock﻿—Dialogue between Pallas and Ulysses concerning the destruction of the suitors﻿—Concealment of the treasures in a cave﻿—Transformation of Ulysses into an old man.

      He spake, and all within those shadowy halls    Were silent; all were held in mute delight.    Alcinoüs then took up the word and said:﻿—  

    “Since thou hast come, Ulysses, as a guest,    To this high pile and to these brazen rooms,    So long a sufferer, thou must not depart    Upon thy homeward way a wanderer still.    And this let me enjoin on each of you    Who in this palace drink at our repasts    The choice red wine, and listen to the bard:    Already in a polished chest are laid    Changes of raiment, works of art in gold,    And other gifts, which the Phaeacian chiefs    Have destined for our guest; now let us each    Bestow an ample tripod and a vase,    And we in an assembly of the realm    Will see the cost repaid, since otherwise    Great would the burden be that each must bear.”    So spake Alcinoüs; they approved, and sought    Their homes to sleep, but when the child of Dawn,    The rosy-fingered Morn, appeared, they came,    All bringing to the ship their gifts of brass    In honor of the guest. The mighty prince    Alcinoüs, going through the ship, bestowed    The whole beneath the benches, that no one    Of those who leaned to pull the oar might thence    Meet harm or hindrance. Then they all went back    To the king’s palace, and prepared a feast.  

    The mighty prince Alcinoüs offered up    For them an ox to cloud-compelling Jove,    The son of Saturn, ruler over all.    They burned the thighs, and held high festival,    And all was mirth. Divine Demodocus    The bard, whom all men reverenced, sang to them.    Meantime Ulysses often turned to look    At the bright Sun, and longed to see him set,    So eager was the hero to set sail    Upon his homeward way. As when a swain    Awaits his evening meal, for whom all day    Two dark-brown steers have dragged the solid plough    Through fallow grounds, and welcome is the hour    Of sunset, calling him to his repast,    And wearily he walks with failing knees,    So welcome to Ulysses did the light    Of day go down. Then did he hold discourse    With the Phaeacians, lovers of the sea,    And chiefly with Alcinoüs, speaking thus:﻿—  

    “O monarch most illustrious of thy race,    Alcinoüs, now when ye have duly poured    Wine to the gods, be pleased to send me hence    In peace, and fare ye well! All that my heart    Could wish have ye provided bounteously﻿—    An escort and rich gifts; and may the gods    Bestow their blessing with them! May I meet    My blameless wife again, and find my friends    Prosperous! And ye whom I shall leave behind,    Long may ye make the wives of your young years    And children happy! May the gods vouchsafe    To crown with every virtue you and them,    And may no evil light upon your isle!”  

    He spake; the assembly all approved his words,    And bade send forth the stranger on his way,    Who spake so nobly. Then the mighty prince    Alcinoüs turned, and to the herald said:﻿—  

    “Now mix the wine, Pontonoüs, in a jar,    And bear a part to all beneath our roof,    That we with prayers to Father Jupiter    May send the stranger to his native land.”  

    He spake; Pontonoüs mingled for the guests    The generous wine, and went with it to each,    Who poured it on the ground, from where they sat,    To all the dwellers of the ample heaven;    And then the great Ulysses, rising up,    Placed the round goblet in Aretè’s hands,    And thus bespake the queen with winged words:﻿—  

    “Farewell, O queen, through the long years, till age    And death, which are the lot of all, shall come.    Now I depart, but mayst thou, here among    Thy people, and the children of thy love,    And King Alcinoüs, lead a happy life!”  

    So spake the highborn chieftain, and withdrew,    And crossed the threshold. King Alcinoüs sent    A herald with him to direct his way    To the fleet ship and border of the deep.    Aretè also sent her servant-maids﻿—    One bearing a fresh cloak and tunic, one    A coffer nobly wrought, and yet a third    Bread and red wine; and when they reached the ship    Beside the sea, the diligent crew received    Their burdens, and bestowed within the hold    The food and drink, but spread upon the deck    And at the stern a mat and linen sheet,    That there Ulysses undisturbed might sleep.    He went on board and silently lay down,    While all the rowers in due order took    Their seats upon the benches. Loosing first    The hawser from the perforated rock,    They bent them to their task, and flung the brine    Up from the oar, while on the chieftain’s lids    Lighted a sweet and deep and quiet sleep,    Most like to death. As, smitten by the lash,    Four harnessed stallions spring on high and dart    Across the plain together; so the prow    Rose leaping forward, while behind it rolled    A huge dark billow of the roaring sea.    Safely and steadily the galley ran,    Nor could a falcon, swiftest of the birds,    Have kept beside it, with such speed it flew,    Bearing a hero who was like the gods    In wisdom, and whose sufferings in the wars    And voyages among the furious waves    Were great and many, though he slumbered now    In peace, forgetful of misfortunes past.  

    Now when that brightest star, the harbinger    Of Morning, daughter of the Dawn, arose,    The barque had passed the sea, and reached the isle.  

    A port there is in Ithaca, the haunt    Of Phorcys, Ancient of the Sea. Steep shores    Stretch inward toward each other, and roll back    The mighty surges which the hoarse winds hurl    Against them from the ocean, while within    Ships ride without their hawsers when they once    Have passed the haven’s mouth. An olive-tree    With spreading branches at the farther end    Of that fair haven stands, and overbrows    A pleasant shady grotto of the nymphs    Called Naiads. Cups and jars of stone are ranged    Within, and bees lay up their honey there.    There from their spindles wrought of stone the nymphs    Weave their sea-purple robes, which all behold    With wonder; there are ever-flowing springs.    Two are the entrances: one toward the north    By which men enter; but a holier one    Looks toward the south, nor ever mortal foot    May enter there. By that way pass the gods.  

    They touched the land, for well they knew the spot.    The galley, urged so strongly by the arms    Of those who plied the oar, ran up the beach    Quite half her length. And then the crew came forth    From the good ship, and first they lifted out    Ulysses with the linen and rich folds    Of tapestry, and laid him on the sands    In a deep slumber. Then they also took    The presents from the hold, which, as he left    Their isle, the princes of Phaeacia gave    By counsel of wise Pallas. These they piled    Close to the olive-tree, without the way,    That none, in passing, ere Ulysses woke,    Might do their owner wrong. Then homeward sailed    The crew; but Neptune, who could not forge    The threats which he had uttered long before    Against the godlike chief Ulysses, thus    Sought to explore the will of Jupiter:﻿—  

    “O Father Jove! I shall no more be held    In honor with the gods, since mortal men,    The people of Phaeacia, though their race    Is of my lineage, do not honor me.    I meant Ulysses should not reach his home    Save with much suffering, though I never thoyght    To hinder his return, for thou hadst given    Thy promise and thy nod that it should be.    Yet these Phaeacians, in a gallant barque,    Have borne him o’er the deep, and while he slept,    Have laid him down in Ithaca, and given    Large gifts, abundant store of brass and gold,    And woven work, more than he could have brought    From captured Ilium, if he had returned    Safely, with all his portion of the spoil.”  

    Then cloud-compelling Jupiter replied:    “Earth-shaker, ruler of a mighty realm!    What hast thou said? The gods deny thee not    Due honor; perilous it were for them    To show contempt for one who stands in age    And might above them all. But if among    The sons of men be one who puts such trust    In his own strength as not to honor thee,    Do as seems good to thee, and as thou wilt.”  

    Promptly the god who shakes the shores replied;    “What thou dost bid me I would do at once,    But that I fear and would avoid thy wrath.    I would destroy that fair Phaeacian barque    In its return across the misty sea    From bearing home Ulysses, that no more    May the Phaeacians lend an escort thus    To wandering men, and I would also cause    A lofty mount to rise and hide their town.”  

    Then spake again the Cloud-compeller Jove:    “Thus were it best, my brother: when the crowd    Of citizens already see the ship    Approaching, then transform it to a rock    In semblance of a galley, that they all    May gaze in wonder; thus wilt thou have caused    A lofty mount to stand before their town.”  

    This when the shaker of the shores had heard,    He flew to Scheria, the Phaeacian isle,    And stood, until that galley, having crossed    The sea, came swiftly scudding. He drew near    And smote it with his open palm, and made    The ship a rock, fast rooted in the bed    Of the deep sea, and then he went his way.  

    Then winged words were spoken in that throng    Of the Phaeacians, wielders of long oars,    And far renowned in feats of seamanship.    And, looking on each other, thus they said:﻿—  

    “Ha! what has stayed our good ship on the sea?    This moment we beheld her hastening home.”  

    ’Twas thus they talked, unweeting of the cause.    But then Alcinoüs to the assembly said:﻿—  

    “Yes! now I call to mind the ancient words    Of prophecy﻿—my father’s﻿—who was wont    To say that Neptune sorely is displeased    That we should give to every man who comes    Safe escort to his home. In coming times﻿—    Such was my father’s prophecy﻿—the god    Would yet destroy a well-appointed barque    Of the Phaeacians on the misty deep    Returning from an escort, and would cause    A lofty mount to stand before our town.    So prophesied the aged man; his words    Are here fulfilled. Now do as I appoint,    And let us all obey. Henceforth refrain    From bearing to their homes the strangers thrown    Upon our coast; and let us sacrifice    To Neptune twelve choice bullocks of the herd,    That he may pity us, nor hide our town    With a huge mountain from the sight of men.”  

    He spake, and they were awed and straightway brought    The bullocks for the sacrifice. So prayed    To sovereign Neptune the Phaeacian chiefs    And princes, standing round the altar-fires.  

    Now woke the great Ulysses from his sleep    In his own land, and yet he knew it not.    Long had he been away, and Pallas now,    The goddess-child of Jove, had cast a mist    Around him, that he might not yet be known    To others, and that she might tell him first    What he should learn; nor even might his wife,    Nor friends, nor people, know of his return,    Ere he avenged upon the suitor crew    His wrongs, and therefore all things wore to him    Another look﻿—the footways stretching far,    The bights where ships were moored, the towering rocks,    And spreading trees. He rose and stood upright,    And gazed upon his native coast and wept,    And smote his thigh, and said in bitter grief:﻿—  

    “Ah me! what region am I in, among    What people? lawless, cruel, and unjust?    Or are they hospitable men, who fear    The gods? And where shall I bestow these goods,    And whither go myself? Would that they all    Were still with the Phaeacians, and that I    Had found some other great and mighty king    Kindly to welcome me, and send me back    To my own land. I know not where to place    These treasures, and I must not leave them here,    Lest others come and seize them as a spoil.    Nay, these Phaeacian chiefs and counsellors    Were not, in all things, either wise or just.    They gave their word to land me on the coast    Of pleasant Ithaca, and have not kept    Their promise. O, may Jove avenge this wrong!    He who protects the suppliant, who beholds    All men with equal eye, and punishes    The guilty. Now will I review my stores    And number them again, that I may see    If those who left me here have taken aught.”  

    Thus having said, he numbered all his gifts﻿—    Beautiful tripods, caldrons, works of gold,    And gorgeous woven raiment; none of these    Were wanting. Then he pined to see again    His native isle, and slowly paced the beach    Of the loud sea, lamenting bitterly.    There Pallas came to meet him in the shape    Of a young shepherd, delicately formed,    As are the sons of kings. A mantle lay    Upon her shoulder in rich folds; her feet    Shone in their sandals: in her hand she bore    A javelin. As Ulysses saw, his heart    Was glad within him, and he hastened on,    And thus accosted her with winged words:﻿—  

    “Fair youth, who art the first whom I have met    Upon this shore, I bid thee hail, and hope    Thou meetest me with no unkind intent.    Protect what thou beholdest here and me;    I make my suit to thee as to a god,    And come to thy dear knees. And tell, I pray,    That I may know the truth, what land is this?    What people? who the dwellers? may it be    A pleasant isle, or is it but the shore    Of fruitful mainland shelving to the sea?”  

    And then the goddess, blue-eyed Pallas, said:    “Of simple mind art thou, unless perchance    Thou comest from afar, if thou dost ask    What country this may be. It is not quite    A nameless region; many know it well    Of those who dwell beneath the rising sun,    And those, behind, in Evening’s dusky realm.    Rugged it is, and suited ill to steeds,    Yet barren it is not, though level grounds    Are none within its borders. It is rich    In corn and wine, for seasonable rains    And dews refresh its soil. Large flocks of goats    And herds of beeves are pastured here; all kinds    Of trees are in its forests, and its springs    Are never dry. The fame of Ithaca,    Stranger, has travelled to the Trojan coast,    Though that, I hear, lies far away from Greece.”  

    She spake; Ulysses, the great sufferer,    Rejoiced to be in his own land, whose name    Pallas, the child of aegis-bearing Jove,    Had just now uttered. Then with winged words    He spake, but not the truth; his artful speech    Put that aside, forever in his breast    The power of shrewd invention was awake:﻿—  

    “In the broad fields of Crete, that lie far off    Beyond the sea, I heard of Ithaca,    To which I now am come with these my goods.    I left as many for my sons and fled,    For I had slain Orsilochus, the fleet    Of foot, the dear son of Idomeneus,    Who overcame by swiftness in the race    The foremost runners in the realm of Crete.    He sought to rob me wholly of my share    Of Trojan spoil, for which I had endured    Hardships in war with heroes, and at sea    Among the angry waves. The cause was this:    I would not in the siege of Troy submit    To serve his father, but, apart from him,    I led a troop, companions of my own.    The youth returning from the fields I met,    And smote him with the spear﻿—for near the way    I lay in ambush with a single friend.    A night exceeding dark was in the sky;    No human eye beheld, nor did he know    Who took his life. When I had slain him thus    With the sharp spear I hastened to a ship    Of the Phoenicians, and besought their aid,    And gave them large reward, and bade them steer    To Pylos, bearing me, and leave me there,    Or where the Epeians hold the hallowed coast    Of Elis. But the force of adverse winds    Drove them unwilling thence; they meant no fraud.    We wandered hither, just at night we came;    And rowing hard, the seamen brought their ship    Within the port. No word was said of food,    Though great our need. All disembarked in haste    And lay upon the shore. Deep was the sleep    That stole upon my weary limbs. The men    Took from the hold my goods, and, bearing them    To where I slumbered on the sand, set sail    For populous Sidonia, leaving me    Here quite alone with sorrow in my heart.”  

    He spake; the blue-eyed goddess, Pallas, smiled,    And touched the chief caressingly. She seemed    A beautiful and stately woman now,    Such as are skilled in works of rare device,    And thus she said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “Full shrewd were he, a master of deceit,    Who should surpass thee in the ways of craft,    Even though he were a god﻿—thou unabashed    And prompt with shifts, and measureless in wiles!    Thou canst not even in thine own land refrain    From artful figments and misleading words,    As thou hast practised from thy birth. But now    Speak we of other matters, for we both    Are skilled in stratagem. Thou art the first    Of living men in counsel and in speech,    And I am famed for foresight and for craft    Among the immortals. Dost thou not yet know    Pallas Athenè, child of Jove, whose aid    Is present to defend thee in all time    Of peril, and but lately gained for thee    The favor of the whole Phaeacian race?    And hither am I come to frame for thee    Wise counsels, and to hide away the stores    Given by the opulent Phaeacian chiefs    At thy departure. I shall also tell    What thou must yet endure beneath the roof    Of thine own palace, by the will of fate.    Yet bear it bravely, since thou must, nor speak    To any man or woman of thyself    And of thy wandering hither, but submit    To many things that grieve thee, silently,    And bear indignities from violent men.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, thus rejoined:    “O goddess, it is hard for mortal man    To know thee when he meets thee, though his sight    Be of the sharpest, for thou puttest on    At pleasure any form. Yet this I know,    That thou wert kind to me when we, the sons    Of Greece, were warring in the realm of Troy.    But when we had o’erihrown the lofty town    Of Priam, and embarked, and when some god    Had scattered the Achaians, after that,    Daughter of Jove, I never saw thee more,    Never perceived thee entering my barque    And guarding me from danger﻿—but I roamed    Ever from place to place, my heart weighed down    By sorrow, till the gods delivered me,    And till thy counsels in the opulent realm    Of the Phaeacians brought my courage back,    And thou thyself didst guide me to the town.    And now in thy great father’s name I pray﻿—    For yet I cannot think that I am come    To pleasant Ithaca, but have been thrown    Upon some other coast, and fear that thou    Art jesting with me, and hast spoken thus    But to deceive me﻿—tell me, is it true    That I am in my own beloved land?”  

    And then the goddess, blue-eyed Pallas, said:    “Such ever are thy thoughts, and therefore I    Must not forsake thee in thy need. I know    How prompt thy speech, how quick thy thought, how shrewd    Thy judgment. If another man had come    From such long wanderings, he had flown at once    Delighted to his children and his wife    In his own home. But thou desirest not    To ask or hear of them till thou hast put    Thy consort to the trial of her truth﻿—    Her who now sits within thy halls and waits    In vain for thee, and in perpetual grief    And weeping wears her nights and days away.    I never doubted﻿—well, in truth, I knew    That thou, with all thy comrades lost, wouldst reach    Thy country, but I dreaded to withstand    My father’s brother Neptune, who was wroth,    And fiercely wroth, for that thou hadst deprived    His well-beloved son of sight. But now    Attend, and I will show thee Ithaca    By certain tokens; mark them and believe.    The port of Phorcys, Ancient of the Deep,    Is here; and there the spreading olive-tree,    Just at the haven’s head; and, close beside,    The cool dark grotto, sacred to the nymphs    Called Naiads﻿—a wide-vaulted cave where once    Thou earnest oft with chosen hecatombs,    An offering to the nymphs﻿—and here thou seest    The mountain Neritus with all his woods.”  

    So spake the goddess, and dispersed the mist,    And all the scene appeared. Ulysses saw    Well pleased, rejoicing in his own dear land,    And, stooping, kissed the bountiful earth, and raised    His hands, and thus addressed the nymphs in prayer:﻿—  

    “Nymphs, Naiads, born to Jove, I did not hope    To be with you again. With cheerful prayers    I now salute you. We shall bring you soon    Our offerings, as of yore, if graciously    Jove’s daughter, huntress-queen, shall grant me yet    To live, and bless my well-beloved son.”  

    And then the goddess, blue-eyed Pallas, said:    “Be of good cheer, and let no anxious thought    Disturb thy mind. Let us bestir ourselves    To hide away the treasures thou hast brought    Within this hallowed grot in some recess    Where they may lie in safety; afterward    Will we take counsel what should next be done.”  

    The goddess said these words, and took her way    Into the shadowy cavern, spying out    Its hiding-places; while Ulysses brought    The treasures thither in his arms﻿—the gold,    The enduring brass, the raiment nobly wrought﻿—    Which the Phaeacians gave him. These they laid    Together in due order; Pallas then,    The daughter of the Aegis-bearer Jove,    Closed up the opening with a massive rock.    Then, sitting by the sacred olive-tree,    They plotted to destroy the haughty crew    Of suitors, and the blue-eyed Pallas said:﻿—  

    “O nobly born, and versed in many wiles,    Son of Laertes! now the hour is come    To think how thou shalt lay avenging hands    Upon the shameless crew who, in thy house,    For three years past have made themselves its lords,    And wooed thy noble wife and brought her gifts,    While, pining still for thy return, she gave    Hopes to each suitor, and by messages    Made promises to all, though cherishing    A different purpose in her secret heart.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered her:    “Ah me, I should have perished utterly,    By such an evil fate as overtook    Atrides Agamemnon, in the halls    Of my own palace, but for thee, whose words,    O goddess, have revealed what I should know.    Now counsel me how I may be avenged.    Be ever by my side, and strengthen me    With courage, as thou didst when we o’erthrew    The towery crest of Ilium. Would thou wert    Still my ally, as then! I would engage,    O blue-eyed Pallas, with three hundred foes,    If thou, dread goddess, wouldst but counsel me.”  

    And then the blue-eyed Pallas spake again:    “I will be present with thee. When we once    Begin the work, thou shalt not leave my sight;    And many a haughty suitor with his blood    And brains shall stain thy spacious palace floor.    Now will I change thine aspect, so that none    Shall know thee. I will wither thy fair skin,    And it shall hang on crooked limbs; thy locks    Of auburn I will cause to fall away,    And round thee fling a cloak which all shall see    With loathing. I will make thy lustrous eyes    Dull to the sight, and thus shalt thou appear    A squalid wretch to all the suitor train,    And to thy wife, and to the son whom thou    Didst leave within thy palace. Then at first    Repair thou to the herdsman, him who keeps    Thy swine; for he is loyal, and he loves    Thy son and the discreet Penelope.    There wilt thou find him as he tends his swine,    That find their pasturage beside the rock    Of Corax, and by Arethusa’s fount.    On nourishing acorns they are fed, and drink    The dark clear water, whence the flesh of swine    Is fattened. There remain, and carefully    Inquire of all that thou wouldst know, while I,    Taking my way to Sparta, the abode    Of lovely women, call Telemachus,    Thy son, Ulysses, who hath visited    King Menelaus in his broad domain,    To learn if haply thou art living yet.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered her:    “Why didst not thou, to whom all things are known,    Tell him concerning me? Must he too roam    And suffer on the barren deep, and leave    To others his estates, to be their spoil?”  

    And then the blue-eyed goddess spake again:    “Let not that thought distress thee. It was I    Who sent him thither, that he might deserve    The praise of men. No evil meets him there;    But in the halls of Atreus’ son he sits,    Safe mid the abounding luxuries. ’Tis true    That even now the suitors lie in wait,    In their black ship, to slay him ere he reach    His native land; but that will hardly be    Before the earth shall cover many a one    Of the proud suitors who consume thy wealth.”  

    So Pallas spake, and touched him with her wand,    And caused the blooming skin to shrivel up    On his slow limbs, and the fair hair to fall,    And with an old man’s wrinkles covered all    His frame, and dimmed his lately glorious eyes.    Another garb she gave﻿—a squalid vest;    A ragged, dirty cloak, all stained with smoke;    And over all the huge hide of a stag,    From which the hair was worn. A staff, beside,    She gave, and shabby scrip with many a rent,    Tied with a twisted thong. This said and done,    They parted; and the goddess flew to seek    Telemachus in Sparta’s sacred town.  

            Book XIV  Meeting of Ulysses and Eumaeus  

  Hospitable reception by Eumaeus of Ulysses in the disguise of a beggar﻿—His feigned accouut of himself﻿—His promise that Ulysses shall return﻿—Supper in the lodge of Eumaeus﻿—Stratagem of Ulysses to procure a cloak for the night.

      Then from the haven up the rugged path    Ulysses went among the woody heights.    He sought the spot where Pallas bade him meet    The noble swineherd, who of all that served    The great Ulysses chiefly had in charge    To bring the day’s supplies. He found him there    Seated beneath the portico, before    His airy lodge, that might be seen from far,    Well built and spacious, standing by itself.    Eumaeus, while his lord was far away,    Had built it, though not bidden by the queen    Nor old Laertes, with the stones he drew    From quarries thither. Round it he had set    A hedge of thorns, encircling these with stakes    Close set and many, cloven from the heart    Of oak. Within that circuit he had made    Twelve sties, beside each other, for the swine    To lie in. Fifty wallowed in each sty,    All females; there they littered. But the males    Were fewer, and were kept without; and these    The suitor train made fewer every day,    Feeding upon them, for Eumaeus sent    Always the best of all his fatling herd.    These numbered twice nine score. Beside them slept    Four mastiffs, which the master swineherd fed,    Savage as wolves. Eumaeus to his feet    Was fitting sandals, which he carved and shaped    From a stained ox-hide, while the other hinds    Were gone on different errands﻿—three to drive    The herds of swine﻿—a fourth was sent to take    A fatling to the city, that the crew    Of arrogant suitors, having offered him    In sacrifice, might feast upon his flesh.  

    The loud-mouthed dogs that saw Ulysses come    Ran toward him, fiercely baying. He sat down    At once, through caution, letting fall his staff    Upon the ground, and would have suffered there    Unseemly harm, within his own domain,    But then the swineherd, following with quick steps,    Rushed through the vestibule, and dropped the hide.    He chid the dogs and, pelting them with stones,    Drave them asunder, and addressed the king:﻿—  

    “O aged man, the mastiffs of the lodge    Had almost torn thee, and thou wouldst have cast    Bitter reproach upon me. Other griefs    And miseries the gods have made my lot.    Here sorrowfully sitting I lament    A godlike master, and for others tend    His fading swine; while, haply hungering    For bread, he wanders among alien men    In other kingdoms, if indeed he lives    And looks upon the sun. But follow me,    And come into the house, that there, refreshed    With food and wine, old man, thou mayst declare    Whence thou dost come and what thou hast endured.”  

    So the good swineherd spake, and led the way    Into the lodge, and bade his guest sit down,    And laid thick rushes for his seat, and spread    On these a wild goat’s shaggy hide to make    A soft and ample couch. Rejoiced to meet    So kind a welcome, thus Ulysses spake:﻿—  

    “May Jupiter and all the deathless gods    Bestow on thee, my host, in recompense    Of this kind welcome, all thy heart’s desire!”  

    And then, Eumaeus, thou didst answer thus:    “My guest, it were not right to treat with scorn    A stranger, though he were of humbler sort    Than thou, for strangers and the poor are sent    By Jove; our gifts are small, though gladly given,    As it must ever be with those who serve    Young masters, whom they fear. The gods themselves    Prevent, no doubt, the safe return of him    Who loved me much, and would ere this have given    What a kind lord is wont to give his hind﻿—    A house, a croft, the wife whom he has wooed,    Rewarding faithful services which God    Hath prospered, as he here hath prospered mine.    Thus would my master, had he here grown old,    Have recompensed my toils; but he is dead.    O that the house of Helen, for whose sake    So many fell, had perished utterly!    For he went forth at Agamemnon’s call,    Honoring the summons, and on Ilium’s coast,    Famed for its coursers, fought the sons of Troy.”  

    He spake, and girt his tunic round his loins,    And hastened to the sties in which the herds    Of swine were lying. Thence he took out two    And slaughtered them, and singed them, sliced the flesh,    And fixed it upon spits, and, when the whole    Was roasted, brought and placed it reeking hot,    Still on the spits and sprinkled with white meal,    Before Ulysses. Then he mingled wine    Of delicate flavors in a wooden bowl,    And opposite Ulysses sat him down,    And thus with kindly words bespake his guest:﻿—  

    “Feast, stranger, on these porkers. We who serve    May feed on them; it is the suitor train    That banquet on the fatted swine﻿—the men    Who neither fear heaven’s anger nor are moved    By pity. The great gods are never pleased    With violent deeds; they honor equity    And justice. Even those who land as foes    And spoilers upon foreign shores, and bear    Away much plunder by the will of Jove,    Returning homeward with their laden barques,    Feel, brooding heavily upon their minds,    The fear of vengeance. But these suitors know﻿—    For haply they have heard some god declare﻿—    That he, the king, is dead; they neither make    Their suit with decency, nor will withdraw    To their own homes, but at their ease devour    His substance with large waste, and never spare.    Of all the days and nights which Jupiter    Gives to mankind is none when they require    A single victim only, or but two,    For sacrifice, and lavishly they drain    His wine-jars. Once large revenues were his.    No hero on the dark-soiled continent    Nor in the isle of Ithaca possessed    Such wealth as he, nor even twenty men    Together. Hear me while I give the amount.    Twelve herds of kine that on the mainland graze    Are his, as many flocks of sheep, of swine    As many droves; as many flocks of goats    Are tended there by strangers, and by hinds,    His servants. Here moreover, in the fields    Beyond us, graze eleven numerous flocks    Of goats, attended by his trusty men,    Each one of whom brings daily home a goat,    The finest of the fatlings. I meantime    Am keeper of these swine, and from the drove    I choose and to the palace send the best.”  

    So spake the swineherd, while Ulysses ate    The flesh with eager appetite, and drank    The wine in silence, meditating woe    To all the suitors. When the meal was o’er,    And he was strengthened by the food, his host    Filled up with wine the cup from which he drank.    And gave it to Ulysses, who, well pleased,    Received it, and with winged words replied:﻿—  

    “What rich and mighty chief was he, my friend,    Of whom thou speakest, and who purchased thee?    Thou sayest that he died to swell the fame    Of Agamemnon. Tell his name, for I    Perchance know somewhat of him. Jupiter    And the great gods know whether I have seen    The man, and have some tidings for thy ear;    For I have wandered over many lands.”  

    And then again the noble swineherd spake:    “O aged man, no wanderer who should bring    News of Ulysses e’er would win his wife    And son to heed the tale. For roving men,    In need of hospitality, are prone    To falsehood, and will never speak the truth.    The vagabond who comes to Ithaca    Goes straightway to my mistress with his lies.    Kindly she welcomes him, and cherishes    And questions him, while tears abundantly    Fall from her lids﻿—such tears as women shed    Whose lords have perished in a distant land.    Thou too, old man, perchance, couldst readily    Frame a like fable, if someone would give    A change of raiment for thy news﻿—a cloak    And tunic. But the dogs and fowls of air    Have doubtless fed upon the frame from which    The life has passed, and torn from off his bones    The skin, or fishes of the deep have preyed    Upon it, and his bones upon the shore    Lie whelmed in sand. So is he lost to us,    And sorrow is the lot of all his friends,    Mine most of all; for nowhere shall I find    So kind a master, though I were to come    Into my father’s and my mother’s house,    Where I was born and reared. Nor do I pine    So much to look on them with my own eyes,    And in my place of birth, as I lament    Ulysses lost. Though he be far away,    Yet must I ever speak, O stranger guest,    His name with reverence, for exceedingly    He loved me and most kindly cared for me;    And though he is to be with us no more,    I hold him as an elder brother still.”  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, thus replied:    “Since then, my friend, thou dost not say nor think    That he will come again, nor wilt believe    My words, I now repeat, but with an oath,    Ulysses will return. Let this reward    Be given for my good news: the very hour    When he once more is in his house, bestow    On me a comely change of raiment﻿—cloak    And tunic﻿—nor will I accept the gift,    Though great my need, until he comes again.    For as the gates of hell do I detest    The man who, tempted by his poverty,    Deceives with lying words. Now Jupiter    Bear witness, and this hospitable board    And hearth of good Ulysses where I sit,    That all which I foretell will come to pass.    This very year Ulysses will return.    He, when this month goes out, and as the next    Is entering, will be here in his domain,    To be avenged on those, whoe’er they be,    That dare insult his wife and noble son.”  

    And then, Eumaeus, thou didst answer thus:    “Old man, I shall not give thee that reward,    For never will Ulysses come again    To his own palace. Drink thy wine in peace,    And let us give our thoughts to other things.    Remind me not of this again; my heart    Grows heavy in my bosom when I hear    My honored master named. But leave the oath    Unsworn, and may Ulysses come, as we    Earnestly wish﻿—I and Penelope,    And old Laertes, and the godlike youth    Telemachus. And then, again, I bear    Perpetual sorrow for Telemachus,    My master’s son, to whom the gods had given    A generous growth like that of some young plant,    And who, I hoped, would prove no less in worth    Than his own father, and of eminent gifts    In form and mind. Some god, perchance some man,    Hath caused that mind to lose its equal poise,    And he is gone to Pylos the divine    For tidings of his father. Meanwhile here    The arrogant suitors plan to lie in wait    For him as he returns, that utterly    The stock of great Arcesius from our isle    May perish, and its name be heard no more.    Speak we no more of him, be it his fate    To fall or flee; but O, may Saturn’s son    Protect him with his arm! And now, old man,    Relate, I pray, thy fortunes; tell me true,    That I may know who thou mayst be, and whence    Thou earnest, where thy city lies, and who    Thy parents were, what galley landed thee    Upon our coast, and how the manners    Brought thee to Ithaca, and of what race    They claim to be; for I may well suppose    Thou hast not come to Ithaca on foot.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered him:    “I will tell all and truly. Yet if here    Were store of food, and wine for many days,    And we might feast at ease within thy lodge    While other labored, I should hardly end    In a whole year the history of the woes    Which I have borne, and of the many toils    Which it hath pleased the gods to lay on me.  

    “It is my boast that I am of the race    Who dwell in spacious Crete, a rich man’s son,    Within whose palace many other sons    Were born and reared, the offspring of his wife;    But me a purchased mother whom he made    His concubine brought forth to him. And yet    Castor Hylacides, from whom I sprang,    Held me in equal favor with the rest;    And he himself was honored like a god    Among the Cretan people, for his wealth    And for his prosperous life and gallant sons.    But fate and death o’ertook and bore him down    To Pluto’s realm, and his magnanimous sons    Divided his large riches, casting lots.    Small was the portion they assigned to me;    They gave a dwelling, but my valor won    A bride, the daughter of a wealthy house﻿—    For I was not an idler, nor in war    A coward; but all that is with the past.    And thou, who seest the stubble now, mayst guess    What was the harvest, ere calamities    Had come so thick upon me. Once did Mars    And Pallas lend me courage, and the power    To break through ranks of armed men. Whene’er    I formed an ambush of the bravest chiefs,    And planned destruction to the enemy,    My noble spirit never set the fear    Of death before me; I was ever first    To spring upon the foes, and with my spear    To smite them as they turned their steps to flee.    Such was I once in war; to till the fields    I never liked, nor yet the household cares    By which illustrious sons are reared. I loved    Ships well appointed, combats, polished spears    And arrows. Things that others hold in dread    Were my delight; some god inclined to them    My mind﻿—so true it is that different men    Rejoice in different labors. Ere the sons    Of Greece embarked for Troy, I served in war    Nine times as leader against foreign foes,    With troops and galleys under me, and then    I prospered; from the mass of spoil I chose    The things that pleased me, and obtained by lot    Still other treasures. Thus my household grew    In riches, and I was revered and great    Among the Cretans. When all-seeing Jove    Decreed the unhappy voyage to the coast    Of Troy, they made the great Idomeneus    And me commanders of the fleet. No power    Had we﻿—the public clamor was so fierce﻿—    To put the charge aside. Nine years we warred﻿—    We sons of Greece﻿—and in the tenth laid waste    The city of Priam, and embarked for home.    Our fleets were scattered by the gods. For me    Did all-disposing Jupiter ordain    A wretched lot. But one short month I dwelt    Happy among my children, with the wife    Wedded to me in youth, and my large wealth.    And then I planned a voyage to the coast    Of Egypt, with a gallant fleet, and men    Of godlike valor. I equipped nine ships,    And quickly came the people to embark.    Six days on shore my comrades banqueted,    And many a victim for the sacrifice    And for the feast I gave; the seventh we sailed    From Crete’s broad isle before a favoring wind    That blew from the clear north, and easily    We floated on as down a stream. No ship    Was harmed upon its way; in health and ease    We sat, the wind and helmsmen guiding us,    And came upon the fifth day to the land    Of Egypt, watered by its noble streams.    I bade my comrades keep beside our ships    Upon the strand, and watch them well. I placed    Sentries upon the Heights. Yet confident    In their own strength, and rashly giving way    To greed, my comrades ravaged the fair fields    Of the Egyptians, slew them, and bore off 325 Their wives and little ones. The rumor reached    The city soon; the people heard the alarm    And came together. With the early morn    All the great plain was thronged with horse and foot,    And gleamed with brass; while Jove, the Thunderer, sent    A deadly fear into our ranks, where none    Dared face the foe. On every side was death.    The Egyptians hewed down many with the sword,    And some they led away alive to toil    For them in slavery. To my mind there came    A thought, inspired by Jove; yet I could wish    That I had met my fate, and perished there    In Egypt, such have been my sorrows since.    I took the well-wrought helmet from my head,    And from my shoulders dropped the shield, and flung    The javelin from my hand, and went to meet    The monarch in his chariot, clasped his knees    And kissed them. He was moved to pity me,    And spared me. In his car he seated me,    And bore me weeping home. Though many rushed    At me with ashen spears, to thrust me through﻿—    For furious was their anger﻿—he forbade.    He feared the wrath of Jove, the stranger’s friend    And foe of wrong. Seven years I dwelt among    The Egyptians, and I gathered in their land    Large wealth, for all were liberal of their gifts.    But with the eighth revolving year there came    A shrewd Phoenician, deep in guile, whose craft    Had wrought much wrong to many. With smooth words    This man persuaded me to go with him    Into Phoenicia, where his dwelling lay    And his possessions. With him I abode    For one whole year; and when its months and days    Were ended, and another year began,    He put me in a ship to cross the sea    To Lybia. He had framed a treacherous plot,    By making half the vessel’s cargo mine,    To lure me thither, and to sell me there    For a large price. I went on board constrained,    But with misgivings. Under a clear sky,    With favoring breezes from the north, we ran    O’er the mid sea, beyond the isle of Crete.    When we had left the isle, and saw no land    But only sky and sea, Saturnius bade    A black cloud gather o’er our roomy ship.    The sea grew dark below. On high the God    Thundered again and yet again, and sent    A bolt into our ship, which, as it felt    The lightning, reeled and shuddered, and was filled    With sulphur-smoke. The seamen from the deck    Fell headlong, and were tossed upon the waves    Like seamews round our galley, which the God    Forbade them to regain. But Jupiter    Gave to my hands, bewildered as I was,    Our dark-prowed galley’s mast, unbroken yet,    That by its aid I might escape. I wound    My arms around it, and the raging winds    Swept me along. Nine days they bore me on,    And on the tenth dark night a mighty surge    Drifted me, as it rolled, upon the coast    Of the Thesprotians. There the hero-king    Of the Thesprotians freely sheltered me    And fed me; for his well-beloved son    Had found me overcome with cold and toil,    And took me by the hand and raised me up,    And led me to his father’s house, and gave    Seemly attire, a tunic and a cloak.  

    “There heard I of Ulysses. Pheidon told    How he received him as a guest and friend,    When on his homeward voyage. Then he showed    The wealth Ulysses gathered, brass and gold,    And steel divinely wrought. That store might serve    To feed, until ten generations pass,    Another household. But the chief himself,    So Pheidon said, was at Dodona then;    For he had gone to hear from the tall oak    Of Jupiter the counsel of the God,    Whether to land in opulent Ithaca,    After long years of absence, openly    Or in disguise. The monarch took an oath    In his own palace, pouring to the gods    Their wine, that even then the ship was launched,    And the crew ready to attend him home.    But me he first dismissed. There was a ship    Of the Thesprotians just about to make    A voyage to Dulichium, rich in fields    Of wheat. He bade them take me faithfully    To King Acastus; but another thought    Found favor with the crew, a wicked scheme    To plunge me deeper in calamity.    And when our ship had sailed away from land,    They hastened to prepare me for a life    Of slavery. They took my garments off,    Mantle and cloak, and clothed me in a vest    And cloak, the very rags which thou dost see.    The evening brought them to the pleasant fields    Of Ithaca. They bound me in the ship    With a strong cord, and disembarked, and took    A hasty meal upon the ocean-side;    Easily did the gods unbind my limbs.    I wrapped a tattered cloth about my head,    And, slipping from the polished rudder, brought    My bosom to the sea, and spread my hands,    And swam away. I soon had left the crew    At distance; then I turned and climbed the shore,    Where it was dark with forest, and lay close    Within its shelter, while they wandered round    And grumbled, but they ventured not to pass    Into the island farther on their search.    They turned, and went on board their roomy barque.    Thus mightily the gods delivered me,    And they have brought me to a wise man’s lodge,    And now I see it is my lot to live.”  

    Then thou, Eumaeus, thus didst make reply:    “Unhappy stranger, thou hast deeply moved    My heart in telling all that thou hast borne,    And all thy wanderings. Yet are some things wrong.    Thou hast not spoken of Ulysses well.    Why should a man like thee invent such tales,    So purposeless? Of one thing I am sure    Concerning his return﻿—the gods all hate    My master, since they neither caused his death    In the great war of Troy, nor, when the war    Was over, suffered him to die at home,    And in the arms of those who loved him most;    For then would all the Greeks have reared to him    A monument, and mighty would have been    The heritage of glory for his son;    But now ingloriously the harpy brood    Have torn him. I, apart among my swine,    Go never to the town, unless, perchance,    The sage Penelope requires me there,    When someone comes with tidings from abroad.    Then those who sorrow for their absent lord,    And those who waste his substance, both inquire    News of the king. For me, it suits me not    Ever to ask for tidings, since the day    When an Aetolian with a flattering tale    Deceived me. He had slain a man, and came    Wandering in many lands to my abode,    And kindly I received him. He had seen,    He said, my master with Idomeneus,    Among the Cretans, putting in repair    His galleys, shattered by a furious storm,    And in the summer time he would be here,    Or in the autumn, bringing ample wealth,    And his brave comrades with him. Seek not then,    O aged sufferer, whom some deity    Has guided hither, to amuse my grief    With fictions that may bring back pleasant thoughts,    Since not for them I minister to thee    And love thee, but through reverence for Jove﻿—    The stranger’s friend﻿—and pity for thyself.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, spake again:    “Within thy bosom thou dost bear a heart    Of slow belief, since not the oath I take    Persuades or even moves thee. Make we now    A covenant, and let the gods who dwell    Upon Olympus be our witnesses,    That when thy master comes to this abode    Thou wilt bestow a tunic and a cloak,    And wilt despatch me clothed in seemly garb    Hence to Dulichium, whither I would go.    But if he come not as I have foretold,    Then charge thy servants that they cast me down    From a tall rock, that never beggar more    May think to cozen thee with lying tales.”  

    The noble swineherd answered him and said:    “Great would my honor be, and I should gain    Great praise for worth among the sons of men,    If, having welcomed thee into my lodge    And spread the board for thee, I took thy life;    Then boldly might I pray to Saturn’s son.    But see, the supper hour is come, and soon    Will my companions be within, and they    Will make a liberal banquet ready here.”  

    Thus did the twain confer. Now came the swine,    And those who tended them. They penned the herd    In their enclosure, and a din of cries    Rose as they entered. Then the swineherd called    To his companions: “Bring the best of all,    And we will make an offering for the sake    Of one who comes from far and is my guest.    And we will also feast, for we have toiled    Long time in tendance of this white-toothed herd,    And others waste, unpunished, what we rear.”  

    So spake he, and began to cleave the wood    With the sharp steel; the others chose and brought    A fatted brawn, and placed him on the hearth.    Nor was the swineherd careless of the rites    Due to the gods﻿—such was his piety.    From off the white-toothed victim first he sheared    The bristles of the forehead, casting them    Into the flames, and prayed to all the gods    For wise Ulysses and his safe return.    Next, with a fragment of the oaken trunk    Which he had just then cleft, he smote the boar,    And the life left it. Then they cut its throat,    And, having singed it, quickly hewed the parts    Asunder, while the swineherd took and laid,    On the rich fat, raw portions from the limbs    For sacrifice, and other parts he cast,    Sprinkled with flour of meal, into the flames;    The rest they duly sliced and fixed on spits,    And roasted carefully, and drew it back,    And heaped it on the board. And now arose    The swineherd to divide the whole, for well    He knew the duty of a host. He made    Seven parts; and one he offered to the Nymphs,    To Hermes, son of Maia, one, and both    With prayer; the rest he set before the guests,    But, honoring Ulysses, gave to him    The white-toothed victim’s ample chine. The king,    The wise Ulysses, was well pleased, and said:﻿—  

    “Eumaeus, be thou ever dear to Jove    As to myself, since with thy benefits    Thou freely honorest such a one as I.”  

    And thou, Eumaeus, madest answer thus:    “Eat, venerable stranger, and enjoy    What is before us. At his pleasure God    Gives or withholds; his power is over all.”  

    He spake, and burned to the eternal gods    The firstlings, and poured out the dark red wine,    And to Ulysses, spoiler of walled towns,    Who sat beside the table, gave the cup.    Meantime to each Mesaulius brought the bread﻿—    A servant whom Eumaeus, while his lord    Was far away, had taken for himself,    Without the order of Penelope    Or old Laertes; from the Taphian tribe    With his own goods he bought him. Now the guests    Put forth their hands and shared the ready feast;    And when their thirst and hunger were appeased    Mesaulius took the bread away, and all,    Satiate with food and wine, lay down to rest.  

    Then came the darkness on, without a moon;    And Jupiter the whole night long sent down    The rain, and strong the showery west-wind blew.    And now to try the swineherd, if with all    His kindly ministrations to his guest    He yet would spare to him his cloak, or bid    Another do the like, Ulysses spake:﻿—  

    “Eumaeus, hearken thou, and all the rest,    Thy comrades, while I utter boastful words.    Wine makes me foolish, it can even cause    The wise to sing and laugh a silly laugh    And dance, and often to the lips it brings    Words that were better left unsaid. But since    I have begun to prattle, I will not    Keep back my thought. I would I were as young    And in the same full strength as when I formed    Part of an ambush near the walls of Troy.    The leaders were Ulysses, and the son    Of Atreus, Menelaus, with myself    The third, for they desired it. When we reached    The city and the lofty walls we lay    Couched in a marshy spot among the reeds    And thick-grown shrubs, with all our armor on.    ’Twas an inclement night, and the north-wind    Blew bitter chill, the cold snow fell and lay    White like hoar frost; ice gathered on our shields.    The rest had cloaks and tunics, and they slept    At ease, their shoulders covered with their shields.    I only, when I joined the squadron, left    My cloak unwisely, for I had not thought    Of such fierce cold. I went but with my shield    And my embroidered girdle. When the night    Was in its later watches, and the stars    Were turning toward their set, I thus bespake    Ulysses near me, thrusting in his side    My elbow, and he listened readily:﻿—  

    “ ‘Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise!    Ulysses, I shall not be long among    The living; for I perish with the cold.    I have no cloak; some god misled my thought,    So that I brought one garment and no more,    And now I see there is no help for me.’  

    “I spake, and instantly his mind conceived    This stratagem﻿—such was his readiness    In council and in battle﻿—and he said    To me in a low voice: ‘Be silent now,    And let no others of the Achaians hear!’    And leaning on his elbow thus he spake:﻿—  

    “ ‘Hear me, my friends: a dream has come from heaven    Into my sleep. Far from our ships we lie;    And now let someone haste to bear from us    This word to Agamemnon, Atreus’ son,    The shepherd of the people, that he send    More warriors to this ambush from the fleet.’  

    “He spake, and Thoas instantly arose﻿—    Andraemon’s son﻿—and threw his purple cloak    Aside, and hastened toward the fleet. I took    Gladly the garment he had left, and lay    Till Morning in her golden chariot came.    And now I would that I were young again,    And in the vigor of my prime, for then    Someone among the swineherds in the stalls    Would find, I think, a cloak for me, through love    And reverence of such a man; but now    They hold me in slight favor, dressed in rags.”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “O aged man! we see no cause of blame    In thy recital, and of all thy words    Not one is unbecoming or inapt.    Thou shalt not lack for garments, nor aught else    That any suppliant in his poverty    Might hope for at our hands tonight. With morn    Gird thou thy tatters on again; for here    We have not many cloaks, nor many a change    Of raiment﻿—only one for each of us.    But when the son of our Ulysses comes    Again, he will provide thee with a cloak    And tunic, and will send thee where thou wilt.”  

    He spake and rose, and made his guest a bed    Close to the hearth, and threw on it the skins    Of sheep and goats, and there Ulysses lay,    O’er whom the swineherd spread a thick large cloak,    Which he had often worn for a defence    When a wild winter storm was in the air.  

    Thus slept Ulysses with the young men near.    A couch within, and distant from his charge,    Pleased not the swineherd, who first armed himself,    And then went forth. Ulysses gladly saw    That while he was in distant lands his goods    Were watched so faithfully. Eumaeus hung    About his sturdy shoulders a sharp sword,    And wrapped a thick cloak round him, tempest-proof,    And took the hide of a huge pampered goat,    And a well-pointed javelin for defence    Both against dogs and men. So went he forth    To take his rest where lay the white-toothed swine,    Herded and slumbering underneath a rock,    Whose hollow fenced themfrom the keen north-wind.  

            Book XV  Return of Telemachus  

  Appearance of Pallas in a dream to Telemachus, warning him to return to Ithaca﻿—His departure from Lacedaemon, and arrival at Pylos﻿—Theoclymenus, an augur, taken on board by him at Pylos﻿—The story of Eumaeus related by him to Ulysses﻿—Arrival of Telemachus at the coast of Ithaca﻿—The ship sent forward to the city, while Telemachus, having committed Theoclymenus to the care of his friend Piraeus, goes to the lodge of Eumaeus.

      Then Pallas, hastening to the mighty realm    Of Lacedaemon, sought the illustrious son    Of great Ulysses, to remind the youth    Of home, and bid him think of his return.    She found Telemachus and Nestor’s son    Upon their couches in the portico    Of Menelaus, the renowned. Deep sleep    Held Nestor’s son; but to Telemachus    The welcome slumber came not, for his thoughts    Uneasily through all the quiet night    Dwelt on his father. Now beside his bed    The blue-eyed Pallas took her stand and spake:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, it is no longer well    That thou shouldst wander from thy home, and leave    All thy possessions, and those arrogant men    That crowd thy halls. Beware, lest they devour    Thy substance utterly, dividing all    Among them, and this journey be for naught.    Make suit to Menelaus, great in war,    Quickly to send thee home, that thou mayst join    Thy blameless mother in thy halls; for now    Her father and her brothers counsel her    To wed Eurymachus, whose gifts exceed    Those of the other suitors, and besides    He offers a yet richer bridal dower.    It were not hard without thy leave to take    Wealth from a palace. What a wife will do    Thou knowest. ’Tis her pleasure to increase    The riches of the man whom she has wed.    Care of her former children has she none,    Nor memory of the husband whom she took    While yet a maid, and who is in his grave;    Of these she never speaks. Return thou, then,    And give thy goods in charge to one among    The handmaids of thy household who shall seem    The fittest for the trust, until the gods    Bring thee a noble wife. Another word    Have I for thee, and bear thou it in mind:    The chief among the suitors in the strait    Between the rugged Samos and the isle    Of Ithaca are lurking, in the hope    To slay thee on thy voyage home; but this    I think they cannot do before the earth    Hold many of the suitor-crew who make    Thy wealth a spoil. Steer thou thy gallant barque    Far from the isles; sail only in the night.    Some god, whoever it may be that keeps    Watch over thee, will send a prosperous gale.    When to the nearest shore of Ithaca    Thou comest in thy ship, let it go on,    With all thy comrades, to the town, while thou    Repairest to the keeper of thy swine,    Whose heart is faithful to thee. There remain    With him that night, and send him to the town    With tidings to the sage Penelope    That thou art come from Pylos and art safe.”  

    So having said, the goddess took her way    Up to the Olympian height. Telemachus    Touched with his heel and wakened Nestor’s son    From a soft slumber and bespake him thus:﻿—  

    “Rise, Nestor’s son, Peisistratus, and bring    The firm-paced steeds and yoke them to the car,    And we will now set forth upon our way.”  

    And Nestor’s son, Peisistratus, replied:    “Telemachus, whatever be our haste,    It were not well in darkness to begin    Our journey, and the morn will soon be here.    Remain till Menelaus, Atreus’ son,    The hero mighty with the spear, shall come,    And bring his gifts, and place them in our car,    And send us on our way with kindly words.    Well does a guest remember all his days    The generous host who shows himself his friend.”  

    He spake, and quickly on her car of gold    Appeared the Mom. Then Menelaus came,    The great in battle, from his couch beside    The fair-haired Helen. When Telemachus    Knew of the king’s approach, the hero threw    In haste his tunic o’er his noble form,    And over his broad shoulders flung a cloak    Of ample folds. Then, going forth, the son    Of great Ulysses met the king and said:﻿—  

    “Atrides Menelaus, loved of Jove    And sovereign of the people, send me hence,    I pray, to the dear country of my birth,    For earnestly I long to be at home.”  

    And Menelaus, great in war, replied:    “Telemachus, I will not keep thee long,    Since thou so much desirest to return.    I am displeased with him who as a host    Is lavish of his love, for he will hate    Beyond due measure; best it is to take    The middle way. It is alike a wrong    To thrust the unwilling stranger out of doors,    And to detain him when he longs to go.    While he is with us we should cherish him,    And, when he wishes, help him to depart.    Remain until I bring thee worthy gifts    And place them in thy chariot, that thine eyes    May look on them; and I will give command    That in the palace here the women spread    A liberal feast from stores that lie within.    But if, in turning from thy course, thou choose    To pass through Hellas and the midland tract    Of Argos, I will yoke my steeds and go    With thee, and show the cities thronged with men;    Nor will they send us empty-handed thence,    But bring us gifts which we may bear away﻿—    Tripod, perchance, or caldron wrought of brass,    Perchance a pair of mules or golden cup.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus in turn:    “Atrides Menelaus, loved of Jove    And sovereign of the people, rather far    Would I return to my own home; for there    Is no man left in charge of what is mine,    And I must go, lest, while I vainly seek    My father, I may perish, or may lose    Some valued treasure from my palace rooms.”  

    The valiant Menelaus heard, and bade    His wife and maidens spread without delay    A ready banquet from the stores within.    Then Eteöneus from his morning sleep,    Son of Boëtheus, came, for very near    His dwelling was. The sovereign bade him light    A fire and roast the flesh, and he obeyed.    And then into the fragrant treasure-room    Descended Menelaus, not alone;    Helen and Megapenthes went with him.    And when they came to where the treasures lay,    Atrides took a double goblet up,    And bade his son, young Megapenthes, bear    A silver beaker thence, while Helen stood    Beside the coffers where the embroidered robes    Wrought by her hands were laid. The glorious dame    Took one and brought it forth, most beautiful    In needlework, and amplest of them all.    The garment glittered like a star, and lay    Below the other robes. Then, passing through    The palace halls, they found Telemachus,    And thus the fair-haired Menelaus spake:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, may Jove the Thunderer,    Husband of Juno, grant thee to return    According to thy wish! I give thee here    Of all the treasures which my house contains    The fairest and most precious. I present    A goblet all of silver, save the lips,    And they are bound with gold; it is the work    Of Vulcan. Phaedimus the hero, king    Of the Sidonians, gave it me when once    His palace sheltered me. He gave it me    At parting, and I now would have it thine.”  

    Atrides spake, and gave into his hands    The double goblet. Megapenthes next    Before him set the shining beaker wrought    Of silver. Rosy Helen, holding up    The robe, drew near, and spake to him and said:﻿—  

    “I also bring to thee, dear son, a gift,    The work of Helen’s hands, which thou shalt keep,    In memory of her, until the day    Of thy desired espousals, when thy bride    Shall wear it. Let it in the meantime lie    Within thy halls, in thy dear mother’s care;    And mayst thou soon and happily arrive    At thy fair palace and thy native coast.”  

    So spake she, placing in his hands the robe.    He took it, and was glad. Peisistratus    Was moved with wonder as he saw, and laid    The presents in the car. The fair-haired king    Then led them to the hall, and seated them    On thrones and couches, where a maiden brought    Water in a fair golden ewer, and o’er    A silver basin poured it for their hands,    And near them set a table smoothly wrought.    The matron of the palace brought them bread    And many a delicate dish to please the taste    From stores within the house. Then to the board    Boëtheus’ son drew near and carved the meats,    And gave to each a portion, while the son    Of glorious Menelaus poured the wine.    The guests put forth their hands and shared the food    That lay prepared before them. When the calls    Of thirst and hunger ceased, Telemachus    And Nestor’s famous son brought forth and yoked    The steeds, and climbed into the sumptuous car,    And drove from out the echoing portico.    Atrides Menelaus, amber-haired,    Went forth with them, and, holding in his hand    A golden cup of generous wine, poured out    An offering for their voyage to the gods.    Before the steeds he took his stand, and first    Drank from the cup, and then bespake the guests:﻿—  

    “Now fare ye well, young men, and when ye come    To Nestor, shepherd of the people, give    Greetings from me; for he was kind to me    As if he were a father, when the sons    Of Greece were warring in the realm of Troy.”  

    Then spake in turn discreet Telemachus:    “Assuredly I shall relate to him,    As soon as I am with him, all that thou,    foster-child of Jove, hast bid me say;    And would to heaven I might as surely tell    Ulysses in his palace, when again    I come to Ithaca, how welcome thou    Hast made me here, and how I came away    With treasures rich and many from thy court.”  

    As thus he spake, an eagle to the right    Appeared, that, flying, bore a large white goose,    Clutched from the tame flock in the palace court;    And men and women ran the way he flew,    And shouted after him. Before the steeds    Of the young men, and still on the right hand,    The bird went sweeping on. They saw well pleased,    And every heart was gladdened. To the rest    Peisistratus, the son of Nestor, said:﻿—  

    “Now tell me, Menelaus, loved of Jove,    Prince of the people! does the god who sends    This portent mean the sign for us or thee?”  

    He spake; and Menelaus, dear to Mars,    Paused, thinking how to answer him aright,    When thus the long-robed Helen interposed:﻿—  

    “Listen to me, and I will prophesy    As the gods prompt me, and as I believe    The event will be. Just as this eagle came    From the wild hills, his birthplace and his haunt,    And seized and bore away the waterfowl    Reared near our halls, so will Ulysses come,    After much hardship and long wanderings,    To his own home, to be avenged: perchance    Already is at home, and meditates    An evil end to all the suitor crew.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus in turn:    “May Juno’s husband, Jove the Thunderer,    So order the event, and I will there    Make vows to thee as to a deity.”  

    He spake, and touched the coursers with the lash;    And through the city rapidly they went    And toward the plain, and all day long they shook    The yoke upon their necks. The sun went down:    The roads all lay in darkness as they came    To Pherae, and the house of Diodes,    Whose father was Orsilochus, and he    The offspring of Alpheius. There that night    They slept; their host was liberal of his cheer.    But when appeared the daughter of the Dawn,    The rosy-fingered Morn, they yoked the steeds    And climbed the sumptuous car, and drove afield    From underneath the echoing portico.    The son of Nestor plied the lash; the steeds    Flew not unwillingly, and quickly reached    The lofty citadel of Pylos. There    Telemachus bespake his comrade thus:﻿—  

    “Wilt thou consent to do what I shall ask,    O son of Nestor? ’Tis our boast that we    Are friends because our fathers were; besides,    We are of equal age, and journeying thus    Has made our friendship firmer. Take me not,    O foster-child of Jove, beyond the spot    Where lies my galley, lest against my will    The aged Nestor should detain me here    Through kindness, when I needs must hasten home.”  

    He spake, and then the son of Nestor mused    How what his friend desired might best be done.    And this seemed wisest after careful thought:    He turned the chariot to the ship and shore,    And taking out the garments and the gold﻿—    Beautiful gifts which Menelaus gave﻿—    He put them in the galley’s stern, and thus    Bespake Telemachus with winged words:﻿—  

    “Embark in haste, and summon all thy crew    On board before I reach my home and tell    The aged king. I know how vehement    His temper is; he will not let thee go,    But hastening hither to enforce thy stay,    At Pylos, will not, I am sure, go back    Without thee; his displeasure will be great.”  

    He spake, and toward the Pylian city turned    His steeds with flowing manes, and quickly reached    His home. Meantime Telemachus held forth    To his companions, thus exhorting them:﻿—  

    “My friends, make ready all things in our ship    And mount the deck, for we must now set sail.”  

    He spake, they hearkened and obeyed, and leaped    On board and manned the benches. While he thus    Was hastening his departure, offering prayer    And pouring wine to Pallas at the stern,    A stranger came, a seer, a fugitive    From Argos, where his hand had slain a man.    Melampus was his ancestor, who dwelt    Some time in Pylos, mother of fair flocks﻿—    Rich, and inhabiting a sumptuous house    Among the Pylians. Afterward he joined    Another people, fleeing from his home    And from the mighty Neleus, haughtiest    Of living men, who, seizing his large wealth,    Held it a year by force. Melampus lay    Meantime within the house of Phylacus    Fast bound, and suffering greatly, both because    Of Neleus’ daughter, and of his own mind    Distempered by the unapproachable    Erinnys. Yet did he escape from death,    And drove the lowing herds to Phylace    And Pylos, and avenged his cruel wrong    On Neleus, carrying off his child to be    A consort for his brother. Then he came    Into the realm of Argos, famed for steeds;    For there it was decreed that he should dwell,    And rule o’er many of the Argive race.    And there he took a wife and built a house﻿—    A lofty pile; and there to him were born Antiphates and Mantius, valiant men.    Antiphates was father of a son,    The brave O’icleus, and to him was born    Amphioraüs, one of those whose voice    Rouses the nations. Aegis-bearing Jove    And Phoebus loved him with exceeding love;    Yet reached he not the threshold of old age,    But, through the treachery of his bribed wife,    Perished too soon at Thebes. To him were born    Two sons, Alcmaeon and Amphilochus.    Clytus and Polyphides were the sons    Of Mantius; but Aurora, she who fills    A golden chariot, bore away to heaven    Clytus for his great beauty, there to dwell    Among the immortals, while Apollo gave    To Polyphides of the noble mind    To be a prophet, first of living men,    Since now Amphiaraüs was no more.    His father had displeased him, and he went    To Hyperesia, where he dwelt, and there    Revealed to all what yet should come to pass.  

    It was his son who now approached; his name    Was Theoclymenus; he saw the prince    Telemachus, who stood beside the swift    Black ship, and, pouring a libation, prayed;    And thus he said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “My friend, whom here beside this barque I find    Making a pious offering, I entreat    Both by that offering and the deity,    And by thy life, and by the lives of these    Who follow thee, declare to me the truth,    And keep back naught of all that I inquire﻿—    Who art thou, from what race of men, and where    Thy city lies, and who thy parents are.”  

    Then spake in turn discreet Telemachus:    “Stranger, to every point I answer thee.    I am by race a son of Ithaca,    My father was Ulysses when alive,    But he has died a miserable death;    Long years has he been absent, and I came    With my companions here, and this black ship,    To gather tidings of my father’s fate.”  

    Then said the godlike Theoclymenus:    “I too, like thee, am far away from home;    For I have slain a man of my own tribe,    And he had many brothers, many friends,    In Argos famed for steeds. Great is the power    Of those Achaians, and I flee from them    And the black doom of death, to be henceforth    A wanderer among men. O, shelter me    On board thy galley! I, a fugitive,    Implore thy mercy, lest they overtake    And slay me; they are surely on my track.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “If thou desire to come on board my ship,    I shall not hinder thee. Come with us then,    And take a friendly share in what we have.”  

    So saying he received his brazen spear,    And laid it on the good ship’s deck, and went    Himself on board, and, taking at the stern    His place, he seated Theoclymenus    Beside him. Then the mariners cast loose    The hawsers, and Telemachus gave forth    The order to prepare for sea. They heard    And eagerly obeyed; they raised the mast,    A pine-tree stem﻿—and, bringing it to stand    In its deep socket, bound it there with cords,    And hoisted by their strongly twisted thongs    The ship’s white sails. The blue-eyed Pallas sent    A favorable and fresh-blowing wind,    That swept the sky to drive more speedily    The galley through the salt-sea waves. They came    To Cruni, and to Chalcis pleasantly    Watered by rivers. Now the sun went down;    Night closed around their way, but onward still    A favorable wind from Jupiter    Toward Pherae bore them, and the hallowed coast    Of Elis, where the Epeian race bear sway,    And then among the isles whose rocky peaks    Rise from the waters. Here Telemachus    Mused thoughtfully on what his fate might be﻿—    To perish by the ambush or escape.  

    Meantime Ulysses and the swineherd sat    At meat within the lodge; the other men    Were at the board, and when the calls of thirst    And hunger ceased, Ulysses spake to try    The swineherd, whether he were bent to show    Yet further kindness, and entreat his stay,    Or whether he would send him to the town.  

    “Eumaeus, hearken thou, and all the rest.    Tomorrow ’tis my wish to go to town,    That I may beg, and be no charge to thee    And thy companions. Give me thy advice,    And send a trusty guide to show the way.    There will I roam the streets, for so I must,    And haply someone there will give a cup    Of wine and cake of meal. And when I find    The house of great Ulysses, I will tell    The sage Penelope the news I bring.    Nay, I would even go among the crew    Of arrogant suitors, who perhaps might give    A meal, for there is plenty at their feasts,    And I would do whatever they require.    For let me tell thee, and do thou give heed,    There lives no man who can contend with me    In menial tasks﻿—to keep alive a fire    With fuel, cleave dry wood, and carve and roast    The meat and pour the wine﻿—whate’er is done    By poor men waiting on the better sort.”  

    And thou, Eumasus, keeper of the swine,    Didst answer in displeasure: “Woe is me!    How could thy bosom harbor such a thought?    O stranger! thou must surely be resolved    To perish if thy purpose be to go    Among the suitor crew, whose insolence    And riot reach the iron vault of heaven.    Not such attendants minister to them    As thou art, but fair youths arrayed in cloaks    And tunics, with sleek heads and smooth of face.    These wait at polished tables heavily    Loaded with bread and flesh and wine. Stay thou    Content among us, sure that no one here    Is wearied by thy presence, neither I    Nor any of my fellows. When he comes,    The dear son of Ulysses will provide    For thee the garments thou dost need﻿—a cloak    And tunic﻿—and will send thee where thou wilt.”  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, answered thus:    “I pray that thou mayst be as dear to Jove,    The great All-Father, as thou art to me,    Since through thy kindness I enjoy a pause    Amid my weary wanderings. There is naught    Worse than a wandering life. Unseemly cares    A hungry stomach brings to homeless men;    Hardship and grief are theirs. But since thou wilt    That I remain and wait for thy young lord,    Speak to me of the mother of thy chief    Ulysses, and his father, whom he left    Just on the threshold of old age, if yet    They live, and still may look upon the sun;    Or have they died, and passed to Pluto’s realm?”  

    And then in turn the master swineherd spake:    “Rightly and truly will I answer thee,    stranger! still Laertes lives, but prays    Continually to Jove that he may die    In his own house; for sorely he laments    His son long absent, and his excellent wife,    Bride of his youth, whose death has brought on him    Sharp sorrow, and old age before its time.    By a sad death she died﻿—through wasting grief    For her lost, glorious son. May no one here,    No friend of mine, nor one who has bestowed    A kindness on me, die by such a death!    While yet she lived, great as her sorrow was,    I loved to speak with her and hear her words;    For she had reared me with her youngest-born﻿—    Her daughter, long-robed Ctimena. With her    Was I brought up, and scarcely less than her    Was held in honor. When at length we came    Into the pleasant years of youth, they sent    The princess hence to Samos, and received at    Large presents; but to me her mother gave    Garments of price, a tunic and a cloak,    And sandals for my feet, and sent me forth    Into the fields, and loved me more and more.    All this is over now, yet must I say    My calling has been prospered by the gods.    Prom this I have the means to eat and drink,    And wherewithal to feast a worthy guest;    But from the queen I never have a word    Or deed of kindness, since that evil came    Upon her house﻿—that crew of lawless men.    Greatly the servants would rejoice to speak    Before their mistress, and inquire her will,    And eat and drink, and carry to their homes    Some gift, for gifts delight a servant’s heart.”  

    Again Ulysses, the sagacious, spake:    “Swineherd Eumaeus, thou, while yet a child,    Wert doubtless strangely tossed about the world,    Far from thy kindred and thy native land.    Now tell me, was the spacious town wherein    Thy father and thy mother dwelt laid waste?    Or wert thou left among the flocks and herds    Untended, and borne off by hostile men,    Who came in ships and sold thee to the lord    Of these possessions for a worthy price?”  

    And then the master swineherd spake again:    “Since thou dost ask me, stranger, hear my words    In silence; sit at ease and drink thy wine.    These nights are very long; there’s time enough    For sleep, and time to entertain ourselves    With talk. It is not fitting to lie down    Ere the due hour arrive, and too much sleep    Is hurtful. Whosoever here shall feel    The strong desire, let him withdraw and sleep,    And rise with early morn and break his fast,    And tend my master’s swine. Let us remain    Within, and drink and feast, and pass the time    Gayly, relating what we have endured,    Each one of us; for in the after time    One who has suffered much and wandered far    May take a pleasure even in his griefs.  

    “But let me tell what thou hast asked of me:    Beyond Ortygia lies an island named    Syria; thou must have heard of it. The sun    Above it turns his course. It is not large,    But fruitful, fit for pasturage, and rich    In flocks, abounding both in wine and wheat.    There never famine comes, nor foul disease    Fastens on wretched mortals; but when men    Grow old, Apollo of the silver bow    Comes with Diana, aims his silent shafts,    And slays them. There two cities stand, and share    The isle between them. There my father reigned,    The godlike Ctesias, son of Ormenus,    And both the cities owned him as their king.  

    “There came a crew of that seafaring race,    The people of Phoenicia, to our isle.    Shrewd fellows they, and brought in their black ship    Large store of trinkets. In my father’s house    Was a Phoenician woman, large and fair,    And skilful in embroidery. As she came    A laundress to their ship, those cunning men    Seduced her. One of them obtained her love﻿—    For oft doth love mislead weak womankind,    Even of the more discreet. Her paramour    Asked who she was, and whence. She pointed out    The lofty pile in which my father dwelt.  

    “ ‘At Sidon, rich in brass, I had my birth﻿—    A daughter of the opulent Arybas;    And once, as I was coming from the fields,    The Taphian pirates seized and bore me off,    And brought me to this isle and sold me here,    At that man’s house; much gold he paid for me.’  

    “Then said her paramour: ‘Wilt thou not then    Return with us, that thou mayst see again    Father and mother, and their fair abode?    For yet they live, and rumor says are rich.’  

    “To this the woman answered: ‘I consent    If first ye take an oath﻿—ye mariners﻿—    And pledge your faith to bear me safely home.’  

    “She spake, and they complied, and when the oath    Was duly taken, thus the woman said:﻿—  

    “ ‘Now hold your peace; let none of all the crew    Speak to me more, in meeting on the road    Or at the fountain, lest someone should tell    The old man at the house, and he suspect    Some fraud and bind me fast, and plot your death.    Lock up your words within your breast; make haste    To buy supplies, and when the ship is full    Of all things needful, let a messenger    Come to me at the palace with all speed;    And I will bring with me whatever gold    My hands may find, and something else to pay    My passage. I am nurse to the young heir    Of the good man who dwells in yonder halls﻿—    A shrewd boy for his years, who oft goes out    With me﻿—and I will lead him to the ship,    And he will bring, in any foreign land    To which ye carry him, a liberal price.’  

    “The woman spake, and to our fair abode    Departed. The Phoenician crew remained    Until the twelvemonth’s end, and filled their ship    With many things, and, when its roomy hull    Was fully laden, sent a messenger    To tell the woman. He, a cunning man,    Came to my father’s house, and brought with him    A golden necklace set with amber beads.    The palace maidens and the gracious queen,    My mother, took it in their hands, and gazed    Upon it, and debated of its price.    Meantime the bearer gave the sign, and soon    Departed to the ship. The woman took    My hand and led me forth. Within the hall    She found upon the tables ready placed    The goblets for my father’s guests, his peers;    But they were absent, and in council yet    Amid a great assembly. She concealed    Three goblets in her bosom, and bore off    The theft. I followed thoughtlessly. The sun    Went down, and darkness brooded o’er the ways.    Briskly we walked, and reached the famous port    And the fast-sailing ship. They took us both    On board, and sailed. Along its ocean path    The vessel ran, and Jupiter bestowed    A favorable wind. Six days we sailed,    Both night and day; but when Saturnian Jove    Brought the seventh day, Diana, archer-queen,    Struck down the woman, and with sudden noise    Headlong she plunged into the hold, as dives    A seagull. But the seamen cast her forth    To fishes and to sea-calves. I was left    Alone and sorrowful. The winds and waves    Carried our galley on to Ithaca;    And there Laertes purchased me, and thus    I first beheld the land in which I dwell.”  

    And then again the great Ulysses spake:    “Eumaeus, the sad story of thy wrongs    And sufferings moves me deeply; yet hath Jove    Among thy evil fortunes given this good,    That, after all thy sufferings, thou art lodged    With a good master, who abundantly    Provides thee meat and drink; thou leadest here    A pleasant life, while I am corae to thee    From wandering long and over many lands.”  

    So talked they with each other. No long time    They passed in sleep, for soon the Morning came,    Throned on her car of gold. Beside the shore    The comrades of Telemachus cast loose    The sails, took down the mast, and with their oars    Brought in the vessel to its place. They threw    The anchors out and bound the hawsers fast,    And went upon the sea-beach, where they dressed    Their morning meal, and mingled purple wine.    Then, when the calls of thirst and hunger ceased,    Discreet Telemachus bespake the crew:﻿—  

    “Take the black ship to town. I visit first    The fields, and see my herdsmen, and at eve    Will come to town. Tomorrow I will give    The parting feast, rich meats and generous wine.”  

    Then said the godlike Theoclymenus:    “Whither, my son, am I to go? What house    Of all the chiefs of rugged Ithaca    Shall I seek shelter in? with thee, perhaps,    In thine own palace where thy mother dwells.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “I would have asked thee at another time    To make our house thy home, for there would be    No lack of kindly welcome. ’Twere not well    To ask thee now, for I shall not be there,    Nor will my mother see thee﻿—since not oft    Doth she appear before the suitor-train,    But in an upper room, apart from them,    Weaves at her loom a web. Another man    I name, Eurymachus, the illustrious son    Of the sage Polybus, to be thy host.    The noblest of the suitors he, and seeks    Most earnestly to wed the queen, and take    The rank Ulysses held. Olympian Jove,    Who dwells in ether, knows the fatal day    That may o’ertake the suitors ere she wed.”  

    As thus he spake, a falcon on the right    Flew by, Apollo’s messenger. A dove    Was in his talons, which he tore, and poured    The feathers down between Telemachus    And where the galley lay. When this was seen    By Theoclymenus, he called the youth    Apart, alone, and took his hand and said:﻿—  

    “The bird that passed us, O Telemachus,    Upon the right, flew not without a god    To guide him. When I saw it, well I knew    The omen. Not in Ithaca exists    A house of a more kingly destiny    Than thine, and ever will its power prevail.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “O stranger, may thy saying come to pass;    Then shalt thou quickly know me for thy friend,    And be rewarded with such liberal gifts    That all who meet thee shall rejoice with thee.”  

    Then turning to Piraeus he bespake    That faithful follower thus: “Pirseus, son    Of Clytius, thou who ever wert the first    To move, at my command, of all the men    Who went with me to Pylos, take, I pray,    This stranger to thy house, and there provide    For him, and honor him until I come.”  

    Piraeus, mighty with the spear, replied:    “Telemachus, however long thy stay,    This man shall be my guest, nor ever lack    Beneath my roof for hospitable care.”  

    He spake, and climbed the deck, and bade his men    Enter the ship and cast the fastenings loose.    Quickly they came together, went on board    And manned the benches, while Telemachus    Bound the fair sandals to his feet, and took    His massive spear with its sharp blade of brass    That lay upon the deck. The men unbound    The hawsers, shoved the galley forth, and sailed    Townward, as they were bidden by the son    Of great Ulysses. Meantime the quick feet    Of the young chieftain bore him on until    He reached the lodge where his great herds of swine    Were fed, and, careful of his master’s wealth,    Beside his charge the worthy swineherd slept.  

            Book XVI  Ulysses Discovering Himself to Telemachus  

  Reception of Telemachus by Eumaeus, who is sent to inform Penelope of her son’s arrival﻿—interview of Ulysses and Telemachus, in which, at the command of Pallas, Ulysses discovers himself﻿—Return of the disappointed suitors from lying in wait for Telemachus.

      Meantime Ulysses and that noble hind    The swineherd, in the lodge, at early dawn,    Lighted a fire, prepared a meal, and sent    The herdsmen forth to drive the swine afield.    The dogs, so apt to bark, came fawning round,    And barked not as Telemachus drew near.    Ulysses heard the sound of coming feet,    And marked the crouching dogs, and suddenly    Bespake Eumaeus thus with winged words:﻿—  

    “Eumaeus, without doubt some friend of thine,    Or someone known familiarly, is near.    There is no barking of the dogs; they fawn    Around him, and I hear the sound of feet.”  

    Scarce had he spoken, when within the porch    Stood his dear son. The swineherd starting up,    Surprised, let fall the vessels from his hands    In which he mingled the rich wines, and flew    To meet his master; kissed him on the brow;    Kissed both his shining eyes and both his hands,    With many tears. As when a father takes    Into his arms a son whom tenderly    He loves, returning from a distant land    In the tenth year﻿—his only son, the child    Of his old age, for whom he long has borne    Hardship and grief﻿—so to Telemachus    The swineherd clung, and kissed him o’er and o’er,    As one escaped from death, and, shedding still    Warm tears, bespake him thus with winged words:﻿—  

    “Thou comest, O Telemachus! the light    Is not more sweet to me. I never thought    To see thee more when thou hadst once embarked    For Pylos. Now come in, beloved child,    And let my heart rejoice that once again    I have thee here, so newly come from far.    For ’tis not often that thou visitest    Herdsmen and fields, but dwellest in the town﻿—    Such is thy will﻿—beholding day by day    The wasteful pillage of the suitor-train.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “So be it, father; for thy sake I came    To see thee with these eyes, and hear thee speak    And tell me if my mother dwells within    The palace yet; or has some wooer led    The queen away, his bride, and does the couch    Of great Ulysses lie untapestried,    With ugly cobwebs gathering over it?”  

    And then the master swineherd spake in turn:    “Most true it is that with a constant mind    The queen inhabits yet thy palace halls,    And wastes in tears her wretched nights and days.”  

    So speaking he received his brazen lance,    And over the stone threshold passed the prince    Into the lodge. Ulysses yielded up    His seat to him; Telemachus forbade.  

    “Nay, stranger, sit; it shall be ours to find    Elsewhere a seat in this our lodge, and he    Who should provide it is already here.”  

    He spake; Ulysses turned, and took again    His place; the swineherd made a pile of twigs    And covered it with skins, on which sat down    The dear son of Ulysses. Next he brought    Dishes of roasted meats which yet remained,    Part of the banquet of the day before,    And heaped the canisters with bread, and mixed    The rich wines in a wooden bowl. He sat    Right opposite Ulysses. All put forth    Their hands and shared the meats upon the board;    And when the calls of thirst and hunger ceased,    Thus to the swineherd said Telemachus:﻿—  

    “Whence, father, is this stranger, and how brought    By seamen to the coast of Ithaca?    And who are they that brought him?﻿—for I deem    He came not over to our isle on foot.”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “True answer will I make to all. He claims    To be a son of the broad isle of Crete,    And says that in his wanderings he has passed    Through many cities of the world, for so    Some god ordained; and now, escaped by flight    From a Thesprotian galley, he has sought    A refuge in my lodge. Into thy hands    I give him; deal thou with him as thou wilt.    He is thy suppliant, and makes suit to thee.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:    “Eumaeus, thou hast uttered words that pierce    My heart with pain; for how can I receive    A stranger at my house? I am a youth    Who never yet has trusted in his arm    To beat the offerer of an insult back.    And in my mother’s mind the choice is yet    Uncertain whether to remain with me    The mistress of my household, keeping still    Her constant reverence for her husband’s bed,    And still obedient to the people’s voice,    Or whether she shall follow as a bride    Him of the Achaian suitors in my halls    Who is accounted worthiest, and who brings    The richest gifts. Now, as to this thy guest,    Since he has sought thy lodge, I give to him    A cloak and tunic, seemly of their kind,    A two-edged sword, and sandals for his feet.    And I will send him to whatever coast    He may desire to go. Yet, if thou wilt,    Lodge him beneath thy roof, and I will send    Raiment and food, that he may be no charge    To thee or thy companions. To my house    Among the suitor-train I cannot bear    That he should go. Those men are insolent    Beyond all measure; they would scoff at him,    And greatly should I grieve. The boldest man    Against so many might contend in vain,    And greater is their power by far than mine.”  

    Then spake Ulysses, the great sufferer:    “O friend﻿—since I have liberty to speak﻿—    My very heart is wounded when I hear    What wrongs the suitors practise in thy halls    Against a youth like thee. But give me leave    To ask if thou submittest willingly,    Or do thy people, hearkening to some god,    Hate thee with open hatred? Dost thou blame    Thy brothers?﻿—for in brothers men confide    Even in a desperate conflict. Would that I    Were young again, and with the will I have,    Or that I could become Ulysses’ son,    Or were that chief himself returned at last    From all his wanderings﻿—and there yet is hope    Of his return﻿—then might another strike    My head off if I would not instantly    Enter the house of Laertiades    And make myself a mischief to them all.    But should they overcome me, thus alone    Contending with such numbers, I would choose    Rather in mine own palace to be slain    Than every day behold such shameful deeds﻿—    Insulted guests, maidservants foully dragged    Through those fair palace chambers, wine-casks drained,    And gluttons feasting idly, wastefully,    And others toiling for them without end.”  

    Then spake again discreet Telemachus:    “Stranger, thou shalt be answered faithfully.    Know, then, the people are by no means wroth    With me, nor have I brothers to accuse,    Though in a desperate conflict men rely    Upon a brother’s aid. Saturnian Jove    Confines our lineage to a single head.    The king Arcesius had an only son,    Laertes, and to him was only born    Ulysses; and Ulysses left me here,    The only scion of his house, and he    Had little joy of me. Our halls are filled    With enemies, the chief men of the isles﻿—    Dulichium, Samos, and Zacynthus dark    With forests, and the rugged Ithaca﻿—    So many woo my mother and consume    Our substance. She rejects not utterly    Their hateful suit, nor yet will give consent    And end it. They go on to waste my wealth,    And soon will end me also; but the event    Rests with the gods.﻿—And go thou now with speed,    Eumaeus, father, to Penelope,    And say that I am safe, and just returned    From Pylos. I remain within the lodge.    And then come back as soon as thou hast told    The queen alone. Let none of all the Greeks    Hear aught; for they are plotting harm to me.”  

    Then thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “Enough, I see it all, thy words are said    To one who understands them. But, I pray,    Direct me whether in my way to take    A message to Laertes, the distressed.    While sorrowing for Ulysses he o’ersaw    The labors of the field, and ate and drank,    As he had appetite, with those who wrought.    But since thy voyage to the Pylian coast    They say he never takes his daily meals    As he was wont, nor oversees the work,    But sits and mourns and sighs and pines away,    Until his limbs are shrivelled to the bone.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:    “ ’Tis sad, but we must leave him to his grief    A little while. Could everything be made    To happen as we mortals wish, I then    Would first desire my father’s safe return.    But thou, when thou hast given thy message, haste    Hither again, nor wander through the fields    To him; but let my mother send at once    The matron of her household, privately,    To bear the tidings to the aged man.”  

    He spake to speed the swineherd, who took up    His sandals, bound them on, and bent his way    Townward. Not unperceived by Pallas went    Eumaeus from the lodge. She came in shape    A woman beautiful and stately, skilled    In household arts, the noblest. Near the gate    She stood, right opposite. Ulysses saw;    Telemachus beheld her not; the gods    Not always manifest themselves to all.    Ulysses and the mastiffs saw; the dogs    Barked not, but, whimpering, fled from her and sought    The stalls within. She beckoned with her brows;    Ulysses knew her meaning and came forth,    And passed the great wall of the court, and there    Stood near to Pallas, who bespake him thus:﻿—  

    “Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Speak with thy son; conceal from him the truth    No longer, that, prepared to make an end    Of that vile suitor-crew, ye may go up    Into the royal town. Nor long will I    Be absent; I am ready for the assault.”  

    Thus spake the goddess. Putting forth a wand    Of gold, she touched the chief. Beneath that touch    His breast was covered with a new-blanched robe    And tunic. To his frame it gave new strength;    His swarthy color came again, his cheeks    Grew full, and the beard darkened on his chin.    This done, she disappeared. Ulysses came    Into the lodge again; his son beheld    Amazed and overawed, and turned his eyes    Away, as if in presence of a god,    And thus bespake the chief with winged words:﻿—  

    “O stranger, thou art other than thou wert;    Thy garb is not the same, nor are thy looks;    Thou surely art some deity of those    Whose habitation is the ample heaven.    Be gracious to us, let us bring to thee    Such sacrifices as thou wilt accept    And gifts of graven gold; be merciful.”  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, thus replied:    “I am no god; how am I like the gods?    I am thy father, he for whom thy sighs    Are breathed, and sorrows borne, and wrongs endured.”  

    He spake and kissed his son, and from his lids    Tears fell to earth, that long had been restrained.    And then Telemachus, who could not think    The stranger was his father, answered thus:﻿—  

    “Nay, thou art not my father, thou art not    Ulysses; rather hath some deity    Sought to deceive me, that my grief may be    The sharper; for no mortal man would do    What has been done, unless some god should come    To aid him, and to make him young or old    At pleasure; for thou wert a moment since    An aged man, and sordidly arrayed,    And now art like the gods of the wide heaven.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “It is not well, Telemachus, to greet    With boundless wonder and astonishment    Thy father in this lodge. Be sure of this,    That no Ulysses other than myself    Will ever enter here. I, who am he,    Have suffered greatly and have wandered far,    And in the twentieth year am come again    To mine own land. Thou hast beheld today    A wonder wrought by Pallas, huntress-queen,    Who makes me what she will, such power is hers﻿—    Sometimes to seem a beggar, and in turn    A young man in a comely garb. The gods    Whose home is in the heavens can easily    Exalt a mortal man, or bring him low.”  

    He spake and sat him down. Telemachus    Around his glorious father threw his arms,    And shed a shower of tears. Both felt at heart    A passionate desire to weep; they wept    Aloud﻿—and louder were their cries than those    Of eagles, or the sharp-clawed vulture tribe,    Whose young the hinds have stolen, yet unfledged.    Still flowed their tears abundantly; the sun    Would have gone down and left them weeping still    Had not Telemachus at length inquired:﻿—  

    “Dear father, tell me in what galley came    The mariners who brought thee. Of what race    Claim they to be? For certainly, I think,    Thou cam’st not hither travelling on foot.”  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, thus replied:    “My son, thou shalt be answered faithfully.    Men of a race renowned for seamanship,    Phaeacians, brought me hither. They convey    Abroad the strangers coming to their isle,    And, bearing me in one of their swift barques    Across the sea, they landed me asleep    In Ithaca. Rich were the gifts they gave﻿—    Much brass and gold, and garments from the loom;    These, so the gods have counselled, lie concealed    Among the hollow rocks, and I am come,    Obeying Pallas, to consult with thee    How to destroy our enemies. Give now    The number of the suitors; let me know    How many there may be, and who they are,    That with a careful judgment I may weigh    The question whether we shall fall on them﻿—    We two alone﻿—or must we seek allies.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:    “O father, I have heard of thy great fame    My whole life long﻿—how mighty is thy arm,    How wise thy counsels. Thou hast said great things,    And I am thunderstruck. It cannot be    That two alone should stand before a crowd    Of valiant men. They are not merely ten﻿—    These suitors﻿—nor twice ten, but many more;    Hear, then, their number. From Dulichium come    Fifty and two, the flower of all its youth,    With whom are six attendants. Samos sends    Twice twelve, and twenty more Achaian chiefs    Come from Zacynthus. Twelve from Ithaca;    The noblest of the isle are these﻿—with whom    Medon the herald comes﻿—a bard whose song    Is heavenly﻿—and two servants skilled to spread    The banquet. Should we in the palace halls    Assault all these, I fear lest the revenge    For all thy wrongs would end most bitterly    And grievously for thee. Now, if thy thought    Be turned to some ally, bethink thee who    Will combat for us with a willing heart.”  

    Again Ulysses, the great sufferer, spake:    “Then will I tell thee; listen, and give heed.    Think whether Pallas and her father, Jove,    Suffice not for us. Need we more allies?”  

    And then discreet Telemachus rejoined:    “Assuredly the twain whom thou hast named    Are mighty as allies; for though they sit    On high among the clouds, they yet bear rule    Both o’er mankind and o’er the living gods.”  

    Once more Ulysses, the great sufferer, spake:    “Not long will they avoid the fierce affray    When in my halls the strength of war is tried    Between me and the suitor crew. Now go    With early morning to thy home, and there    Mingle among the suitors. As for me,    The swineherd afterward shall lead me hence    To town, a wretched beggar seemingly,    And very old. If there they scoff at me    In mine own palace, let thy faithful heart    Endure it, though I suffer; though they seize    My feet, and by them drag me to the door,    Or strike at me with weapon-blades, look on    And bear it; yet reprove with gentle words    Their folly. They will never heed reproof;    The day of their destruction is at hand.    And this I tell thee further, and be sure    To keep my words in memory. As soon    As Pallas, goddess of wise counsel, gives    The warning, I shall nod to thee, and thou,    When thou perceivest it, remove at once    All weapons from my halls to a recess    High in an upper chamber. With soft words    Quiet the suitors when they ask thee why.    Say, ‘I would take them where there comes no smoke,    Since now they seem no longer like to those    Left by Ulysses when he sailed for Troy,    But soiled and tarnished by the breath of fire.    This graver reason, also, Saturn’s son    Hath forced upon my mind﻿—that ye by chance,    When full of wine and quarrelling, may wound    Each other, and disgrace the feast, and bring    Shame on your wooing; for the sight of steel    Draws men to bloodshed.’ Say but this, and leave    Two swords for us, two spears, two oxhide shields,    Against the day of combat. Pallas then,    And Jove the All-disposer, will unman    Their hearts. Moreover, let me say to thee﻿—    And keep my words in memory﻿—if thou be    My son, and of my blood, let no man hear    That now Ulysses is within the isle;    Let not Laertes hear of it, nor him    Who keeps the swine, nor any of the train    Of servants, nor Penelope herself,    While thou and I alone search out and prove    The women of the household, and no less    The serving-men, to know who honors us,    And bears us reverence in his heart, and who    Contemns us, and dishonors even thee.”  

    Then answered his illustrious son and said:    “Father, thou yet wilt know my heart, and find    That of a careless and too easy mood    I am not; but a search like this, I think,    Would profit neither of us, and I pray    That thou wilt well consider it. Long time    Wouldst thou go wandering from place to place,    O’er thy estates, to prove the loyalty    Of everyone, while in thy halls at ease    The suitors wastefully consume thy wealth.    Yet would I counsel that the women’s faith    Be proved, that the disloyal may be marked    And the innocent go free. As for the men,    I would not now inquire from farm to farm;    That may be done hereafter, if indeed    Thou hast a sign from aegis-bearing Jove.”  

    So talked they with each other. The good ship    Which brought Telemachus and all his friends    From Pylos kept meantime upon its way    To Ithaca. There, entering the deep port,    The seamen hauled the black ship up the beach;    And then the ready servants took away    The arms, and to the house of Clytius bore    The costly gifts. A herald from the ship    Went forward to the palace of the king    With tidings to the sage Penelope    That now her son was come and in the fields,    And that the ship at his command had reached    The city, lest the royal dame might feel    Fear for his safety, and give way to tears.    The herald and the noble swineherd met,    Each bearing the same message to the queen.    Entering the palace of the godlike king,    And standing midst the maids, the herald said:﻿—  

    “O lady, thy beloved son is come.”    But close beside the queen the swineherd stood,    And told her everything which her dear son    Had bid him say; and, having thus fulfilled    His errand, left the palace and its court.  

    Then were the suitors vexed and sorrowful,    And going from the palace, and without    The great wall that enclosed the court, sat down    Before the gates, and there Eurymachus,    The son of Polybus, harangued the throng:﻿—  

    “Behold, my friends, Telemachus has done    A marvellous thing; this voyage, which we thought    He could not make, is made. Now let us launch    A ship, the best that we can find, and man    With fishermen the benches, sending it    To find our friends, and hasten their return.”  

    Scarce had he spoken when Amphinomus,    In turning where he stood, beheld a barque    Enter the port’s deep waters, with a crew    That furled the sails and held the oars in hand.    He laughed, well pleased, and to the suitors said:﻿—  

    “There needs no message to be sent, for they    Are here already. Haply hath some god    Given them the knowledge, or perchance they saw,    But could not overtake, the prince’s ship.”  

    He spake; they rose and hastened to the strand,    And quickly drew the galley up the beach.    The ready servants bore the arms away;    Then met they all in council, suffering none    Save of the suitor-train to meet with them﻿—    None, either young or old. Eupeithes’ son,    Antinoüs, standing forth, bespake them thus:﻿—  

    “How strangely do the gods protect this man    From evil! All day long spy after spy    Has sat and watched upon the airy heights,    And when the sun was set we never slept    On land, but ever in our gallant ship    Sailed, waiting for the holy morn, and lay    In constant ambush for Telemachus,    To seize and to destroy him. Yet behold,    Some deity has brought him home. And now    Frame we a plan to cut off utterly    Telemachus, and leave him no escape;    For certainly I think that while he lives    The end we aim at cannot be attained.    Shrewd is the youth in counsel and device,    And we no longer have, as once we had,    The people’s favor. Let us quickly act,    Ere he can call a council of the Greeks.    That he will do without delay, and there    Will rise in wrath to tell them how we planned    His death by violence, and failed; and they    Who hear assuredly will not approve    The plotted mischief. They may drive us forth    With outrage from our country to a land    Of strangers. Let us be the first to strike,    And slay him in the fields or on the way,    And, taking his possessions to ourselves,    Share equally his wealth. Then may we give    This palace to his mother, and the man    Whom she shall wed, whoever he may be.    Or if this plan mislike you, and ye choose    That he should live, and keep the fair estate    That was his father’s, let us not go on    Thronging the palace to consume his wealth    In revelry, but each with liberal gifts    Woo her from his own dwelling; and let him    Who gives most generously, and whom fate    Most favors, take the lady as his bride.”  

    He spake, and all were mute. Amphinomus,    The illustrious son of royal Nisus, rose.    The grandson of Aretias, it was he    Who led the suitors from Dulichium’s fields,    Grassy and rich in corn. Penelope    Liked best his words, for generous was his thought,    And with a generous purpose thus he spake:﻿—  

    “Nay, friends, not mine is the advice to slay    Telemachus. It is a fearful thing    To take a royal life. Then let us first    Inquire the pleasure of the gods. For if    The oracles of mighty Jupiter    Approve it, I would do the deed myself,    Or bid another do it; but if they    Consent not, ’tis my counsel to forbear.”  

    He spake, and all approved. At once they rose,    And, entering the palace, sat them down    On shining thrones. Meantime Penelope    Had formed the purpose to appear before    The arrogant suitors, for the news was brought    Into her chamber of the plot to slay    Her son; the herald Medon overheard,    And told her all. So to the hall she went    With her attendant maids. The glorious dame    Drew near the suitor-train, and took her stand    Beside a column of the stately pile,    And with a delicate veil before her cheeks    Began to speak, and chid Antinoüs thus:﻿—  

    “Antinoüs, mischief-plotter, insolent!    The rumor is that thou excellest all    Of thy own age among the Ithacans    In understanding and in speech. Yet such    Thou never wert. Ferocious as thou art,    Why seek the death of my Telemachus,    And treat with scorn the suppliants of whose prayer    Jove is the witness? An unholy thing    It is when men against their fellow-men    Plot mischief. Dost thou then forget that once    Thy father came to us a fugitive,    In terror of the people, who were wroth    Because he joined the Taphian pirate-race,    And plundered the Thesprotians, our allies.    The people would have slain him, and have torn    His heart out, and have pillaged his large wealth;    Ulysses checked their rage, and held them back,    Fierce as they were. Now thou dost waste his goods    Most shamefully, and woo his wife, and slay    His son, and multiply my woes. Cease now,    I charge thee, and persuade the rest to cease.”  

    Eurymachus, the son of Polybus,    Replied: “O daughter of Icarius, sage    Penelope, take heart; let no such thought    Possess thy mind. There is no man on earth,    Nor will there be, who shall lay violent hands    Upon Telemachus, thy son, while I    Am living, and yet keep the gift of sight.    I say, and will perform it﻿—his black blood    Shall flow and bathe my spear. Ulysses oft,    Spoiler of realms, would take me on his knee,    And put the roasted meats into my hands,    And give me ruddy wine. I therefore hold    Telemachus of all mankind most dear,    And I will bid him have no fear of death    From any of the suitors. If it come,    Sent by the gods, he cannot then escape.”  

    So spake he to appease her, while he planned,    The murder of her son. The queen went up    To the fair upper chambers, and there wept    Ulysses, her dear spouse, till o’er her lids    The blue-eyed Pallas poured the balm of sleep.  

    At evening to Ulysses and his son    The noble swineherd went, while busily    They made the supper ready, having slain    A porker one year old. Then instantly    Stood Pallas by Ulysses, and put forth    Her wand and touched him, making him again    Old, and clad sordidly in beggar’s weeds,    Lest that the swineherd, knowing at a look    His master, might not keep the knowledge locked    In his own breast, but, hastening forth, betray    The secret to the chaste Penelope.  

    Then to the swineherd said Telemachus:    “Noble Eumaeus, welcome; what reports    Are in the town? Have those large-minded men,    The suitors, left their ambush and returned,    Or are they waiting yet for me to pass?”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “Of that, indeed, I never thought to ask,    In going through the town. My only care    Was to return, as soon as I had given    My message, with such speed as I could make.    I met a messenger, a herald sent    By thy companions, who was first to tell    Thy mother of thy safe return. Yet this    I know, for I beheld it with my eyes.    When outside of the city, where the hill    Of Hermes stands, I saw a gallant barque    Entering the port, and carrying many men.    Heavy it was with shields and two-edged spears;    ’Twas they, I thought, and yet I cannot tell.”  

    He spake; Telemachus the valiant looked    Upon his father with a smile unmarked    By good Eumaeus. When their task was done,    And the board spread, they feasted. No one lacked    His portion of the common meal. Their thirst    And hunger satisfied, they laid them down    To rest, and so received the gift of sleep.  

            Book XVII  Return of Ulysses to His Palace  

  Meeting of Telemachus and Penelope, Ulysses conducted by Eumaeus to the palace, where he is known by the dog Argus, who dies on seeing him﻿—Entrance of Ulysses among the suitors﻿—Assault made by Antinoüs upon Ulysses﻿—Ulysses sent for by Penelope.

      Now when the rosy-fingered Morn looked forth﻿—    The daughter of the Dawn﻿—Telemachus,    The dear son of the great Ulysses, bound    The shapely sandals underneath his feet,    And took the massive spear that fitted well    His grasp, and, as he stood in act to go    Up to the town, bespake the swineherd thus:﻿—  

    “Father, I hasten to the town, that there    My mother may behold me; for I think    She will not cease to grieve, and fear, and weep,    Till her eyes rest on me. I leave with thee    The charge of leading our unfortunate guest    Into the city, there to beg his bread.    Whoever will may give him food and drink.    All men I cannot feed, and I have cares    Enough already. If he chafe at this,    The worse for him. I like to speak my mind.”  

    And thus Ulysses, the sagacious, spake:    “Nor do I wish, my friend, to loiter here.    Better it is for one like me to beg    In town than in the country. In the town,    Whoever chooses will bestow his dole;    But here, if I remain about the stalls,    I am no longer of an age to do    All that a master may require. Go thou;    This man, at thy command, will lead me hence,    As soon as I have warmed me at the fire,    And the air grows milder. This keen morning-cold    May end me, and the way, ye say, is long.”  

    He ended; from the lodge Telemachus    Passed quickly, meditating to destroy    The suitors. Coming to his stately home,    He leaned his spear against a column’s shaft,    And, crossing the stone threshold, entered in.    First Eurycleia, who had been his nurse,    Beheld him, as she spread the beautiful thrones    With skins, and ran to him with weeping eyes;    And round him other handmaids of the house    Of resolute Ulysses thronged. They gave    Fond welcome, kissing him upon the brow    And shoulders. Issuing from her chamber next    The chaste Penelope, like Dian’s self    In beauty, or like golden Venus, came,    And, weeping, threw her arms about her son,    And kissed him on his forehead and on both    His glorious eyes, and said, amidst her tears:﻿—  

    “Light of my eyes! O my Telemachus!    Art thou, then, come? I never thought again    To see thee, when I heard thou hadst embarked    For Pylos﻿—secretly, and knowing me    Unwilling﻿—in the hope to gather there    Some tidings of thy father. Tell me now    All that has happened, all that thou hast seen.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “Nay, mother, waken not my griefs again,    Nor move my heart to rage. I have just now    Escaped a cruel death. But go and bathe,    And put fresh garments on, and when thou com’st    Into thy chamber with thy maidens, make    A vow to all the gods that thou wilt burn    A sacrifice of chosen hecatombs    When Jupiter shall have avenged our wrongs.    Now must I hasten to the marketplace    In quest of one who came with me a guest    From Pylos. Him, with all my faithful crew,    I sent before me to this port, and bade    Piraeus lead him to his own abode,    There to be lodged and honored till I came.”  

    He spake, nor flew his words unheeded by.    The princess bathed, and put fresh garments on,    And vowed to all the gods a sacrifice    Of chosen hecatombs when Jupiter    Should punish the wrongdoers. While she prayed,    Telemachus went forth, his spear in hand.    Two fleet dogs followed him. Minerva shed    A godlike beauty o’er his form and face,    And all the people wondered as he came.    The suitors thronged around him with smooth words,    Yet plotting mischief in their hearts. He turned    From their assembly hastily, and took    His place where Mentor sat with Antiphus,    And Halitherses﻿—all his father’s friends    And his from the beginning. While they asked    Of all that he had seen, Piraeus came,    The famous spearman, bringing through the town    The stranger with him to the marketplace.    Nor long Telemachus delayed, but came    To meet his guest, and then Piraeus said:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, despatch to where I dwell    Thy serving-women; I would send to thee,    At once, the gifts which Menelaus gave.”  

    “And then discreet Telemachus replied:    “We know not yet, Piraeus, what may be    The event; and if the suitors privily    Should slay me in the palace, and divide    The inheritance among them, I prefer    That thou, instead of them, shouldst have the gifts;    But should they meet the fate which I have planned,    And be cut off, then shalt thou gladly bring    The treasures, which I gladly will receive.”  

    So spake the prince, and to the palace led    The unhappy man, his guest. When now they reached    The stately pile, they both laid down their cloaks    Upon the benches, and betook themselves    To the well-polished baths. The attendant maids    There ministered and smoothed their limbs with oil,    And each received a tunic at their hands,    And fleecy mantle. Then they left the baths    And took their seats. A damsel came, and poured    Water from a fair ewer wrought of gold    Into a silver basin for their hands,    And spread a polished table near their seats;    And there the matron of the household placed    Bread, and the many dishes which her stores    Supplied. The queen was seated opposite,    Beside a column of the pile, and twirled    A slender spindle, while the son and guest    Put forth their hands and shared the meal prepared.    And when the calls of hunger and of thirst    Had ceased, thus spake the sage Penelope:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, when I again go up    Into my chamber, I shall lay me down    Upon the couch which, since Ulysses sailed    For Troy with Atreus’ sons, has been to me    A couch of mourning, sprinkled with my tears.    And now thou hast not chosen to reveal,    Ere yet the haughty suitors throng again    Into these halls, what in thy voyage thou    Hast haply heard concerning his return.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “Then, mother, will I truly tell thee all.    We went to Pylos, and saw Nestor there,    The shepherd of the people. Kindly he    Received me in his stately home, as one    Might welcome back a wandering son returned    From foreign lands. Such welcome I received    Both from the king and his illustrious sons.    Put he had heard, he said, from living man,    No tidings of the much-enduring chief    Ulysses, whether he were yet alive    Or dead. He therefore sent me with his steeds    And chariot to the court of Atreus’ son,    The warlike Menelaus. There I saw    The Argive Helen, for whose sake the Greeks    And Trojans, by the appointment of the gods,    Suffered so much. The valiant king inquired    What wish of mine had brought me to the town    Of hallowed Lacedsemon. I replied,    And truly told him all, and everything    In order. Then he answered me, and said:﻿—  

    “ ‘So then! these men, unwarlike as they are,    Aspire to occupy a brave man’s bed,    As when a hart hath left two suckling fawns,    Just born, asleep in a strong lion’s lair,    And roams for pasturage the mountain slopes    And grassy lawns, the lion suddenly    Comes back, and makes a cruel end of both,    So will Ulysses bring a sudden doom    Upon the suitors. Would to Father Jove,    And Pallas, and Apollo, that the chief,    Returning mighty, as he was when once    In well-built Lesbos, at a wrestling-match,    He rose to strive with Philomelides,    And threw him heavily, and all the Greeks    Rejoiced﻿—would he might come as then he was!    Short-lived would then the suitors be, and taste    A bitter marriage-feast. But now, to come    To what thou hast inquired, I will not seek    To turn from it, and talk of other things,    Nor will deceive. Of all that I was told    By the Ancient of the Deep, whose words are true,    I will not hide a single word from thee.    He saw thy father in an isle, he said,    A prey to wasting sorrows, and detained,    Unwilling, in the palace of the nymph    Calypso. To the country of his birth    He cannot come; no ships are there with oars    And crew to bear him o’er the great wide sea.’  

    “Thus Menelaus, mighty with the spear,    The son of Atreus, said. And having now    Fulfilled my errand, I returned. The gods    Gave favoring winds, and sent me swiftly home.”  

    He ended, and the queen was deeply moved.    Then Theoclymenus, the godlike, said:﻿—  

    “O gracious consort of Laertes’ son,    King Menelaus knew not all. Hear now    What I shall say﻿—for I will prophesy,    And truly, nor will keep back aught from thee.    Let Jupiter, the mightiest of the gods,    And this thy hospitable board, and this    The hearth of great Ulysses, where I find    A refuge, be my witnesses, that now    Ulysses is in his own land again,    And sits or walks observant of the deeds    Of wrong, and planning vengeance, yet to fall    On all the suitors; such the augury    Which I beheld when in the gallant barque    I sat and told it to Telemachus.”  

    And thus the sage Penelope replied:    “O stranger! may thy saying be fulfilled!    Then shalt thou have such thanks and such rewards    That all who greet thee shall rejoice with thee.”  

    So talked they with each other. In the space    Before the palace of Ulysses stood    The suitors, pleased with hurling quoits and spears    On the smooth pavement, where their insolence    So oft was seen. But when the supper-hour    Was near, and from the fields the cattle came,    Driven by the herdsmen, Medon﻿—he whom most    They liked of all the heralds, and who sat    Among them at the feast﻿—bespake them thus:﻿—  

    “Youths! since ye now have had your pastime here,    Come in, and help prepare the evening meal;    At the due hour a banquet is not ill.”  

    He spake; the suitors hearkened and obeyed,    And rose, and came into the halls, and laid    Their cloaks upon the benches and the thrones,    And slaughtered well-fed sheep and fading goats,    And made a victim of a pampered brawn,    And a stalled ox, preparing for the feast.    Meantime Ulysses and that noble hind    The swineherd hastened to begin their walk    To town, and thus the master swineherd spake:﻿—  

    “Since, stranger, ’tis thy wish to pass today    Into the city, as my master bade﻿—    Though I by far prefer that thou remain    A guardian of the stalls, yet much I fear    My master, and am sure that he would chide,    And harsh the upbraidings of a master are﻿—    Let us depart; the day is now far spent,    And chill will be the air of eventide.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Enough; I know; thy words are heard by one    Who understands them. Let us then depart.    Lead thou the way; and if thou hast a staff,    Cut from the wood to lean on, give it me,    Since, as thou say’st, we have a slippery road.”  

    He spake, and o’er his shoulders flung a scrip,    Old, cracked, and hanging by a twisted thong.    Eumaeus gave the staff he asked, and both    Went forth; the dogs and herdsmen stayed to guard    The lodge. The swineherd led his master on    Townward, a squalid beggar to the sight,    And aged, leaning on a staff, and wrapped    In sordid rags. There by the rugged way,    As they drew near the town, they passed a fount    Wrought by the hand of man, and pouring forth    Its pleasant streams, from which the citizens    Drew water. Ithacus and Neritus    Founded it with Polyctor, and a grove    Of alders feeding on the moistened earth    Grew round it on all sides. The ice-cold rill    Gushed from a lofty rock, upon whose brow    An altar stood, at which the passersby    Worshipped, and laid their offerings for the Nymphs.    There did Melanthius, son of Dolius, meet    The twain, as he was driving to the town    The finest goats of all the flocks, to make    A banquet for the suitors; with him went    Two shepherds, following the flock. As soon    As he beheld Eumaeus and his guest,    He railed at them with rude and violent words,    That made the anger of Ulysses rise.  

    “See that vile fellow lead the vile about!    Thus ever doth some god join like with like.    Thou worthless swineherd! whither wouldst thou take    This hungry, haunting beggar-man, this pest    Of feasts, who at the posts of many a door    Against them rubs his shoulders, asking crusts,    Tripods or caldrons never. Shouldst thou leave    The wretch to me, to watch my stalls, and sweep    The folds, and bring fresh branches to the kids,    He might by drinking whey get stouter thighs.    But he has learned no good, and will refuse    To work; he better likes to stroll about    With that insatiable stomach, asking alms    To fill it. Let me tell thee what is sure    To happen to him, should he ever come    Into the palace of the glorious chief    Ulysses. Many a footstool will be flung    Around him by the hands of those who sit    As guests, and they will tear the fellow’s sides.”  

    He spake, and in his folly thrust his heel    Against the hero’s thigh. The blow moved not    Ulysses from his path, nor swerved he aught,    But meditated whether with a blow    Of his good staff to take the fellow’s life,    Or lift him in the air and dash his head    Against the ground. Yet he endured the affront    And checked his wrath. The swineherd spake, and chid    The offender, and thus prayed with lifted hands:﻿—  

    “Nymphs of the fountain, born to Jupiter!    If e’er in sacrifice Ulysses burned    To you the thighs of lambs and goats, o’erlaid    With fat, be pleased to grant the prayer I make,    That, guided by some deity, the chief    May yet return. Then thy rude boasts would cease.    Melanthius, which thou utterest in thy way    From place to place while wandering through the town.    Unfaithful shepherds make a perishing flock.”  

    Melanthius, keeper of the goats, rejoined:    “ ’Tis wonderful how flippant is the cur,    And shrewd! But I shall carry him on board    A good black ship, far off from Ithaca,    And there will sell him for a goodly price.    Would that Apollo of the silver bow    Might in the palace slay Telemachus    This very hour, or that the suitors might,    As certainly as that the day which brings    Ulysses to his home will never dawn!”  

    He spake, and left them there. They followed on    Slowly. Melanthius hastened, and was soon    At the king’s palace gate, and, entering, took    A seat right opposite Eurymachus,    Whose favorite he was. The attendants there    Brought meats, the matron of the household bread,    And both were set before them. Meantime stopped    Ulysses with the noble swineherd near    The palace, for around them in the air    Came the sweet murmurs of a lyre. Just then    Phemius, the minstrel, had begun his song,    Ulysses took the swineherd’s hand, and said:﻿—  

    “Eumaeus, this must be the noble pile    In which Ulysses dwelt, for easily    ’Tis known among the others that are near.    Rooms over rooms are here; around its court    Are walls and battlements, and folding-doors    Shut fast the entrance; no man may contemn    Its strength. And I perceive that many guests    Banquet within; the smoke of fat goes up,    And the sweet lyre is heard; the gods have given    Its music to accompany the feast.”  

    And then, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “Thou speakest rightly, and in other things    Thou art not slow of thought. Now let us think    What we shall do. First enter, if thou wilt,    The sumptuous rooms, while I remain without;    Or, if it please thee, I will enter first,    While thou remainest; yet delay not long,    Lest someone, seeing thee, should deal a blow,    Or drive thee hence. I pray thee, think of this.”  

    Ulysses, the great sufferer, answered thus:    “Enough; I know; thy words are heard by one    Who understands them. Go before me, then,    And leave me here. I am not quite unused    To blows and stripes, and patient is my mood,    For greatly have I suffered, both at sea    And in the wars; and I submit to bear    This also. But the stomach’s eagerness    Is desperate, and is not to be withstood,    And many are the mischiefs which it brings    Upon the race of men; it fits out fleets    That cross the barren deep arrayed for war,    And carry death and woe to hostile realms.”  

    So talked the twain. A dog was lying near,    And lifted up his head and pricked his ears.    ’Twas Argus, which the much-enduring man    Ulysses long before had reared, but left    Untried, when for the hallowed town of Troy    He sailed. The young men oft had led him forth    In eager chase of wild goats, stags, and hares;    But now, his master far away, he lay    Neglected, just before the stable doors,    Amid the droppings of the mules and beeves,    Heaped high till carried to the spacious fields    Of which Ulysses was the lord. There lay    Argus, devoured with vermin. As he saw    Ulysses drawing near, he wagged his tail    And dropped his ears, but found that he could come    No nearer to his master. Seeing this,    Ulysses wiped away a tear unmarked    By the good swineherd, whom he questioned thus:﻿—  

    “Eumaeus, this I marvel at﻿—this dog,    That lies upon the dunghill, beautiful    In form, but whether in the chase as fleet    As he is fairly shaped I cannot tell.    Worthless, perchance, as house-dogs often are,    Whose masters keep them for the sake of show.”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “The dog belongs to one who died afar.    Had he the power of limb which once he had    For feats of hunting when Ulysses sailed    For Troy and left him, thou wouldst be amazed    Both at his swiftness and his strength. No beast    In the thick forest depths which once he saw,    Or even tracked by footprints, could escape.    And now he is a sufferer, since his lord    Has perished far from his own land. No more    The careless women heed the creature’s wants;    For, when the master is no longer near,    The servants cease from their appointed tasks,    And on the day that one becomes a slave    The Thunderer, Jove, takes half his worth away.”  

    He spake, and, entering that fair dwelling-place,    Passed through to where the illustrious suitors sat,    While over Argus the black night of death    Came suddenly as soon as he had seen    Ulysses, absent now for twenty years.    Telemachus, the godlike, was the first    To mark the swineherd coming through the hall,    And, nodding, called to him. The swineherd looked    About him, and beheld a seat on which    The carver of the feast was wont to sit,    Distributing the meats. He bore it thence    And placed it opposite Telemachus,    And at his table. Then he sat him down,    And thither came the herald, bringing him    A portion of the feast, and gave him bread    From the full canister. Soon after him    Ulysses entered, seemingly an old    And wretched beggar, propped upon a staff,    And wrapped in sordid weeds. He sat him down    On the ashen threshold, just within the doors,    And leaned against a shaft of cypress-wood,    Which some artificer had skilfully    Wrought by a line, and smoothed. Telemachus    Called to the swineherd, bade him come, and took    A loaf that lay in the fair canister,    And all the flesh which his two hands could grasp.  

    “Bear this to yonder stranger; bid him go    And ask a dole from every suitor here.    No beggar should be bashful in his need.”  

    He spake, the hind obeyed, and, drawing near    Ulysses, said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “These from Telemachus, who bids thee ask    A dole from every suitor, for he says    No beggar should be bashful in his need.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “May Jove, the sovereign, make Telemachus    A happy man among the sons of men,    And grant him all his heart desires in life!”  

    He spake, and took the gift in both his hands,    And laid it down upon his tattered scrip    Close to his feet. Then, while the poet sang,    He ate, and, just as he had supped, the bard    Closed his divine recital. Then ensued    Great clamor in the hall, but Pallas came    And moved Ulysses to arise, and ask    From every suitor there a dole of bread,    That he might know the better from the worse,    Though none were to be spared. From right to left    He took his way, and asked of every man,    With outstretched hand, as if he had been long    A beggar. And they pitied him, and gave,    And looked at him with wonder, and inquired    One of another who he was, and whence.    Then spake Melanthius, keeper of the goats:﻿—  

    “Give ear, ye suitors of the illustrious queen.    As to this stranger, I have seen him once.    The swineherd brought him; but I know him not,    And of what race he is I cannot tell.”  

    He spake; Antinoüs chid the swineherd thus:    “Why hast thou brought him, too well known thyself?    Have we not vagabonds enough? enough    Of sturdy beggars, pests of every feast.    Or is it a light matter that they throng    Hither to waste the substance of thy lord,    And therefore thou art with this fellow here?”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “Antinoüs, high as is thy station, thou    Hast spoken ill. What man goes ever forth    To bid a stranger to his house, unless    The stranger be of those whose office is    To serve the people, be he seer, or leech,    Or architect, or poet heaven-inspired,    Whose song is gladly heard? All these are called    To feasts wherever men are found; but none    Call in the poor, to live upon their means.    Antinoüs, thou, of all the suitor-train,    Dost ever with the greatest harshness treat    The servants of Ulysses, chiefly me.    I heed it not while sage Penelope    Dwells in the palace with her godlike son.”  

    Then interposed discreet Telemachus:    “Nay, have no strife of words with him, I pray.    Antinoüs takes delight in bitter words,    And rails, and stirs up railing in the rest.”    And then he turned, and thus with winged words    Bespake Antinoüs: “Truly thou dost care    For me as might a father for a son,    Bidding me drive a stranger from my door    With violent words﻿—which God forbid. Take now    Somewhat and give to him. I grudge it not,    Nay, I advise it. Fear not to offend    My mother, or displease a single one    Of all the household of the godlike chief,    Ulysses. But thou hast not thought of this.    It suits thee best to feast and never give.”  

    Antinoüs thus rejoined: “O utterer    Of big and braggart words! Telemachus,    If all the other suitors would bestow    As much as I will, he would not be seen    Within these halls for three months yet to come.”  

    So speaking, he brought forward to the sight,    From underneath the board, a stool, on which    Rested his dainty feet. The others all    Gave somewhat to Ulysses, till his scrip    Was filled with meat and bread Then as he went    Back to the threshold, there to feast on what    The Greeks had given him in his rounds, he stopped    Beside Antinoüs, and bespake him thus:﻿—  

    “Give somewhat also, friend. Thou dost not seem    One of the humbler rank among the Greeks,    But of the highest. Kingly is thy look;    It therefore will become thee to bestow    More freely than the rest, and I will sound    Thy praise through all the earth. Mine too was once    A happy lot, for I inhabited    A palace filled with goods, and often gave    To wanderers, whosoever they might be    That sought me out, and in whatever need.    And I had many servants, and large store    Of everything by which men live at ease    And are accounted rich. Saturnian Jove﻿—    Such was his pleasure﻿—brought me low; for, moved    By him, I joined me to a wandering band    Of pirates, and to my perdition sailed    Upon a distant voyage to the coast    Of Egypt. In the river of that land    I stationed my good ships, and bade my men    Remain with them and watch them well. I placed    Sentries upon the heights. Yet confident    In their own strength, and rashly giving way    To greed, my comrades ravaged the fair fields    Of the Egyptians, slew them, and bore off    Their wives and little ones. The rumor reached    The city soon; the people heard the alarm    And came together. With the dawn of day    All the great plain was thronged with horse and foot,    And gleamed with brass, while Jove, the Thunderer, sent    A deadly fear into our ranks, where none    Dared face the foe. On every side was death.    The Egyptians hew r ed down many with the sword,    And some they led away alive to toil    For them in slavery. Me my captors gave    Into a stranger’s hands, upon his way    To Cyprus, where he reigned, a mighty king,    Demetor, son of Jasus. Thence at last    I came through many hardships to this isle.”  

    Antinoüs lifted up his voice, and said:    “What god hath sent this nuisance to disturb    The banquet? Take thyself to the mid-hall,    Far from thy table, else expect to see    An Egypt and a Cyprus of a sort    That thou wilt little like. Thou art a bold    And shameless beggar. Thou dost take thy round    And ask from each, and foolishly they give,    And spare not nor consider; well supplied    Is each, and freely gives what is not his.”  

    Then sage Ulysses said as he withdrew:    “ ’Tis strange; thy mind agrees not with thy form.    Thou wouldst not give a suppliant even salt    In thine own house﻿—thou who, while sitting here    Fed at another’s table, canst not bear    To give me bread from thy well-loaded board.”  

    He spake. Antinoüs grew more angry still,    And frowned and answered him with winged words:﻿—  

    “Dealer in saucy words! I hardly think    That thou wilt leave this palace unchastised.”  

    He spake, and raised the footstool in his hand,    And smote Ulysses on the lower part    Of the right shoulder. Like a rock he stood,    Unmoved beneath the blow Antinoüs gave,    But shook his head in silence as he thought    Of vengeance. Then, returning, he sat down    Upon the threshold, where he laid his scrip    Well filled, and thus bespake the suitor-train:﻿—  

    “Hear me, ye suitors of the illustrious queen.    Grief or resentment no man feels for blows    Received by him while fighting for his own﻿—    His beeves or white-woolled sheep. But this man here,    Antinoüs, dealt that blow on me because    I have an empty stomach; hunger brings    Great mischiefs upon men. If there be gods    Or furies who avenge the poor, may death    O’ertake Antinoüs ere his marriage-day!”  

    He ended. Then again Eupeithes’ son,    Antinoüs, spake: “Eat, stranger, quietly;    Sit still, or get thee hence; our young men else    Who hear thy words will seize thee by the feet    Or hands, and drag thee forth and flay thee there.”  

    He spake, and greatly were the rest incensed,    And one of those proud youths took up the word:﻿—  

    “Antinoüs, it was ill of thee to smite    That hapless wanderer. Madman! what if he    Came down from heaven and were a god! The gods    Put on the form of strangers from afar,    And walk our towns in many different shapes,    To mark the good and evil deeds of men.”  

    Thus spake the suitors, but he heeded not    Their words. Telemachus, who saw the blow,    Felt his heart swell with anger and with grief,    Yet from his eyelids fell no tear; he shook    His head in silence, pondering to repay    The wrong. Meantime the sage Penelope    Heard of the stranger smitten in her halls,    And thus bespake the maidens of her train:﻿—  

    “Would that Apollo, mighty with the bow,    Might smite thee also!” Then Eurynomè,    The matron of the household, said in turn:  

    “O, were our prayers but heard, not one of these    Should look upon the golden morn again!”  

    Then spake again the sage Penelope:    “Mother, they all are hateful; everyone    Plots mischief, but Antinoüs most of all;    And he is like black death, to be abhorred.    A friendless stranger passes through these halls,    Compelled by need, and asks an alms of each,    And all the others give, and fill his scrip;    Antinoüs flings a footstool, and the blow    Bruises the shoulder of the suppliant man.”  

    So talked they with each other where they sat    In the queen’s chamber, mid the attendant train    Of women, while meantime Ulysses took    The evening meal. The queen then bade to call    The noble swineherd, and bespake him thus:﻿—  

    “My worthy friend Eumaeus, go and bring    The stranger hither. I would speak with him,    And ask if anywhere he saw or heard    Aught of Ulysses; for he seems like one    Whose wanderings have been in many lands.”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst make reply:    “Would that these Greeks, O queen, would hold their peace,    Then might this stranger in thy hearing speak    Words full of consolation. For three nights    I had him with me, for three days I made    My lodge his home﻿—for at the very first    He came to me, escaping from his ship﻿—    Nor when he left me had he told of all    That he had suffered. As a hearer looks    Upon a minstrel whom the gods have taught    To sing the poems that delight all hearts,    And, listening, longs to listen without end;    So, as the stranger sat beneath my roof,    He held me charmed. He was the ancestral friend,    He said, of thy Ulysses, and his home    Was Crete, where dwells the stock of Minos yet.    From Crete he came, and much had suffered since,    Driven on from place to place. And he had heard    Some tidings of Ulysses yet alive﻿—    So he affirmed﻿—in a rich region near    The realm of the Thesprotians, and prepared    To bring much riches to his native isle.”  

    Then spake the sage Penelope again:    “Go, call him hither, that he may relate    His story in my presence. Let these men,    As it may please them, sitting at our gates    Or in our halls, amuse themselves, for light    Are they of heart. Unwasted in their homes    Lie their possessions, and their bread and wine    Are only for their servants, while themselves    Frequent our palace, day by day, and slay    Our beeves and sheep and fatling goats, and feast,    And drink abundantly the dark red wine,    And all with lavish waste. No man is here,    Such as Ulysses was, to drive away    This pest from our abode. Should he return    To his own land, he and his son would take    Swift vengeance on the men who do him wrong.”  

    She ended. Suddenly Telemachus    Sneezed loudly, so that all the palace rang;    And, laughing as she heard, Penelope    Bespake Eumaeus thus with winged words:﻿—  

    “Go, call the stranger. Dost thou not perceive    My son has sneezed as to confirm my words.    Not unfulfilled will now remain the doom    That waits the suitors; none will now escape    Death and the Fates. This further let me say,    And thou remember it; if what he tells    Be true, I will bestow on him a change    Of fair attire, a tunic and a cloak.”  

    She spake, the swineherd went, and, drawing near    Ulysses, said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “Stranger and father, sage Penelope,    The mother of the prince, hath sent for thee.    Though sorrowing, she is minded to inquire    What of her husband thou canst haply say;    And should she find that all thy words are true,    She will bestow a tunic and a cloak,    Garments which much thou needest. For thy food,    What will appease thy hunger thou wilt find    Among the people; ask, and each will give.”  

    Ulysses, much-enduring man, replied:    “Eumaeus, faithfully will I declare    All that I know to sage Penelope,    The daughter of Icarius. Well I knew    Her husband, and with like calamities    We both have suffered. But I greatly dread    This reckless suitor-crew, whose riotous acts    And violence reach to the iron heavens.    Even now, when that man dealt me, as I passed,    A painful blow, though I had done no harm,    None interposed, not even Telemachus,    In my defence. Now, therefore, ask, I pray,    Penelope that she will deign to wait    Till sunset in her rooms, though strong her wish    To hear my history. Of her husband then,    And his return, she may inquire, while I    Sit by the blazing hearth; for scant have been    My garments, as thou knowest, since the day    When first I came, a suppliant, to thy door.”  

    He spake; the swineherd went, and as he crossed    The threshold of Penelope she said:﻿—  

    “Thou bringst him not, Eumaeus? What may be    The wanderer’s scruple? Fear of someone here?    Or in a palace is he filled with awe?    To be a bashful beggar is most hard.”  

    And thus, Eumaeus, thou didst answer her:    “Rightly he speaks, and just as one would think    Who shuns the encounter of disorderly men.    He prays that thou wilt wait till set of sun;    And better were it for thyself, O queen,    To speak with him and hear his words alone.”  

    Then spake discreet Penelope again:    “Whoe’er may be the stranger, not unwise    He seems; for nowhere among men are done    Such deeds of wrong and outrage as by these.”  

    She spake, and the good swineherd, having told    The lady all, went forth among the crowd    Of suitors, drawing near Telemachus,    And bowed his head beside him that none else    Might hear, and said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “I go, my friend, to tend the swine and guard    What there thou hast, thy sustenance and mine.    The charge of what is here belongs to thee.    Be thy first care to save thyself, and watch    To see that mischief overtake thee not﻿—    For many are the Achaians plotting it,    Whom Jove destroy ere we become their prey!”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus in turn:    “So be it, father, and, when thou hast supped,    Depart, but with the morning come, and bring    Choice victims for the sacrifice. The care    Of all things here is with the gods and me.”  

    He spake; the swineherd sat him down again    Upon his polished seat, and satisfied    His appetite and thirst with food and wine.    Then he departed to his herd, and left    The palace and the court before it thronged    With revellers, who gave the hour to song,    And joined the dance; for evening now was come.  

            Book XVIII  Combat of Ulysses and Iris  

  Ulysses insulted by the beggar Irus﻿—Amusement of the suitors, who encourage the quarrel﻿—Victory of Ulysses in the combat with Irus﻿—Manoeuvre of Penelope to obtain presents from the suitors, and its success﻿—Ulysses insulted by Eurymachus﻿—His reply﻿—The cupbearer struck down by a footstool flung at Ulysses by Eurymachus.

      There came a common beggar, wont to ask    Alms through the town of Ithaca, well known    For greediness of stomach, gluttonous    And a wine-bibber, but of little strength    And courage, though he seemed of powerful mould.    Arnaeus was the name which at his birth    His mother gave him, but the young men called    The fellow Irus, for it was his wont    To go on errands, as a messenger,    When he was ordered. Coming now, he thought    To drive Ulysses out of his own house,    And railed at him, and said in winged words:﻿—  

    “Hence with thee! leave the porch, old man, at once,    Lest thou be taken by the foot and dragged    Away from it. Dost thou not see how all    Around us nod, to bid me drag thee out?    I am ashamed to do it. Rise and go,    Else haply we may have a strife of blows.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, frowned and said:    “Wretch! there is nothing that I do or say    To harm thee aught. I do not envy thee    What others give thee, though the dole be large;    And ample is this threshold for us both.    Nor shouldst thou envy others, for thou seemst    A straggler like myself. The gods bestow    Wealth where they list. But do not challenge me    To blows, lest, aged as I am, thou rouse    My anger, and I make thy breast and lips    Hideous with blood. Tomorrow then will be    A quiet day for me, since thou, I trust,    In all the time to come, wilt never more    Enter the palace of Laertes’ son.”  

    The beggar Irus angrily rejoined:    “Ye gods! this glutton prattles volubly,    Like an old woman at the chimney-side.    Yet could I do him mischief, smiting him    On both his sides, and dashing from his cheeks    The teeth to earth, as men are wont to deal    With swine that eat the wheat. Now gird thyself,    Let these men see us fighting. How canst thou    Think to contend with one so young as I?”  

    Thus fiercely did they wrangle as they stood    Beside the polished threshold and before    The lofty gates. The stout Antinoüs heard,    And, laughing heartily, bespake the rest:﻿—  

    “Here, friends, is what we never yet have had.    Behold the pleasant pastime which the gods    Provide for us. These men﻿—the stranger here,    And Irus﻿—quarrel, and will come to blows.    Let us stand by and bring the combat on.”  

    He spake. All rose with laughter and came round    The ragged beggars, while Eupeithes’ son,    Antinoüs, in these words harangued the rest:﻿—  

    “Ye noble suitors, hear me. At the fire    Already lie the paunches of two goats,    Preparing for our evening meal, and both    Are filled with fat and blood. Whoever shows    Himself the better man in this affray,    And conquers, he shall take the one of these    He chooses, and shall ever afterward    Feast at our table, and no man but he    Shall ever come among us asking alms.”  

    He ended. All approved his words, and thus    Ulysses, craftily dissembling, said:﻿—  

    “O friends, it is not well that one so old    As I, and broken by calamity,    Should fight a younger man; but hunger bids,    And I may be o’ercome by blows. But now    Swear all a solemn oath, that none of you,    To favor Irus, wickedly will raise    His mighty hand to smite me, and so aid    My adversary to my overthrow.”  

    He spake; the suitor-train, assenting, took    The oath, and when they all were duly sworn,    The highborn prince Telemachus began:﻿—  

    “O stranger, if thy manly heart be moved    To drive him hence, fear no one else of all    The Achaians. Whosoever strikes at thee    Has many to contend with. I am here    The host. Antinoüs and Eurymachus,    Wise men and kings, agree with me in this.”  

    He spake, and all approved. Ulysses drew    And girt his tatters round his waist and showed    His large and shapely thighs. Unclothed appeared    His full broad shoulders, and his manly breast    And sinewy arms. Minerva stood by him,    And with a mighty breadth of limb endued    The shepherd of the people. Earnestly    The suitors gazed, and wondered at the sight,    And each one, turning to his neighbor, said:﻿—  

    “Irus, poor Irus, on himself has drawn    An evil fate, for what a sinewy thigh    His adversary shows beneath his rags!”  

    So talked they, while the heart of Irus sank    Within him; yet the attendants girding him    Forcibly drew him forward, sore afraid,    The muscles quivering over every limb.    And then Antinoüs spake, and chid him thus:﻿—  

    “Now, boaster, thou deservest not to live,    Nay, nor to have been born, if thou dost fear    And quake at meeting one so old as he,    So broken with the hardships he has borne.    And now I tell thee what will yet be done,    Should he approve himself the better man,    And conquer. I will have thee sent on board    A galley to Epirus, and its king,    The foe of all men living, Echetus,    And he will pare away thy nose and ears    With the sharp steel, and, wrenching out the parts    Of shame, will cast them to be torn by dogs.”  

    He spake, and Irus shook through all his frame    With greater terror, yet they dragged him on    Into the midst. Both champions lifted up    Their arms. The godlike, much-enduring man,    Ulysses, pondered whether so to strike    His adversary that the breath of life    Might leave him as he fell, or only smite    To stretch him on the earth. As thus he mused,    The lighter blow seemed wisest, lest the Greeks    Should know who dealt it. When the hands of both    Were thus uplifted, Irus gave a blow    On his right shoulder, while Ulysses smote    Irus beneath the ear, and broke the bone    Within, and brought the red blood from his mouth.    He fell amid the dust, and shrieked and gnashed    His teeth, and beat with jerking feet the ground.    The suitor-train threw up their hands and laughed    Till breathless, while Ulysses seized his feet    And drew him o’er the threshold to the court    And the porch doors, and there, beside the wall,    Set him to lean against it, gave a staff    Into his hands, and said in winged words:﻿—  

    “Sit there, and scare away the dogs and swine,    But think not, wretched creature, to bear rule    Over the stranger and the beggar tribe,    Or worse than this may happen to thee yet.”  

    He spake, and o’er his shoulders threw the scrip    That yawned with chinks, and by a twisted thong    Was fastened; then he turned to take his seat    Upon the threshold, while the suitor-train    Went back into the palace with gay shouts    Of laughter, and bespake him blandly thus:﻿—  

    “Stranger, may Jove and all the other gods    Grant thee what thou desirest, and whate’er    Is pleasant to thee! Thou hast put an end    To this importunate beggar’s rounds among    The people. We shall send him off at once    Into Epirus, and to Echetus,    Its king, the foe of every living man.”  

    So talked the suitors, and the omen made    Ulysses glad. Meantime Antinoüs placed    The mighty paunch before the victor, filled    sWith blood and fat, and from the canister    Amphinomus brought forth two loaves, and raised    A golden cup and drank to him, and said:﻿—  

    “Hail, guest and father! happy be thy days    Henceforth, though dark with many sorrows now!”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Amphinomus, thou seemest most discreet,    And such thy father is, of whom I hear    A worshipful report, the good and rich    Dulichian Nisus. Thou, as I am told,    Art son to him, and thou art seemingly    A man of pertinent speech. I therefore say    To thee, and bid thee hear and mark me well,    No being whom earth nourishes to breathe    Her air and move upon her face is more    The sport of circumstance than man. For while    The gods give health, and he is strong of limb,    He thinks no evil in the coming days    Will overtake him. When the blessed gods    Visit him with afflictions, these he bears    Impatiently and with a fretful mind.    Such is the mood of man, while yet he dwells    On earth; it changes as the All-Father gives    The sunshine or withholds it. I was once    Deemed fortunate among my fellow-men,    And many things that were unjust I did;    For in my strength and in my father’s power,    And valor of my brothers, I had put    My trust. Let no man, therefore, dare to be    Unjust in aught, but tranquilly enjoy    Whatever good the gods vouchsafe to give.    Yet are these suitors guilty of foul wrong,    Wasting the substance and dishonoring    The wife of one who will not, as I deem,    Remain long distant from his friends and home,    But is already near. O, may some god    Remove thee from this danger to thy home!    Nor mayst thou meet him when he shall return    To his own land. For when he comes once more    Beneath this roof, and finds the suitors here,    Not without bloodshed will their parting be.”  

    He spake, and, pouring out a part, he drank    The wine, and gave the goblet to the prince,    Who crossed the hall, and sorrowfully shook    His head, for now already did his heart    Forebode the coming evil. Not by this    Did he escape his death. Minerva laid    A snare for him, that he might fall beneath,    The strong arm of Telemachus. He went    And took the seat from which he lately rose.  

    Then blue-eyed Pallas moved Penelope,    Sage daughter of Icarius, to appear    Before the suitors, that their base intent    Might be more fully seen, and she might win    More honor from her husband and her son.    Wherefore she forced a laugh, and thus began:﻿—  

    “Eurynomè, I would at length appear,    Though not till now, before the suitor-train,    Detested as they are. I there would speak    A word of timely warning to my son,    And give him counsel not to trust himself    Too much among the suitors, who are fair    In speech, but mean him foully in their hearts.”  

    Eurynomè, the household matron, said:    “Assuredly, my child, thou speakest well.    Go now, and warn thy son, and keep back naught.    First bathe, and, ere thou go, anoint thy cheeks,    Nor show them stained with tears. It is not well    To sorrow without end. For now thy son    Is grown, and thou beholdest him at length    What thou didst pray the gods, when he was born,    That he might yet become, a bearded man.”  

    And then the sage Penelope rejoined:    “Though anxious for my sake, persuade me not,    Eurynomè, to bathe, nor to anoint    My cheeks with oil. The gods inhabiting    Olympus took away their comeliness    When in his roomy ships my husband sailed;    But bid Antinoe come, and call with her    Hippodameïa, that they both may stand    Beside me in the hall. I will not go    Alone among the men, for very shame.”  

    She spake, the aged dame went forth to bear    The message, and to bring the women back.    While blue-eyed Pallas had yet other cares,    She brought a balmy sleep, and shed it o’er    The daughter of Icarius, as she lay    Reclined upon her couch, her limbs relaxed    In rest. The glorious goddess gave a dower    Of heavenly graces, that the Achaian chiefs    Might look on her amazed. She lighted up    Her fair face with a beauty all divine,    Such as the queenly Cytherea wears    When in the mazes of the dance she joins    The Graces. Then she made her to the sight    Of loftier stature and of statelier size,    And fairer than the ivory newly carved.    This having done, the gracious power withdrew,    While from the palace came the white-armed maids,    And prattled as they came. The balmy sleep    Forsook their mistress at the sound. She passed    Her hands across her cheeks, and thus she spake:﻿—  

    “ ’Twas a sweet sleep that, in my wretchedness,    Wrapped me just now. Would that, this very hour,    The chaste Diana by so soft a death    Might end me, that my days might be no more    Consumed in sorrow for a husband lost,    Of peerless worth, the noblest of the Greeks.”  

    She spake, and from the royal bower went down,    Yet not alone; two maidens went with her.    And when that most august of womankind    Drew near the suitors, at the door she stopped    Of that magnificent hall, and o’er her cheeks    Let fall the lustrous veil, while on each side    A modest maiden stood. The suitors all    Felt their knees tremble, and were sick with love,    And all desired her. Then the queen bespake    Telemachus, her well-beloved son:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, thy judgment is not firm,    Nor dost thou think aright. While yet a boy    Thy thought was wiser. Now that thou art grown,    And on the verge of manhood, so that one    Who comes from far and sees thy noble part    And stature well may say thou art the son    Of a most fortunate father, yet to think    And judge discreetly thou art not as then,    For what a deed is this which has been done    Even here! Thou hast allowed a stranger guest    To be assaulted rudely. How is this?    If one who sits a guest beneath our roof    Be outraged thus, be sure it brings to thee    Great shame and rank dishonor among men.”  

    To this discreet Telemachus replied:    “Mother, I cannot take it ill that thou    Shouldst be offended. But of many things    I have a clear discernment, and can weigh    The good and bad. I was till now a child,    Yet even now I cannot always see    The wiser course. These men bewilder me,    As, sitting side by side, they lay their plots    Against me, and I have no helper here.    When Irus and the stranger fought, the strife    Had no such issue as the suitors wished.    The stranger conquered. Would to Father Jove,    To Pallas and Apollo, that the crew    Of suitors here might sit with nodding heads    Struck down upon the spot, within these halls    Or in the courts, and all with powerless limbs,    As Irus sits beside the gate and nods,    Like one o’ercome with wine, nor can he stand    Upon his feet, nor go to where he dwells,    If home he has, so feeble are his limbs.”  

    So talked the twain awhile; then interposed    Eurymachus, and thus bespake the queen:﻿—  

    “Sage daughter of Icarius! if all those    Who in Iäsian Argos have their homes    Should once behold thee, a still larger crowd    Of suitors would tomorrow come and feast    Within thy halls, so much dost thou excel    In mind and form and face all womankind.”  

    To this the sage Penelope replied:    “Eurymachus, the immortals took away    Such grace of form and face as once was mine,    What time the sons of Argos sailed for Troy,    And with them went Ulysses, my espoused.    Should he return, and take again in charge    My household, greater would my glory be,    And prized more highly. I am wretched now,    Such woes the gods have heaped upon my head.    He, when he left his native island, grasped    My right hand at the wrist, and said to me:    ‘Think not, dear wife, that all the well-armed Greeks    Will come back safe from Troy. The Trojan men,    They say, are brave in war, expert to cast    The spear and wing the arrow, skilled to rein    The rapid steeds by which the bloody strife    Of battlefields is hurried to its close;    And therefore whether God will bring me back,    Or I shall fall in Troy, I cannot know.    Take charge of all things here. I leave with thee    My father and my mother in these halls.    Be kind to them as now, nay, more than now,    Since I shall not be here. When thou shalt see    My son a bearded man, take to thyself    A husband, whom thou wilt, and leave thy house.’    Such were his words, and they have been fulfilled.    The night will come in which I must endure    This hateful marriage, wretched that I am,    To whom the will of Jupiter forbids    All consolation, and this bitter thought    Weighs evermore upon my heart and soul.    The custom was not thus in other times;    When suitors wooed a noble wife, the child    Of some rich house, contending for her smile,    They came with beeves and fatling sheep to feast    The damsel’s friends, and gave munificent gifts,    But wasted not the wealth that was not theirs.”  

    She spake, Ulysses was rejoiced to see    That thus she sought to draw from each a gift,    With fair and artful words. Yet were his thoughts    Intent on other plans. Eupeithes’ son,    Antinoüs, thus made answer to the queen:﻿—  

    “Sage daughter of Icarius, only deign    To take the gifts which any of the Greeks    Will bring﻿—nor is it gracious to reject    A present﻿—yet be sure we go not hence,    To our estates nor elsewhere, till thou make    A bridegroom of the best Achaian here.”  

    So spake Antinoüs. All approved his words,    And each sent forth a herald for his gift.    The herald of Antinoüs brought to him    A robe of many colors, beautiful    And ample, with twelve golden clasps, which each    Had its well-fitted eye. Eurymachus    Received a golden necklace, richly wrought,    And set with amber beads, that glowed as if    With sunshine. To Eurydamas there came    A pair of earrings, each a triple gem,    Daintily fashioned and of exquisite grace.    Two servants bore them. From Pisander’s house﻿—    Son of the Prince Polyctor﻿—there was brought    A collar of rare beauty. Thus did each    Bestow a different yet becoming gift.    And then that most august of women went    Back to the upper chambers with her maids,    Who bore the sumptuous presents, while below    The suitors turned them to the dance and song,    Amused till evening came. Its darkness stole    Over their pastime. Then they brought and placed    Three hearths to light the palace, heaping them    With wood, well dried and hard and newly cleft.    With this they mingled flaming brands. The maids    Of the great sufferer, Ulysses, fed    The fire by turns. To them the hero spake:﻿—  

    “Ye maidens of a sovereign absent long,    Withdraw to where your highborn mistress sits;    There turn the spindle, seeking to amuse    Her lonely hours; there comb with your own hands    The fleece, and I will see that these have light.    Even though they linger till the Morn is here    In her bright car, they cannot overcome    My patience. I am practised to endure.”  

    So spake he, and the maidens, as they heard,    Cast at each other meaning looks, and laughed,    And one Melantho, of the rosy cheeks,    Railed at him impudently. She was born    To Dolius, but Penelope had reared    The damsel as a daughter of her own,    And given her, for her pleasure, many things;    Yet for the sorrows of Penelope    Melantho little cared. Eurymachus    Had made the girl his paramour. She spake,    And chid Ulysses with unmannerly words:﻿—  

    “Outlandish wretch! thou must be one whose brain    Is turned, since thou wilt neither go to sleep    Within a smithy, nor in any place    Of public shelter, but wilt stay and prate    Among this company with no restraint    Or reverence. Either wine has stolen away    Thy senses, or thy natural mood, perchance,    Prompts thee to chatter idly. Art thou proud    Of conquering Irus, that poor vagabond?    Beware lest someone of robuster arms    Than Irus seize and thrust thee out of doors    With a bruised head and face begrimed with blood.”  

    The sage Ulysses frowned on her and said:    “Impudent one, Telemachus shall hear    From me the saucy words which thou hast said,    And he will come and hew thee limb from limb.”  

    He spake; the damsels, frightened at his words,    Fled through the hall, and shook in every limb    With terror, lest his threat should be fulfilled.    He meantime stood beside the kindled hearths    And fed the flames, and, looking on the crowd    Of suitors, brooded in his secret heart    O’er plans that would not fail to be fulfilled.  

    But Pallas suffered not the suitors yet    To cease from railing speeches, all the more    To wound the spirit of Laertes’ son.    Eurymachus, the son of Polybus,    Began to scoff at him, and thus he spake    To wake the ready laughter of the rest:﻿—  

    “Hear me, ye suitors of the illustrious queen.    I speak the thought that comes into my mind.    Led by some god, no doubt, this man has come    Into the palace; for the light we have    Of torches seems to issue from the crown    Of his bald pate, a head without a hair.”  

    So said Eurymachus, and then bespake    Ulysses, the destroyer of walled towns:﻿—  

    “Stranger, if I accept thee, wilt thou serve    Upon the distant parts of my estate?    There shalt thou have fair wages, and shalt bring    The stones in heaps together, and shalt plant    Tall trees, and I will feed thee through the year,    And give thee clothes, and sandals for thy feet.    But thou art used, no doubt, to idle ways,    And never dost thou work with willing hands,    Bat dost prefer to roam the town and beg,    Purveying for thy gluttonous appetite.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:﻿—    “Eurymachus, if we were matched in work    Against each other in the time of spring    When days are long, and both were mowing grass,    And I had a curved scythe in hand and thou    Another, that we might keep up the strife    Till nightfall, fasting, mid the abundant grass;    Or if there were a yoke of steers to drive,    The sturdiest of their kind, sleek, large, well fed,    Of equal age, and equal strength to bear    The labor, and both strong, and if the field    Were of four acres, with a soil through which    The plough could cleave its way﻿—then shouldst thou see    How evenly my furrow would be turned.    Or should the son of Saturn send today    War from abroad, and I had but a shield,    Two spears, and, fitted to my brows, a helm    Of brass, thou wouldst behold me pressing on    Among the foremost warriors, and would see    No cause to rail at my keen appetite.    But arrogantly thou dost bear thyself,    And pitilessly; thou in thine own eyes    Art great and mighty, since thou dost consort    With few, and those are not the best of men.    Yet should Ulysses come to his own land,    These gates that seem so wide would suddenly    Become too narrow for thee in thy flight.”  

    He spake. Eurymachus grew yet more wroth,    And frowned on him, and said in winged words:﻿—  

    “Wretch! I shall do thee mischief. Thou art bold,    And babblest unabashed among us all.    The wine, perhaps, is in thy foolish head,    Or thou art always thus, and ever prone    To prattle impudently. Art thou proud    Of conquering Irus, that poor vagabond?”  

    Thus having said, he brandished in the air    A footstool; but Ulysses, to escape    The anger of Eurymachus, sat down    Before the knees of the Dulichian prince,    Amphinomus. The footstool flew, and struck    On the right arm the cupbearer. Down fell    The beaker ringing; he who bore it lay    Stretched in the dust. Then in those shadowy halls    The suitors rose in tumult. One of them    Looked at another by his side, and said:﻿—  

    “Would that this vagabond had met his death    Ere he came hither. This confusion, then,    Had never been. ’Tis for a beggar’s sake    We wrangle, and the feast will henceforth give    No pleasure; we shall go from bad to worse.”  

    Then rose in majesty Telemachus,    And said: “Ye are not in your senses sure,    Unhappy men, who cannot eat and drink    In peace. Some deity, no doubt, has moved    Your minds to frenzy. Now, when each of you    Has feasted well, let each withdraw to sleep,    Just when he will. I drive no man away.”  

    He spake; the suitors heard, and bit their lips,    And wondered at Telemachus, who spake    So resolutely. Then Amphinomus,    The son of Nisus Aretiades,    Stood forth, harangued the suitor-crowd, and said:﻿—  

    “O friends! let no one here with carping words    Seek to deny what is so justly said,    Nor yet molest the stranger, nor do harm    To any of the servants in the halls    Of the great chief Ulysses. Now let him    Who brings the guests their wine begin and fill    The cups, that, pouring to the gods their part,    We may withdraw to sleep. The stranger here    Leave me within the palace, and in charge    Of him to whom he came, Telemachus.”  

    He ended. All were pleased, and Mutlus then,    Hero and herald from Dulichium’s coast,    And follower of the prince Amphinomus,    Mingled a jar of wine, and went to each,    Dispensing it. They to the blessed gods    Poured first a part, and then they drank themselves    The generous juice. And when the wine was poured,    And they had drunk what each desired, they went    Homeward to slumber, each in his abode.  

            Book XIX  Ulysses Recognized by Eurycleia  

  Remoyal of the weapons from the hall by Ulysses and his son﻿—Interview of Penelope and Ulysses, who tells her that he has seen her husband in Crete, describes his person and dress, and affirms that within a month he will be in Ithaca﻿—The bath administered to Ulysses by Eurycleia, who recognizes him by a scar on his leg﻿—Narrative of the manner in which the scar was caused.

      Now was the godlike chief Ulysses left    In his own palace, planning, with the aid    Of Pallas, to destroy the suitor-train,    And thus bespake his son with winged words:﻿—  

    “Now is the time, Telemachus, to take    The weapons thac are here, and store them up    In the inner rooms. Then, if the suitors ask    The reason, answer them with specious words:    Say, ‘I have put them where there comes no smoke.    Since even now they do not seem the arms    Left by Ulysses when he sailed for Troy,    So tarnished are they by the breath of fire;    And yet another reason sways my mind,    The prompting of some god, that ye, when flushed    With wine and in the heat of a dispute,    May smite and wound each other, and disgrace    The banquet and your wooing; for the sight    Of steel doth draw men on to violence.’ ”  

    He ended, and Telemachus obeyed    His father’s words, and calling forth his nurse,    The aged Eurycleia, said to her:﻿—  

    “Go, nurse, and see the women all shut up    In their own place, while in our inner room    I lay away my father’s beautiful arms,    Neglected long, and sullied by the smoke,    While he was absent. I was then a child,    But now would keep them from the breath of fire.”  

    And thus the nurse, Dame Eurycleia, said:    “Would that at length, my child, thou didst exert    Thy proper wisdom here, and take in charge    Thy house and thy possessions. But who goes    With thee to bear a torch, since none of these,    Thy handmaids, are allowed to light thy way?”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “This stranger. No man may be idle here    Who eats my bread, though from a distant land.”  

    He spake, nor flew his words in vain. The nurse    Closed all the portals of that noble pile.    Ulysses and his glorious son in haste    Bore off the helmets, and the bossy shields,    And the sharp spears, while Pallas held to them    A golden lamp, that shed a fair clear light.    Then to his father spake Telemachus:﻿—  

    “Father! my eyes behold a marvel. All    The palace walls, each beautiful recess,    The fir-tree beams, the aspiring columns, shine,    Before my eyes, as with a blaze of fire.    Some god is surely here, someone of those    Who make their dwelling in the high broad heaven.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Keep silence; give thy thought no speech, nor ask    Concerning aught. Such is the wont of those    Who dwell upon Olympus. Now withdraw    To rest upon thy couch, while I remain,    For I would move thy mother and her maids    To ask of what concerns me. She, I deem,    Full sadly will inquire of many things.”  

    He spake; Telemachus departed thence,    By torchlight, to his chamber, there to rest    Where he was wont to lie when gentle sleep    Came over him. There lay he down to wait    The hallowed morning, while Ulysses, left    Within the palace, meditated still    Death to the suitors with Minerva’s aid.  

    The sage Penelope now left her bower;    Like Dian or like golden Venus came    The queen. Beside the hearth they placed for her    The throne where she was wont to sit, inlaid    With ivory and silver, which of yore    The artisan Icmalius wrought. They laid    Close to the throne a footstool, over which    Was spread an ample fleece. On this sat down    The sage Penelope. Her white-armed train    Of handmaids came with her; they cleared away    The abundant feast, and bore the tables off,    And cups from which those insolent men had drunk;    They laid upon the ground the lighted brands,    And heaped fresh fuel round them, both for light    And warmth. And now Melantho once again    Bespake Ulysses with unmannerly words:﻿—  

    “Stranger, wilt thou forever be a pest,    Ranging the house at night to play the spy    Upon the women? Leave the hall, thou wretch!    And gorge thyself without, else wilt thou go    Suddenly, driven by blows and flaming brands.”  

    The sage Ulysses frowned on her, and said:    “Pert creature! why so fiercely rail at me?    Is it that I am squalid and ill-clad,    And forced by want to beg from hand to hand?    Such is the fate of poor and wandering men.    I too was opulent once, inhabiting    A plenteous home among my fellow-men,    And often gave the wanderer alms, whoe’er    He might be and in whatsoever need;    And I had many servants, and large store    Of things by which men lead a life of ease    And are called rich. But Jupiter, the son    Of Saturn, put an end to this, for so    It pleased the god. Now, therefore, woman, think    That thou mayst lose the beauty which is now    Thy pride among the serving-women here;    Thy mistress may be wroth, and make thy life    A hard one; or Ulysses may come back﻿—    And there is hope of that. Or if it be    That he has perished, and returns no more,    There still remains his son Telemachus,    Who by Apollo’s grace is now a man,    And no one of the women in these halls    May think to misbehave, and yet escape    His eye, for he no longer is a boy.”  

    He spake; Penelope, the prudent, heard,    And, calling to her maid, rebuked her thus:﻿—  

    “O bold and shameless! I have taken note    Of thy behavior; thou hast done a wrong    For which thy head should answer. Well thou know’st,    For thou hast heard me say, that I would ask    The stranger in these halls if aught he knows    Of my Ulysses, for whose sake I grieve.”  

    Then to the matron of the household turned    The queen, and thus bespake Eurynomè:﻿—  

    “Bring now a seat, Eurynomè, and spread    A fleece upon it, where the stranger guest    May sit at ease, and hear what I shall say,    And answer me, for I have much to ask.”  

    She spake; the ancient handmaid brought with speed    A polished seat, and o’er it spread a fleece.    Ulysses, much-enduring chief, sat down,    And thus the sage Penelope began:﻿—  

    “First will I ask thee who thou art, and whence,    Where is thy birthplace, and thy parents who?”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “O lady, none in all the boundless earth    Can speak of thee with blame. Thy fame has reached    To the great heavens. It is like the renown    Of some most excellent king, of godlike sway    O’er many men and mighty, who upholds    Justice in all his realm. The dark-soiled earth    Brings wheat and barley forth; the trees are bowed    With fruit; the meadows swarm with noble herds,    The sea with fish, and under his wise reign    The people prosper. Therefore ask, I pray,    Of other things, while I am underneath    Thy palace-roof, but of my race and home    Inquire not, lest thou waken in my mind    Unhappy memories. I am a man    Of sorrow, and it would become me ill    To sit lamenting in another’s house    And shedding tears. Besides, a grief indulged    Doth grow in violence. Thy maids would blame,    And thou perhaps, and ye would call my tears    The maudlin tears of one o’ercome with wine.”  

    Then spake the sage Penelope again:    “Stranger, such grace of feature and of form    As once I had the immortals took away,    What time the Argive warriors sailed for Troy,    And my Ulysses with them. Could he now    Return to rule my household as of yore,    The wider and the brighter were my fame.    But now I lead a wretched life, so great    And many are the evils which some god    Heaps on me. For the chieftains who bear sway    Over the isles﻿—Dulichium, and the fields    Of Samos, and Zacynthus dark with woods,    And those who rule in sunny Ithaca﻿—    Woo me against my will, and waste away    My substance. Therefore have I small regard    For strangers and for suppliants, and the tribe    Of heralds, servants of the public weal,    But, pining for Ulysses, wear away    My life. The suitors urge the marriage rite,    And I with art delay it. Once some god    Prompted me to begin an ample web,    Wide and of subtle texture, in my rooms.    And then I said: ‘Youths, who are pressing me    To marriage, since Ulysses is no more,    Urge me no further till I shall complete﻿—    That so the threads may not be spun in vain﻿—    This shroud for old Laertes, when grim fate    And death’s long sleep at last shall overtake    The hero; else among the multitude    Of Grecian women I shall bear the blame,    If one whose ample wealth so well was known    Should lie in death without a funeral robe.’    I spake, and easily their minds were swayed    By what I said, and I began to weave    The ample web, but ravelled it again    By torchlight every evening. For three years    I foiled them thus; but when the fourth year came,    And brought its train of hours and changing moons,    And many days had passed, they came on me,    And through my maidens’ fault, a careless crew,    They caught me at my fraud, and chid me sore.    sSo, though unwilling, I was forced to end    My task, and cannot longer now escape    The marriage, nor is any refuge left.    My parents both exhort me earnestly    To choose a husband, and my son with grief    Beholds the suitors wasting his estate,    And he already is a man and well    Can rule his household; Jupiter bestows so.    Such honor on him. Now, I pray, declare    Thy lineage, for thou surely art not sprung    From the old fabulous oak, nor from a rock.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered her:    “O royal consort of Laertes’ son!    Wilt thou still ask my lineage? I will then    Disclose it, but thou wakest in my heart    New sorrows. So it ever is with one    Who long, like me, is far away from home,    Wandering in many realms, and suffering much;    But since thou dost require it, thou shalt hear.  

    “Crete is a region lying in the midst    Of the black deep, a fair and fruitful land,    Girt by the waters. Many are the men,    Nay, numberless, who make it their abode,    And ninety are its cities. Different tongues    Are spoken by the dwellers of the isle.    In part they are Achaians, and in part    Are Cretans of the soil, a gallant stock;    There dwell Cydonians, Dorians of three tribes,    And proud Pelasgians. Their great capital    Is Cnossus, where the monarch Minos dwelt,    He who at every nine years’ end conferred    With Jove almighty; and to him was born    Deucalion, my brave father, who begat    Me and Idomeneus, the King of Crete.    To Ilium in his beaked galleys sailed    Idomeneus with Atreus’ sons. My name﻿—    A name well known﻿—is Aethon. ’Twas at Crete    I saw Ulysses, who received from me    The welcome due a guest. A violent wind    Had driven him from Maleia and the course    That led to Ilium, and had carried him    To Crete, and lodged him in the dangerous port    Amnisus, close to Ilithyia’s cave,    Where scarce his fleet escaped the hurricane.    Thence came he to the city, and inquired    For King Idomeneus, who was, he said,    His dear and honored guest; but he had sailed    Ten days before, perhaps eleven, for Troy,    In his beaked galleys. To the palace there    I led Ulysses, and with liberal cheer    Welcomed the chief, for plentifully stored    The royal dwelling was. I also gave    Meal from the public magazines to him    And those who followed him, and dark red wine    Brought from the country round, and beeves to slay    In sacrifice, that so their hearts might feel    No lack of aught. Twelve days the noble Greeks    Remained with us. A violent north-wind,    Which scarcely suffered them to stand upright    On shore, withstood them. Some unfriendly power    Had bid it blow; but on the thirteenth day    Its fury ceased, and the fleet put to sea.”  

    Thus went he on, inventing tales that seemed    Like truth. She listened, melting into tears    That flowed as when on mountain height the snow,    Shed by the west-wind, feels the east-wind’s breath,    And flows in water, and the hurrying streams    Are filled; so did Penelope’s fair cheeks    Seem to dissolve in tears﻿—tears shed for him    Who sat beside her even then. He saw    His weeping wife, and pitied her at heart;    Yet were his eyes like iron or like horn,    And moved not in their lids; for artfully    He kept his tears from falling. When the queen    Had ceased to weep, she answered him and said:﻿—  

    “Now, stranger, let me prove thee, if in truth    Thou didst receive, as thou hast just declared,    In thine abode, my husband and his train    Of noble friends. Describe the garb he wore;    How looked he, and the friends he brought with him?”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered her:    “O lady, hard it is to answer thee,    So long have I been far away from home.    ’Tis now the twentieth year since he was there    And left the isle, but, as my memory bids,    So will I speak. A fleecy purple cloak    Ulysses wore, a double web; the clasp    Was golden, with two fastenings, and in front    It showed a work of rare design﻿—a hound    That held in his forepaws a spotted fawn,    Struggling before his open mouth. Although    The figures were of gold, we all admired    The hound intent to break his victim’s neck,    The fawn that, writhing, plied her nimble feet    To free herself. Around the hero’s chest    And waist I saw a lustrous tunic worn,    Soft, like the thin film of the onion dried,    And bright as sunshine; many ladies looked    With wonder on it. Yet consider this;    I know not whether thus attired he left    His home, or whether, in the voyage thence,    Some comrade gave the garments, or perhaps    Some friendly host, for he was very dear    To many; among the Greeks were few like him.    I gave him, from myself, a brazen sword,    And a fair purple cloak, a double web,    Besides a tunic reaching to his feet,    And with due honors sent him on his way    In his good ship. There came and went with him    A herald somewhat older than himself;    Let me portray him﻿—hunchbacked, swarthy skinned,    And curly haired, Eurybates his name.    Ulysses honored him above the rest    Of his companions, for they thought alike.”  

    He ceased; the queen was moved to deeper grief,    For she remembered all the tokens well    Of which he spake; and when that passionate gust    Of weeping ceased, she spake again and said:﻿—  

    “Stranger, till now thy presence in these halls    Has only moved my pity; thou henceforth    Art dear and honored. It was I who gave    The garments thou hast told me of; these hands    Folded them in my chamber. I put on    The glittering clasp to be his ornament,    And now I never shall behold him more    Returning to his own dear land and home;    So cruel was the fate that took him hence    To Ilium, in his roomy ship, a town    Of evil omen never to be named.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “O gracious consort of Laertes’ son!    Let not thy grief for him whom thou hast lost    Wither thy beauty longer, and consume    Thy heart. And yet I blame thee not at all;    For any wife in losing him to whom    She gave herself while yet a maid, and bore    Children, will mourn him, though he be in worth    Below Ulysses, who, as fame declares,    Is like the gods. But cease to grieve, and hear    What I shall say, and I shall speak the truth,    Nor will I hide from thee that I have heard,    But lately from Ulysses, yet alive,    And journeying homeward, in the opulent realm    Of the Thesprotians, whence he brings with him    Much and rare treasure, gathered there among    The people. His beloved friends he lost,    And his good ship; the black deep swallowed them    In coming from Trinacria, for his crew    Had slaughtered there the oxen of the Sun.    The Sun and Jove were angry; therefore all    His comrades perished in the billowy sea;    But him upon his galley’s keel the wind    Drove to the coast where the Phaeacians dwell,    The kinsmen of the gods. They welcomed him,    And honored him as if he were a god,    And gave him many things, and would have sent    The hero safely to his native isle;    And here Ulysses would have been long since,    But that he deemed it wise to travel far,    And gather wealth﻿—for well UJysses knew,    Beyond all other men, the arts of gain,    And none in these could think to rival him;    So Pheidon, king of the Thesprotians said,    Who also, in his palace, swore to me﻿—    As to the gods of heaven he poured the wine﻿—    That even then a galley was drawn down    Into the water, and already manned    With rowers, who should take Ulysses home.    But me he first dismissed, for at the time    A barque of the Thesprotians left the port,    Bound for Dulichium’s cornfields. Ere I went    He showed the treasures of Ulysses stored    In the king’s palace﻿—treasures that might serve    To feed the household of another chief    To the tenth generation. He who owned    That wealth was at Dodona, so the king    Declared, inquiring, at the lofty oak    Of Jupiter, the counsel of the god    How to return to his dear native land,    So long a wanderer﻿—whether openly    Or else by stealth. So he is safe, and soon    Will he be nearer to us; for not long    Can he remain away from all his friends    And fatherland. To this I plight my oath;    Let Jove, the greatest and the best of gods,    Be witness, and this hearth of the good prince    Ulysses, where I sit, that every word    Which I have said to thee will be fulfilled.    Within the year Ulysses will return,    As this month passes and the next comes in.”  

    Then spake the sage Penelope again:    “Would that it might be thus, O stranger guest,    As thou hast said; then shouldst thou have such thanks    And bounty at my hands that everyone    Who meets thee should rejoice with thee. And yet    The thought abides with me, and so indeed    It must be, that Ulysses will no more    Return, nor wilt thou find an escort hence;    For now no master like Ulysses rules﻿—    And what a man was he!﻿—within these walls,    To welcome or dismiss the honored guest.    But now, ye maidens, let the stranger bathe,    And spread his couch with blankets, fleecy cloaks,    And showy tapestries, that he may lie    Warm till the Morning, in her golden car,    Draw near; then with the early morn again    Bathe and anoint him, that he may sit down    Beside Telemachus prepared to take    His morning meal. Ill shall he fare who dares    Molest the stranger; he shall have no place    Or office here, however he may rage.    And how, O stranger, wouldst thou learn that I    In mind and thoughtful wisdom am above    All other women, if I let thee sit    Squalid and meanly clad at banquets here?    Short is the life of man, and whoso bears    A cruel heart, devising cruel things,    On him men call down evil from the gods    While living, and pursue him, when he dies,    With scoffs. But whoso is of generous heart    And harbors generous aims, his guests proclaim    His praises far and wide to all mankind,    And numberless are they who call him good.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “O gracious consort of Laertes’ son!    Such cloaks and splendid coverings please me not,    Since in my long-oared barque I left behind    The snowy peaks of Crete. I still will lie,    As I am wont through many a sleepless night,    On a mean couch to wait the holy Morn    Upon her car of gold. I do not like    This washing of the feet. No maiden here    That ministers to thee may touch my foot;    But if among them be some aged dame    And faithful, who has suffered in her life    As I have suffered, she may touch my feet.”  

    And thus the sage Penelope rejoined:    “Dear guest﻿—for never to these halls has come    A stranger so discreet or better liked    By me, so wisely thou dost speak, and well﻿—    I have an aged prudent dame, whose care    Reared my unfortunate husband. She received    The nursling when his mother brought him forth,    And she, though small her strength, will wash thy feet.    Rise, prudent Eurycleia, thou shalt wash    The feet of one whose years must be the same    As thy own master’s; such is doubtless now    Ulysses, with such wrinkled feet and hands.    For quickly doth misfortune make men old.”  

    She spake; the aged handmaid hid her face    With both her hands, and, shedding bitter tears,    Thus sorrowfully to the queen replied:﻿—  

    “My heart is sad for thee, my son; and yet    I can do nothing. Can it be that Jove    Hates thee beyond all other? though thyself    So reverent to the gods? No man on earth    Has burned so many thighs of fatling beasts    And chosen hecatombs as thou to Jove    The Thunderer, with prayer that thou mayst reach    A calm old age, and rear thy glorious son    To manhood; yet the god hath cut thee off    From thy return forever. Even now    Perchance the women of some princely house    Which he has entered in some distant land    Scoff at him as these wretched creatures scoff    At thee, O stranger, who, to shun their taunts    And insults, wilt not suffer them to wash    Thy feet. The sage Penelope commands,    And I am not unwilling. I will wash    Thy feet, both for her sake and for thy own;    For deeply am I moved at sight of thee.    Hear what I say: of strangers in distress    Come many hither, yet have I beheld    No one who bears, in shape and voice and feet,    Such likeness to our absent lord as thou.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, thus replied:    “O aged woman, so has it been said    By all who have beheld both him and me.    They all declare that we are very like    Each other; thou in this hast spoken well.”  

    He spake; she took a shining vase designed    For washing feet, and poured cold water in    In large abundance, and warm water next.    Ulysses, who had sat before the hearth,    Moved to a darker spot, for in his mind    The thought arose that she might find a scar    Upon his limbs in handling them, and thus    His secret would be known. She came and bathed    His feet, and found the scar. ’Twas where a boar    With his white tooth had gashed the limb, as once    He journeyed to Parnassus, where he paid    A visit to Autolycus and his sons,    His mother’s noble father, who excelled    All men in craft and oaths, such was the gift    Conferred on him by Hermes; for to him    Autolycus made grateful offerings,    The thighs of lambs and kids, and evermore    The god was with him. Once Autolycus    Came to the opulent realm of Ithaca,    And found his daughter with a son new born;    There Eurycleia placed upon his knees    The infant, just as he had supped, and said:﻿—  

    “Give this dear babe, Autolycus, a name﻿—    Thy daughter’s son, vouchsafed to many prayers.”  

    And thus Autolycus in answer spake:    “Daughter and son-in-law, be his the name    That I shall give. In coming to his isle    I bear the hate of many﻿—both of men    And women﻿—scattered o’er the nourishing earth;    Name him Ulysses therefore, and when, grown    To man’s estate, he visits the proud halls    Reared at Parnassus, where his mother dwelt    And my possessions lie, I will bestow    A share on him, and send him home rejoiced.”  

    And therefore went Ulysses to receive    The promised princely gifts. Autolycus    And all his sons received him with kind words,    And friendly grasp of hands. Amphithea there﻿—    His mother’s mother﻿—took him in her arms,    And kissed his brow and both his beautiful eyes.    Then to his noble sons Autolycus    Called to prepare a feast, and they obeyed.    They brought and slew a steer of five years old,    And flayed and dressed it, hewed the joints apart,    And sliced the flesh, and fixed it upon spits,    Roasted it carefully, and gave to each    His part. So all the day till set of sun    They feasted, to the full content of all.    And when the sun had set, and earth grew dark,    They laid them down, and took the gift of sleep.    But when the rosy-fingered Morn appeared,    Born of the Dawn, forth issued the young men,    The children of Autolycus, with hounds,    To hunt, attended by their noble guest,    Ulysses. Up the steeps of that high mount    Parnassus, clothed with woods, they climbed, and soon    Were on its airy heights. The sun, new risen    From the deep ocean’s gently flowing stream,    Now smote the fields. The hunters reached a dell;    The hounds before them tracked the game; behind    Followed the children of Autolycus.    The generous youth Ulysses, brandishing    A spear of mighty length, came pressing on    Close to the hounds. There lay a huge wild boar    Within a thicket, where moist-blowing winds    Came not, nor in his brightness could the sun    Pierce with his beams the covert, nor the rain    Pelt through, so closely grew the shrubs. The ground    Was heaped with sheddings of the withered leaves.    Around him came the noise of dogs and men    Approaching swiftly. From his lair he sprang    And faced them, with the bristles on his neck    Upright, and flashing eyes. Ulysses rushed    Before the others, with the ponderous spear    Raised high in his strong hand intent to smite.    The boar was first to strike; he dealt a blow    Sidelong, and gashed his foe above the knee,    And tore the flesh, but left untouched the bone.    Ulysses, striking with his burnished spear    The boar’s right shoulder, drove the weapon through.    He fell with piercing cries amid the dust,    And the life left him. Then around their guest    The kindly children of Autolycus    Came and bound up with care the wound, and stanched    With spells the dark blood of the blameless youth,    And hastened with him to their father’s home.    And when Autolycus and they his sons    Had seen him wholly healed, they loaded him    With presents, and, rejoicing for his sake,    Sent him rejoicing back to Ithaca.    His father and his gracious mother there    Rejoiced in turn, and asked him of the scar,    And how it came, and he related all﻿—    How by the white tusk of a savage boar    The wound was given on the Parnassian heights,    As he was hunting with her father’s sons.  

    The aged woman, as she took the foot    Into her hands, perceived by touch the scar,    And, letting fall the limb, it struck the vase.    Loud rang the brass, the vase was overturned,    And poured the water forth. At once a rush    Of gladness and of grief came o’er her heart.    Tears filled her eyes, and her clear voice was choked.    She touched Ulysses on the chin, and said:﻿—  

    “Dear child! thou art Ulysses, of a truth.    I knew thee not till I had touched the scar.”  

    So speaking, toward Penelope she turned    Her eyes, about to tell her that her lord    Was in the palace; but the queen saw not,    And all that passed was unperceived by her,    For Pallas turned her thoughts another way.    Meantime, Ulysses on the nurse’s throat    Laid his right hand, and with the other drew    The aged woman nearer him, and said:﻿—  

    “Nurse, wouldst thou ruin me, who drew long since    Milk from thy bosom, and who now return,    After much suffering borne for twenty years,    To mine own land? Now then, since thou hast learned    The truth﻿—by prompting of some god, no doubt﻿—    Keep silence, lest some others in the house    Should learn it also. Else﻿—I tell thee this,    And will perform my word﻿—if God permit    That I o’ercome the arrogant suitor-crew,    Nurse as thou art, I spare not even thee,    When in these halls the other maidens die.”  

    Then thus the prudent Eurycleia said:    “What words, my son, have passed thy lips? for well    Thou knowest my firm mind; it never yields.    Like solid rock or steel I keep my trust.    This let me tell thee, and, I pray thee, keep    My words in mind. If, by the aid of God,    Thou overcome the arrogant suitor-crew,    Then will I name the handmaids that disgrace    Thy household, and point out the innocent.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, thus rejoined:    “Why name them, nurse? It needs not. I myself    Shall watch them, and shall know them all. Hold thou    Thy peace, and leave the issue with the gods.”  

    He spake; the aged woman left the place    To bring a second bath, for on the floor    The first was spilled. When she had bathed his feet    And made them smooth with oil, Ulysses drew Close to the hearth his seat again, to take 6x5 The warmth, and with his tatters hid the scar. And thus the sage Penelope began:﻿—  

    “Stranger, but little longer will I yet    Inquire; the hour of grateful rest is near    For those who, though unhappy, can receive    The balm of slumber. Yet for me some god    Appoints immeasurable grief. All day    In sorrows and in sighs, my solace is    To oversee my maidens at their tasks    Here in the palace; but when evening comes,    And all betake themselves to rest, I lie    Upon my couch, and sorrows thick and sharp    Awake new misery in my heart. As when,    In the fresh spring, the swarthy Nightingale,    Daughter of Pandarus, among thick leaves    Sings sweetly to the woods, and, changing oft    The strain, pours forth her voice of many notes,    Lamenting the beloved Itylus,    Her son by royal Zethos, whom she smote    Unwittingly, and slew; with such quick change    My mind is tossed from thought to thought. I muse    Whether to keep my place beside my son,    And hold what here is mine, my dower, my maids    And high-roofed halls, as one who still reveres    Her husband’s bed, and heeds the public voice,    Or follow one of the Achaian chiefs,    The noblest of the wooers, and the one    Who offers marriage presents without stint.    My son’s green years, while he was yet a boy,    Unripe in mind, allowed me not to wed,    And leave his father’s home; but he is grown,    And on the verge of manhood. He desires    That I should leave the palace, for his wrath    Is great against the men who waste his wealth.    Hear, and interpret now a dream of mine:    Within these courts are twenty geese that eat    Corn from the water, and I look on them    Pleased and amused. From off a mountain came    A hook-beaked eagle, broke their necks, and left    Their bodies strewn about the palace dead,    And soared again into the air of heaven.    I wept and moaned, although it was a dream;    And round me came the fair-haired Grecian maids,    Lamenting wildly that the bird of prey    Had slain my geese. Then came the eagle back,    And took his perch upon the jutting roof,    And thus bespake me in a human voice:﻿—  

    “ ‘O daughter cf Icarius, the renowned!    Let not thy heart be troubled; this is not    A dream, but a true vision, and will be    Fulfilled. The geese denote the suitor-train,    And I, who was an eagle once, am come,    Thy husband, now to end them utterly.’  

    “He spake; my slumbers left me, and I looked,    And saw the geese that in the palace still    Were at their trough, and feeding as before.”  

    And thus Ulysses, the sagacious, said:    “Lady, the dream that visited thy sleep    Cannot be wrested to another sense.    Ulysses has himself revealed to thee    The way of its fulfillment. Death is near    The suitors, and not one escapes his doom.”  

    Then spake the sage Penelope again:    “Of dreams, O stranger, some are meaningless    And idle, and can never be fulfilled.    Two portals are there for their shadowy shapes,    Of ivory one, and one of horn. The dreams    That come through the carved ivory deceive    With promises that never are made good;    But those which pass the doors of polished horn,    And are beheld of men, are ever true.    And yet I cannot hope that my strange dream    Came through them, though my son and I would both    Rejoice if it were so. This let me say,    And heed me well. Tomorrow brings to us    The hateful morn which takes me from my home,    The palace of Ulysses. I shall now    Propose a contest. In the palace court    Ulysses in a row set up twelve stakes,    Like props that hold a galley up; each stake    Had its own ring; he stood afar, and sent    An arrow through them all. I shall propose    This contest to the suitors. He who bends    The bow with easy mastery, and sends    Through the twelve rings an arrow, I will take    To follow from the palace where I passed    My youthful married life﻿—a beautiful home,    And stored with wealth; a home which I shall long    Remember, even in my nightly dreams.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “O gracious consort of Laertes’ son!    Let not this contest be delayed; the man    Of ready wiles, Ulysses, will be here    Ere, tampering with the hero’s polished bow,    The suitors shall prevail to stretch the cord,    And send an arrow through the rings of steel.”  

    And thus the sage Penelope rejoined:    “Stranger, if, sitting in the palace here,    Thou still wouldst entertain me as thou dost,    Sleep would not fall upon my lids; and yet    Sleepless the race of mortals cannot be,    So have the gods ordained, who measure out    His lot to man upon the nourishing earth.    I to the upper rooms withdraw, to take    My place upon the couch which has become    To me a place of sorrow and of tears    Since my Ulysses went away to Troy,    That fatal town which should be named no more.    And I will lay me down; but thou remain    Within these walls, and make the floor thy bed,    Or let these maidens spread a couch for thee.”  

    Penelope, thus having spoken, went    Up to her royal bower, but not alone;    Her maids went with her. When they were within    She wept for her dear husband, till at length    The blue-eyed Pallas graciously distilled    Upon her closing lids the balm of sleep.  

            Book XX  The Last Banquet of the Suitors  

  Disorderly conduct of the serving-women﻿—Prayer of Ulysses for a favorable omen﻿—Its fulfillment﻿—Preparations for a feast of the suitors in the palace﻿—The feast﻿—Ulysses insulted by Ctesippus, who is reproved by Telemachus﻿—Strange prodigies observed by Theoclymenus, who leaves the hall.

      The noble chief, Ulysses, in the porch    Lay down to rest. An undressed bullock’s hide    Was under him, and over that the skins    Of sheep, which for the daily sacrifice    The Achaians slew. Eurynomè had spread    A cloak above him. There he lay awake,    And meditated how he yet should smite    The suitors down. Meantime, with cries of mirth    And laughter, came the women forth to seek    The suitors’ arms. Ulysses, inly moved    With anger, pondered whether he should rise    And put them all to death, or give their shame    A respite for another night, the last.    His heart raged in his bosom. As a hound    Growls, walking round her whelps, when she beholds    A stranger, and is eager for the attack,    So growled his heart within him, and so fierce    Was his impatience with that shameless crew.    He smote his breast, and thus he chid his heart:﻿—  

    “Endure it, heart! thou didst bear worse than this.    When the grim Cyclops of resistless strength    Devoured thy brave companions, thou couldst still    Endure, till thou by stratagem didst leave    The cave in which it seemed that thou must die.”  

    Thus he rebuked his heart, and, growing calm,    His heart submitted; but the hero tossed    From side to side. As when one turns and turns    The stomach of a bullock filled with fat    And blood before a fiercely blazing fire    And wishes it were done, so did the chief    Shift oft from side to side, while pondering how    To lay a strong hand on the multitude    Of shameless suitors﻿—he but one, and they    So many. Meantime Pallas, sliding down    From heaven, in form a woman, came, and there    Beside his bed stood over him, and spake:﻿—  

    “Why, most unhappy of the sons of men,    Art thou still sleepless? This is thine abode,    And here thou hast thy consort and a son    Whom any man might covet for his own.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Truly, O goddess, all that thou hast said    Is rightly spoken. This perplexes me﻿—    How to lay hands upon these shameless men,    When I am only one, and they a throng    That fill the palace. Yet another thought,    And mightier still﻿—if, by thy aid and Jove’s,    I slay the suitors, how shall I myself    Be safe thereafter? Think, I pray, of this.”  

    And thus in turn the blue-eyed Pallas said:    “O faint of spirit! in an humbler friend    Than I am, in a friend of mortal birth    And less farseeing, one might put his trust;    But I am born a goddess, and protect    Thy life in every danger. Let me say,    And plainly say, if fifty armed bands    Of men should gather round us, eager all    To take thy life, thou mightest drive away,    Unharmed by them, their herds and pampered flocks.    But give thyself to sleep. To wake and watch    All night is most unwholesome. Thou shalt find    A happy issue from thy troubles yet.”  

    She spake, and, shedding slumber on his lids,    Upward the glorious goddess took her way    Back to Olympus, when she saw that sleep    Had seized him, making him forget all care    And slackening every limb. His faithful wife    Was still awake, and sat upright and wept    On her soft couch, and after many tears    The glorious lady prayed to Dian thus:﻿—  

    “Goddess august! Diana, child of Jove!    I would that thou wouldst send into my heart    A shaft to take my life, or that a storm    Would seize and hurl me through the paths of air,    And cast me into ocean’s restless streams,    As once a storm, descending, swept away    The daughters born to Pandarus. The gods    Had slain their parents, and they dwelt alone    As orphans in their palace, nourished there    By blessed Venus with the curds of milk,    And honey, and sweet wine, while Juno gave    Beauty and wit beyond all womankind,    And chaste Diana dignity of form,    And Pallas every art that graces life.    Then, as the blessed Venus went to ask    For them, of Jove the Thunderer, on the heights    Of his Olympian mount, the crowning gift    Of happy marriage﻿—for to Jove is known    Whatever comes to pass, and what shall be    The fortune, good or ill, of mortal men﻿—    The Harpies came meantime, bore off the maids,    And gave them to the hateful sisterhood    Of Furies as their servants. So may those    Who dwell upon Olympus make an end    Of me, or fair-haired Dian strike me down,    That, with the image of Ulysses still    Before my mind, I may not seek to please    One of less worth. This evil might be borne    By one who weeps all day, and feels at heart    A settled sorrow, yet can sleep at night.    For sleep, when once it weighs the eyelids down,    Makes men unmindful both of good and ill,    And all things else. But me some deity    Visits with fearful dreams. There lay by me,    This very night, one like him, as he was    When with his armed men he sailed for Troy;    And I was glad, for certainly I deemed    It was a real presence, and no dream.”  

    She spake. Just then, upon her car of gold,    Appeared the Morn. The great Ulysses heard    That voice of lamentation; anxiously    He mused; it seemed to him as if the queen    Stood over him and knew him. Gathering up    In haste the cloak and skins on which he slept,    He laid them in the palace on a seat,    But bore the bull’s hide forth in open air,    And lifted up his hands and prayed to Jove:﻿—  

    “O Father Jove, and all the gods! if ye    Have led me graciously, o’er land and deep,    Across the earth, and, after suffering much,    To mine own isle, let one of those who watch    Within the palace speak some ominous word,    And grant a sign from thee without these walls.”  

    So prayed he. All-providing Jupiter    Hearkened, and thundered from the clouds around    The bright Olympian peaks. Ulysses heard    With gladness. From a room within the house,    In which the mills of the king’s household stood,    A woman, laboring at the quern, gave forth    An omen also. There were twelve who toiled    In making flour of barley and of wheat﻿—    The strength of man. The rest were all asleep;    Their tasks were done; one only, of less strength    Than any other there, kept toiling on.    She paused a moment, stopped the whirling stone,    And spake these words﻿—a portent for the king:﻿—  

    “O Father Jove, the king of gods and men!    Thou hast just thundered from the starry heaven,    And yet there is no cloud. To someone here    It is a portent. O perform for me,    All helpless as I am, this one request!    Let now the suitors in this palace take    Their last and final pleasant feast today﻿—    These men who make my limbs, with constant toil,    In grinding corn for them, to lose their strength,    Once let them banquet here, and then no more.”  

    She spake; the omen of the woman’s words    And Jove’s loud thunder pleased Ulysses well;    And now he deemed he should avenge himself    Upon the guilty ones. The other maids    Of that fair palace of Ulysses woke    And came together, and upon the hearth    Kindled a steady fire. Telemachus    Rose from his bed in presence like a god,    Put on his garments, hung his trenchant sword    Upon his shoulder, tied to his fair feet    The shapely sandals, took his massive spear    Tipped with sharp brass, and, stopping as he reached    The threshold, spake to Eurycleia thus:﻿—  

    “Dear nurse, have ye with honor fed and lodged    Dur guest, or have ye suffered him to find    A lodging where he might, without your care?    Discerning as she is, my mother pays    High honor to the worse among her guests,    And sends the nobler man unhonored hence.”  

    And thus the prudent Eurycleia said:    “My child, blame not thy mother; she deserves    No blame. The stranger sat and drank his wine,    All that he would, and said, when pressed to eat,    That he desired no more. And when he thought    Of sleep, she bade her maidens spread his couch;    But he refused a bed and rugs, like one    Inured to misery, and beneath the porch    Slept on an undressed bull’s hide and the skins    Of sheep, and over him we cast a cloak.”  

    She spake; Telemachus, his spear in hand,    Went forth, his fleet dogs following him. He sought    The council where the well-greaved Greeks were met.    Meantime the noble Eurycleia, child    Of Ops, Pisenor’s son, bespake the maids:﻿—  

    “Come, some of you, at once, and sweep the floor,    And sprinkle it, and on the shapely thrones    Spread coverings of purple tapestry;    Let others wipe the tables with a sponge,    And cleanse the beakers and the double cups,    While others go for water to the fount,    And bring it quickly, for not long today    The suitors will be absent from these halls.    They will come early to the general feast.”  

    She spake; the handmaids hearkened and obeyed,    And twenty went to the dark well to draw    The water, while the others busily    Bestirred themselves about the house. Then came    The servants of the chiefs, and set themselves    Neatly to cleave the wood. Then also came    The women from the well. The swineherd last    Came with three swine, the fattest of the herd.    In that fair court he let them feed, and sought    Ulysses, greeting him with courteous words:﻿—  

    “Hast thou, O stranger, found among these Greeks    More reverence? Art thou still their mark of scorn?”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “O that the gods, Eumaeus, would avenge    The insolence of those who meditate    Violent deeds, and make another’s house    Their plotting-place, and feel no touch of shame!”  

    So talked they with each other. Now appeared    Melanthius, keeper of the goats. He brought    Goats for the suitors’ banquet; they were choice    Beyond all others. With him also came    Two goatherds. In the echoing portico    He bound his goats. He saw Ulvsses there,    And thus accosted him with railing words:﻿—  

    “Stranger, art thou still here, the palace pest,    And begging still, and wilt thou ne’er depart?    We shall not end this quarrel, I perceive,    Till thou hast tried the flavor of my fist    It is not decent to be begging here    Continually; the Greeks have other feasts.”  

    He spake; Ulysses answered not, but shook    His head in silence, planning fearful things.  

    Philoetius now, a master-herdsman, came,    And for the banquet of the suitors led    A heifer that had never yeaned, and goats    The fatlings of the flock; they came across    The ferry, brought by those whose office is    To bear whoever comes from shore to shore.    He bound his animals in the sounding porch,    And went and, standing by the swineherd, said:﻿—  

    “Who, swineherd, is the stranger newly come    To this our palace? of what parents born,    And of what race, and where his native land?    Unhappy seemingly, yet like a king    In person. Sorrowful must be the lot    Of men who wander to and fro on earth,    When even to kings the gods appoint distress.”  

    He spake, and, greeting with his offered hand    Ulysses, said in winged words aloud:﻿—  

    “Stranger and father, hail! and mayst thou yet    Be happy in the years to come at least,    Though held in thrall by many sorrows now.    Yet thou, All-father Jove! art most austere    Of all the gods, not sparing even those    Who have their birth from thee, but bringing them    To grief and pain. The sweat is on my brow    When I behold this stranger, and my eyes    Are filled with tears when to my mind comes back    The image of Ulysses, who must now,    I think, be wandering, clothed in rags like thee,    Among the abodes of men, if yet indeed    He lives and sees the sweet light of the sun.    But if that he be dead, and in the abode    Of Pluto, woe is me for his dear sake!    The blameless chief, who when I was a boy    Gave to me, in the Cephalenian fields,    The charge of all his beeves; and they are now    Innumerable; the broad-fronted race    Of cattle never would have multiplied    So largely under other care than mine.    Now other masters bid me bring my beeves    For their own feasts. They little heed his son,    The palace-heir; as little do they dread    The vengeance of the gods; they long to share    Among them the possessions of the king,    So many years unheard from. But this thought    Comes to my mind again, and yet again:    Wrong were it, while the son is yet alive,    To drive the cattle to a foreign land,    Where alien men inhabit; yet ’tis worse    To stay and tend another’s beeves, and bear    This spoil. And long ago would I have fled    To some large-minded monarch, since this waste    Is not to be endured, but that I think    Still of my suffering lord, and hope that yet    He may return and drive the suitors hence.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answering, said:    “Herdsman, since thou dost seem not ill inclined,    Nor yet unwise, and I perceive in thee    A well-discerning mind, I therefore say,    And pledge my solemn oath﻿—Jove, first of gods,    Be witness, and this hospitable board    And hearth of good Ulysses, which has here    Received me﻿—while thou art within these halls    Ulysses will assuredly return,    And, if thou choose to look, thine eyes shall see    The suitors slain, who play the master here.”  

    And thus the master of the herds rejoined:    “Stranger, may Jupiter make good thy words!    Then shalt thou see what strength is in my arm.”  

    Eumaeus also prayed to all the gods,    That now the wise Ulysses might return.    So talked they with each other, while apart    The suitors doomed Telemachus to death,    And plotted how to take his life. Just then    A bird﻿—an eagle﻿—on the left flew by,    High up; his talons held a timid dove.    And then Amphinomus bespake the rest:﻿—  

    “O friends, this plan to slay Telemachus    Must fail. And now repair we to the feast.”  

    So spake Amphinomus, and to his words    They all gave heed, and hastened to the halls    Of the divine Ulysses, where they laid    Their cloaks upon the benches and the thrones,    And slaughtering the choice sheep, and fading goats,    And porkers, and a heifer from the herd,    Roasted the entrails, and distributed    A share to each. Next mingled they the wine    In the large bowls. The swineherd brought a cup    To everyone. Philoetius, chief among    The servants, gave from shapely canisters    The bread to each. Melanthius poured the wine.    Then putting forth their hands, they all partook    The ready banquet. With a wise design,    Telemachus near the stone threshold placed    Ulysses, on a shabby seat, beside    A little table, but within the walls    Of that strong-pillared pile. He gave him there    Part of the entrails, and poured out for him    The wine into a cup of gold, and said:﻿—  

    “Sit here, and drink thy wine among the rest,    And from the insults and assaults of these    It shall be mine to guard thee. For this house    Is not the common property of all;    Ulysses first acquired it, and for me﻿—    And you, ye suitors, keep your tongues from taunts    And hands from force, lest there be wrath and strife.”  

    He spake; the suitors, as they heard him, bit    Their pressed lips, wondering at Telemachus,    Who uttered such bold words. Antinoüs then,    Eupeithes’ son, bespake his fellows thus:﻿—  

    “Harsh as they are, let us, O Greeks, endure    These speeches of Telemachus. He makes    High threats, but had Saturnian Jove allowed,    We should, ere this, and in these very halls,    Have quieted our loud-tongued orator.”  

    So spake the suitor, but Telemachus    Heeded him not. Then through the city came    The heralds with a hallowed hecatomb,    Due to the gods. The long-haired people thronged    The shady grove of Phoebus, archer-god.  

    Now when the flesh was roasted and was drawn    From off the spits, and each was given his share,    They held high festival. The men who served    The banquet gave Ulysses, where he sat,    A portion equal to their own, for so    His own dear son Telemachus enjoined.  

    Yet did not Pallas cause the haughty crew    Of suitors to refrain from stinging taunts,    That so the spirit of Laertes’ son    Might be more deeply wounded. One there was    Among the suitors, a low-thoughted wretch;    Ctesippus was his name, and his abode    Was Samos. Trusting in his father’s wealth,    He wooed the wife of the long-absent king    Ulysses. To his insolent mates he said:﻿—  

    “Hear me, ye noble suitors, while I speak.    This stranger has received an equal share,    As is becoming; for it were not just    Nor seemly to pass by, in such a feast,    The guests, whoe’er they may be, that resort    To this fair mansion of Telemachus.    I also will bestow on him a gift    Of hospitality, and he in turn    May give it to the keeper of the bath,    Or any other of the menial train    That serve the household of Ulysses here.”  

    So speaking, with his strong right hand he flung    A bullock’s foot, which from a canister    Hard by he plucked. Ulysses gently bowed    His head, and shunned the blow, and grimly smiled.    The missile struck the solid wall, and then    Telemachus rebuked the suitor thus:﻿—  

    “Ctesippus, well hast thou escaped with life,    Not having hit the stranger, who himself    Shrank from the blow; else had I pinned thee through    With my sharp spear. Instead of wedding feast,    Thy father would have celebrated here    Thy funeral rites. Let no man in these halls    Bear himself insolently in my sight    Hereafter, for my reason now is ripe    To know the right from wrong. I was of late    A child, and now it is enough to bear    That ye should slay our sheep, and drink our wine,    And eat our bread﻿—for what can one man do    Against so many? Cease this petty war    Of wrong and hatred; but if ye desire    To take my life, ’tis well; ’twere better so.    And rather would I die by violence    Than live to see these most unmanly deeds﻿—    Guests driven away, and women-servants hauled    Through these fair rooms by brutal wassailers.”  

    He ended, and the assembly all sat mute    Till Agelaüs spake, Damastor’s son:﻿—  

    “O friends! let no man here with carping words    Gainsay what is so rightly said, nor yet    Insult the stranger more, nor one of those    Who serve the household of the godlike chief    Ulysses in his palace. I would say    This word in kindness to Telemachus    And to his mother; may it please them both!    While yet the hope was cherished in your hearts    That wise Ulysses would return, no blame    Could fasten on the queen that she remained    Unwedded, and resisted those who came    To woo her in the palace. Better so,    Had he come home again. Yet now, ’tis clear,    He comes no more. Go then, Telemachus,    And, sitting by thy mother, bid her wed    The noblest of her wooers, and the one    Who brings the richest gifts; and thou possess    Thy father’s wealth in peace, and eat and drink    At will, while she shall find another home.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “Nay, Agelaüs, for I swear by Jove,    And by my father’s sufferings, who has died,    Or yet is wandering, far from Ithaca,    That I do nothing to delay the choice    And marriage of my mother. I consent    That she become the wife of whom she list,    And him who offers most. But I should feel    Great shame to thrust her forth against her will,    And with unfllial speeches; God forbid!”  

    He ended here, and Pallas, as he spake,    To inextinguishable laughter moved    The suitors. There they sat with wandering minds;    They swallowed morsels foul with blood; their eyes    Were filled with tears; their hearts foreboded woe.    Then spake the godlike Theoclymenus:﻿—  

    “Unhappy men! what may this evil be    That overtakes you? Every brow and face    And each one’s lower limbs are wrapped in night,    And moans arise, and tears are on your cheeks.    The walls and all the graceful cornices    Between the pillars are bedropped with blood,    The portico is full, these halls are full    Of shadows, hastening down to Erebus    Amid the gloom. The sun is blotted out    From heaven, and fearful darkness covers all.”  

    He spake, and loud they laughed. Eurymachus,    The son of Polybus, in answer said:﻿—  

    “The stranger prattles idly; he is come    From some far land. Conduct him through the door,    Young men, and send him to the marketplace,    Since all things here are darkened to his eyes.”  

    Then spake the godlike Theoclymenus:    “Eurymachus, from thee I ask no guide,    For I have eyes and ears, and two good feet,    And in my breast a mind as sound as they,    And by the aid of these I mean to make    My way without; for clearly I perceive    A coming evil, which no suitor here    Will yet escape﻿—no one who, in these halls    Of the great chief, Ulysses, treats with scorn    His fellow-man, and broods o’er guilty plans.”  

    He spake, and, hastening from that noble pile,    Came to Piraeus, in whose house he found    A welcome. All the suitors, as he went,    Looked at each other, and, the more to vex    Telemachus, kept laughing at his guests.    And thus an insolent youth among them said:﻿—  

    “No man had ever a worse set of guests    Than thou, Telemachus. For what a wretch    That wandering beggar is, who always wants    His bread and wine, and is unfit for work,    And has no strength; in truth, a useless load    Upon the earth he treads. The other guest    Rises to play the prophet. If thou take    My counsel, which I give thee for thy good,    Let them at once be put on board a barque    Of many oars, and we will send them hence    To the Sicilians; they will bring a price.”  

    So talked the suitors, but he heeded not    Their words, and, looking toward his father, held    His peace, expecting when he would lay hands    Upon that insolent crew. Penelope,    Sage daughter of Icarius, took her place    Right opposite upon a sumptuous seat,    And heard the words of every man who spake    Within the hall. They held that midday feast    With laughter﻿—a luxurious feast it was,    And mirthful; many victims had been slain    To furnish forth the tables; but no feast    Could be more bitter than the later one,    To which the goddess and that valiant man    Would bid the guilty crew of plotters soon.  

            Book XXI  The Bending of the Bow of Ulysses  

  Proposal of Penelope to the suitors to contend for her hand with the bow and arrows of Ulysses﻿—Their ineffectual attempts to bend the bow﻿—Management of Ulysses to obtain the bow, which he bends with ease, and sends an arrow through the twelve rings set up in a row for the purpose.

      Pallas, the goddess of the azure eyes,    Woke in the mind of sage Penelope,    The daughter of Icarius, this design﻿—    To put into the suitors’ hands the bow    And gray steel rings, and to propose a game    That in the palace was to usher in    The slaughter. So she climbed the lofty stair,    Up from the hall, and took in her plump hand    The fair carved key; its wards were wrought of brass,    And ivory was the handle. Soon she reached    The furthest room with her attendant maids.    There lay the treasures of Ulysses﻿—brass    And gold, and steel divinely wrought. There lay    His bow unstrung; there lay his quiver charged    With arrows; many were the deadly shafts    It held, a stranger’s gift, who met him once    In Lacedaemon, Iphitus by name,    The son of Eurytus, and like the gods    In presence. In Messenè met the twain,    And in the mansion of Orsilochus,    The warlike. Thither had Ulysses come    To claim a debt from all the region round;    For rovers from Messene to their ships    Had driven and carried off from Ithaca    Three hundred sheep and those who tended them.    For this Ulysses, though a stripling yet,    Came that long voyage, on an embassy,    Sent by his father and the other chiefs.    And Iphitus had come in search of steeds    Which he had lost﻿—twelve mares, and under them    Twelve hardy mules, their foals. That errand brought    The doom of death upon him. For he came,    In journeying, to the abode of Hercules,    The mighty hero-son of Jupiter,    Famed for his labors, who, in his own house,    Slew Iphitus, the stranger. Cruel wretch!    Who reverenced not the vengeance of the gods,    Nor what was due to his own board, at which    He placed his guest, and slew him afterward,    And in his stables kept the goodly mares.    ’Twas when this guest was seeking for his steeds    He met Ulysses, and bestowed on him    The bow, which mighty Eurytus once bore,    And dying in his lofty palace left    The weapon to his son. Ulysses gave    In turn a trenchant sword and massive lance,    A pledge of kindly hospitality,    Begun, but not continued till they sat    Each at the other’s table; for the son    Of Jove first took the life of him who gave    The bow, the godlike son of Eurytus.    That bow Ulysses, when he went to war    In his black galleys, never took with him,    But left it in his palace, to be kept    In memory of a beloved friend,    And only bore it in his own domain.  

    Now when the glorious lady reached the room,    And stood upon the threshold, wrought of oak    And polished by the workman’s cunning hand,    Who stretched the line upon it, and set up    Its posts, and hung its shining doors, she loosed    With a quick touch the thong that held the ring.    Put in the key, and with a careful aim    Struck back the sounding bolts. As when a bull    Roars in the field, such sound the beautiful doors,    Struck with the key, gave forth, and instantly    They opened to her. Up the lofty floor    She stepped, where stood the coffer that contained    The perfumed garments. Reaching forth her hand,    The queen took down the bow, that hung within    Its shining case, and sat her down, and laid    The case upon her knees, and, drawing forth    The monarch’s bow, she wept aloud. As soon    As that new gush of tears had ceased to fall,    Back to the hall she went, and that proud throng    Of suitors, bearing in her hand the bow    Unstrung, and quiver, where the arrows lay    Many and deadly. Her attendant maids    Brought also down a coffer, where were laid    Much brass and steel, provided by the king    For games like these. The glorious lady then,    In presence of the suitors, stood beside    The columns that upheld the stately roof.    She held a lustrous veil before her cheeks,    And, while on either side of her a maid    Stood modestly, bespake the suitors thus:﻿—  

    “Hear, noble suitors! ye who throng these halls,    And eat and drink from day to day, while long    My husband has been gone; your sole excuse    For all this lawlessness the claim ye make    That I become a bride. Come then, for now    A contest is proposed. I bring to you    The mighty bow that great Ulysses bore.    Whoe’er among you he may be whose hand    Shall bend this bow, and send through these twelve rings    An arrow, him I follow hence, and leave    This beautiful abode of my young years,    With all its plenty﻿—though its memory,    I think, will haunt me even in my dreams.”  

    She spake, and bade the master of the swine,    The good Eumaeus, place the bow and rings    Of hoary steel before the suitor-train.    In tears he bore the bow and laid it down.    The herdsman also wept to see again    His master’s bow. Antinoüs called to both    With a loud voice, and chid them angrily:﻿—  

    “Ye silly rustics, who can never see    Beyond the hour, why trouble with your tears    The lady who had grief enough besides    For her lost husband? Sit and share the feast    In silence, or go forth and leave the bow;    A difficult contest it will be for us,    Nor, as I think, will this fair bow be bent    With ease, since surely there is no man here    Such as Ulysses was. I saw him once,    While but a child, and still remember him.”  

    He spake, yet in his secret heart believed    That he should bend the bow, and send a shaft    Through all the rings. And yet he was the first    To taste the steel﻿—an arrow from the hand    Of the great chief Ulysses﻿—whom he wronged    In his own palace, and to equal wrong    Encouraged others. Then Telemachus    Rose in his sacred might, and thus began:﻿—  

    “Alas! it must be that Saturnian Jove    Has made me lose my wits. Wise as she is,    My mother promises to leave her home    And follow someone else, and yet I laugh,    And am delighted in my foolish heart.    Come then, since such a contest is proposed,    Ye suitors! and for such a woman too.    The like is not in all the lands of Greece,    Argos, Mycenae, or the hallowed shore    Of Pylos, or in Ithaca itself,    Or the dark mainland coast. Ye know it well;    Why should I praise my mother? Come then, all;    Let there be no excuses for delay,    Nor longer leave the bow untried, that we    May see the event. I too am moved to try;    And if I bend the bow, and send a shaft    Through all the rings, my gracious mother then    Will not, to my great grief, renounce her home,    And, following another, leave me here,    Although my prowess even now might win    The glorious prizes that my father won.”  

    He spake and, rising, from his shoulders took    The purple cloak, and laid the trenchant sword    Aside; and first he placed the rings of steel    In order, opening for them in the ground    A long trench by a line, and stamping close    The earth around them. All admired the skill    With which he ranged them, never having seen    The game before. And then he took his place    Upon the threshold, and essayed the bow;    And thrice he made the attempt, and thrice gave o’er,    Yet hoping still to draw the cord, and send    An arrow through the rings. He would have drawn    The bow at the fourth trial, but a nod    Given by his father caused him to forbear,    Though eager for the attempt. And then again    The princely youth bespake the suitors thus:﻿—  

    “Well, this is strange! I may hereafter prove    A craven and a weakling, or perchance    Am yet too young, and cannot trust my arm    To do me right against the man who first    Assaults me. Come then, ye whose strength excels    My own, and try the bow, and end the strife.”  

    He spake, and setting down the bow to lean    Against the firm smooth panels of the wall,    And the swift shaft against the bow’s fair curve,    He took again his seat upon the throne    From which he rose. And then Eupeithes’ son,    Antinoüs, to the crowd of suitors said:﻿—  

    “Rise one by one, my friends, from right to left.    Begin where he begins who pours the wine.”  

    So spake Antinoüs, and the rest approved.    Then rose Leiodes, son of Oenops, first.    He was their seer, and always had his seat    Beside the ample bowl. From deeds of wrong    He shrank with hatred, and was sore incensed    Against the suitors all. He took the bow    And shaft, and, going to the threshold, stood    And tried the bow, yet bent it not; it galled    His hands, for they were soft, and all unused    To such a task; and thus at length he spake:﻿—  

    “O friends, I bend it not; another hand    Must try. This bow, upon this very spot,    Will take from many a prince the breath of life.    And better were it thus to die, by far,    Than, living, fail of that intent for which    We haunt this place, and still from day to day    Assemble. There is many a one whose wish    And hope are strong to wed Penelope,    The consort of Ulysses; but so soon    As he shall see and try the hero’s bow    Let him with marriage presents seek to gain    Some other bride among the long-robed dames,    Achaia’s daughters. Let him leave the queen    To wed the suitor who shall bring to her    The richest gifts, and him whom fate appoints.”  

    He spake, and setting down the bow to lean    Against the firm smooth panels of the wall,    And the swift shaft against the bow’s fair curve,    He took again bis seat upon the throne    From which he rose. Antinoüs then took up    The word and answered, and reproached him thus:﻿—  

    “What words are these, Leiodes, that have passed    Thy lips? harsh words and fearful﻿—that this bow    Shall take from many princes here the breath    Of life, and all because thou hast no power    To bend it? Thy good mother bore thee not    To draw the bow and send the arrow forth,    But others of the noble suitor-train    Are here, by whom this bow shall yet be bent.”  

    Then to Melanthius, keeper of the goats,    Antinoüs gave this bidding. “Light a fire    With speed, Melanthius, in the palace here,    And place a seat before it. Lay a fleece    Upon the seat, and bring us from within    An ample roll of fat, that we young men    By warming and anointing may make soft    The bow, and draw the cord, and end the strife.”  

    He spake; Melanthius kindled instantly    A glowing fire, and near it placed a seat,    And on the seat a fleece, and from within    Brought forth an ample roll of fat, with which    The young men, having warmed it, smeared the bow    And tried, but bent it not, too weak by far    For such a feat. Antinoüs kept aloof,    He and the godlike youth Eurymachus    Two princes who in might excelled the rest.  

    The herdsman of Ulysses meantime left    The palace, and with him the swineherd went,    And after them Ulysses. When they all    Were now without the gate and palace court,    Ulysses spake to them, and blandly said:﻿—  

    “Herdsman and swineherd, shall I say to you    Somewhat, or shall I keep it back? My heart    Moves me to say it. Should Ulysses come,    Led by some god, and suddenly, what aid    Would he receive from you? Would ye take part    With him, or with the suitors? Frankly speak;    And tell me what your hearts would bid you do.”  

    Then answered thus the keeper of the herds:    “O Father Jove! wouldst thou but grant my wish,    And let some god conduct him hither, then    Shall it be seen what might is in these hands!”  

    So also did Eumaeus offer prayer    To all the deities, that speedily    The wise Ulysses might return; and when    The chief perceived in all its truth the thought    And purpose of their hearts, he spake and said:﻿—  

    “Know, then, that I myself am he, at home    Again, returning in the twentieth year,    And after many sufferings, to the land    That saw my birth. I know that I am come    Welcome to you alone of all my train    Of servants, since I hear no others pray    For my return. Hear, then, what I engage    Shall be hereafter. If some god o’ercome    For me these arrogant suitors, I will give    To each of you a wife and lands, and build    For each a house near mine, and ye shall be    The friends and brothers of Telemachus    Thenceforth. And now, that ye may surely know    And trust me, I will show a token here﻿—    A scar which once the white tooth of a boar    Made, when long since, on the Parnassian mount,    I hunted with Autolycus’s sons.”  

    Thus having said, he drew from the broad scar    The covering rags; they looked and knew it well,    And wept, and round Ulysses threw their arms,    And kissed in that embrace the hero’s head    And shoulders, while Ulysses also kissed    Their heads and hands. The sun would have gone down    Upon their weeping, but for him. He said:﻿—  

    “Cease now from tears, lest someone from the hall    Should see us, and report of us within.    Now let us enter, not in company﻿—    I first, and ye thereafter, one by one,    And let the sign be this: the others all﻿—    The haughty suitors﻿—will refuse to me    The bow and quiver. When thou bearest it,    My noble friend Eumaeus, through the halls,    Bring it and place it in my hands, and charge    The women to make fast the solid doors;    And then if any one of them should hear    A groan or other noise of men within,    Let her not issue forth, but silently    Pursue her task. Meantime be it thy care,    My good Philoetius, with a key to lock    The portals of the court and fix the chain.”  

    Thus having said, into that noble pile    He passed again, and took the seat from which    He lately rose, and afterward, in turn,    Entered the servants of the godlike chief.  

    Eurymachus was busy with the bow,    Turning and warming it before the blaze    On both its sides. He could not bend it thus.    There came a deep sigh from his boastful heart,    And greatly was he vexed, and sadly said:﻿—  

    “Alas! great cause of grief indeed is here    For me and all. ’Tis not that I lament    So much the losing of the bride, although    That also vexes me﻿—there yet remain    Many fair ladies of the Achaian stock,    Both in the seagirt lands of Ithaca    And other regions﻿—yet if we be found    To fall in strength of arm so far below    The great Ulysses that we cannot bend    His bow, our sons will hear of it with shame.”  

    Eupeithes’ son, Antinoüs, answered thus:    “Not so, Eurymachus, as thou thyself    Shouldst know. This day is held a solemn feast    Of Phoebus by the people. Who would draw    The bow today? Nay, lay it by in peace,    And suffer all the rings to stand as now;    For no man, as I think, will dare to come    Into the palace of Laertes’ son    And take them hence. Let him who bears the cup    Begin to serve the wine, that, having poured    Part to the gods, we may lay down the bow,    And with the morning let Melanthius come﻿—    The goatherd﻿—bringing with him from the flock    The choicest goats, that we may burn the thighs,    An offering to the god of archery,    Apollo. Then will we again essay    The bow, and bring the contest to an end.”  

    So spake Antinoüs, and they all approved.    Then heralds came, and on the suitors’ hands    Poured water; youths filled up the cups with wine,    Beginning at the right, and gave to each    His share; and when they all had poured a part,    And each had drunk, the shrewd Ulysses thus    With artful speech bespake the suitor-train:﻿—  

    “Hearken, ye suitors of the illustrious queen,    To what ray heart is prompting me to say;    But chiefly to Eurymachus I make    My suit, and to Antinoüs, who so well    Hath counselled to lay by the bow and trust    The gods. Tomorrow Phoebus will bestow    The needed strength on whomsoe’er he will;    But let me take that polished bow, and try    Among you, whether still the power that dwelt    In these once pliant limbs abides in them,    Or whether happily it has passed from me    Amid my wanderings and a life of want.”  

    He spake, and all were vehemently moved    With anger, for they feared that he would bend    The bow, and thus Antinoüs, railing, spake:﻿—  

    “Thou worthless vagabond, without a spark    Of reason, art thou not content to sit    And banquet with the proudest, where no part    Of all the feast escapes thee, hearing all    That we are saying, which no other man,    Stranger and beggar, is allowed to hear!    This good wine makes thee foolish, as wine oft    Makes those who swallow it too greedily,    And drink not with due stint. It maddened once    Eurytion, the famed Centaur, in the halls    Of the large-souled Pirithoüs. He had come    Among the Lapithae, and when inflamed    With wine to madness, in those very halls    Did lawless deeds. The heroes were incensed.    They rushed upon him, dragged him through the porch    And out of doors, and there cut off his nose    And ears, and he departed, frenzied still,    And bearing in bewilderment of mind    His punishment, whence war arose between    Centaurs and men; yet surely he had brought    The evil on himself, when overcome    With wine. Such fearful mischief I foretell    Will light on thee, if thou shouldst bend this bow,    Nor canst thou hope for favor here among    The people. We will send thee speedily,    In a black galley, to King Echetus,    The enemy of human kind, from whom    Thou shalt find no escape. Drink, then, in peace    Thy wine, and seek no strife with younger men.”  

    Then spake the sage Penelope again:    “Truly, Antinoüs, it becomes thee not,    Nor is it just, to vex the stranger guests    Who seek the palace of Telemachus.    Dost thou, then, think that, should this stranger bend,    Proud as he is of his great strength of arm,    The mighty bow that once Ulysses bore,    He leads me hence a bride? No hope of that    Is in his heart, and let no one of you    Who banquet here allow a thought like that    To vex him; ’tis a thing that cannot be.”  

    Then to the queen, Eurymachus, the son    Of Polybus, replied: “We do not fear,    Sage daughter of Icarius, that this man    Will lead thee hence a bride; it cannot be.    We fear the speech of men and women both.    The very meanest of the Achaian race    Will say: ‘Degenerate men are these, who seek    To wed the consort of a glorious chief,    Not one of whom can draw the bow he bore;    And now there comes a wandering beggar-man,    Who draws the bow with ease, and sends a shaft    Through all the rings of steel.’ Thus will they speak,    And this will be to us a cause of shame!”  

    And then the sage Penelope rejoined:    “Eurymachus, it cannot be that those    Should earn the general praise who make the wealth    Of a most worthy man their spoil, and bring    Dishonor on his house. The stranger’s frame    Is powerful and well knit; he claims to be    Of noble parentage. Now let him take    The bow, and we will see the event; but this    I promise, and will make my promise good,    If he should bend it﻿—if Apollo give    To him that glory﻿—he shall have from me    A tunic and a cloak, fair garments both,    And a keen javelin, his defence against    Both dogs and men, a two-edged sword besides,    And sandals for his feet, and I engage    To send him whither he desires to go.”  

    Then spake discreet Telemachus again:    “Mother, in all Achaia there is none    Who has more power than I can claim, to grant    Or to deny the bow to whom I will.    No one of those who rule the rugged coast    Of Ithaca, or isles where Elis breeds    Her mares, may interpose to thwart my will,    If on the stranger I bestow the bow    To be his own, and bid him take it hence.    Withdraw, O queen, into thy bower; direct    Thy household tasks, the distaff and the web,    And bid thy maidens speed the work. The bow    Belongs to men, and most to me; for here,    Within these walls, the authority is mine.”  

    The queen, astonished, heard him and withdrew,    But kept her son’s wise sayings in her heart    And then ascending to her bower, among    Her maids, she wept her well-beloved lord,    Ulysses, till the blue-eyed Pallas came,    And poured upon her lids the balm of sleep.  

    Meantime the worthy swineherd bore the bow    In hand, and all along the palace-halls    The suitor-crew were chiding him aloud,    And thus an insolent youth among them spake:﻿—  

    “Thou awkward swineherd, whither goest thou    With the curved bow? Thy own fleet dogs which thou    Hast reared shall soon devour thee, far from men    And midst thy herds of swine, if we find grace    With Phoebus and the other deathless gods.”  

    Such were their words; the swineherd where he stood    Set down the bow in fear, for many a voice    Called to him in the hall. On the other side    Shouted Telemachus with threatening words:﻿—  

    “Nay, father, carry on the bow, nor think    To stop at every man’s command; lest I,    Though younger than thyself, cast stones at thee,    And chase thee to the fields, for I in strength    Excel thee. Would that I excelled as far    In strength of arm the suitors in these halls,    Then would I roughly through the palace-gates    Drive many who are plotting mischief now.”  

    He spake, and all with hearty laughter heard    His words, and for their sake allowed their wrath    Against the prince to cool. The swineherd went    Forward, along the hall, and, drawing near    The wise Ulysses, gave into his hands    The bow; and then he called the nurse aside,    Dame Eurycleia, and bespake her thus:﻿—  

    “Sage Eurycleia, from Telemachus    I charge thee to make fast the solid doors,    And then, if any of the maids should hear    A groan or other noise of men within,    Let her not issue forth, but silently    Pursue the task in hand, and keep her place.”  

    He spake, nor were his words in vain. The dame    Made fast the doors of that magnificent hall,    While silently Philoetius hastened forth    And locked the portals of the high-walled court.    A cable of the barque of Byblos lay    Beneath the portico﻿—it once had served    A galley﻿—and with this the herdsman tied    The portals, and, returning, took the seat    Whence he had risen, but ever kept his eye    Fixed on his lord. Ulysses, meantime, held    The bow, and, turning it, intently eyed    Side after side, and tried each part in turn,    For fear that worms, while he was far away,    Had pierced the horn. At this, a youth among    The suitors, turning to his neighbor, said:﻿—  

    “Lo an inspector and a judge of bows!    Perhaps he has a bow like that at home,    Or else would make one like it. How he shifts    The thing with busy hands from side to side﻿—    The vagabond, well trained in knavish tricks!”  

    Then also said another insolent youth:    “May he in all things be as fortunate    As now, when he shall try to bend that bow!”  

    Such was their talk; but when the wary chief    Had poised and shrewdly scanned the mighty bow,    Then, as a singer, skilled to play the harp,    Stretches with ease on its new fastenings    A string, the twisted entrails of a sheep,    Made fast at either end, so easily    Ulysses bent that mighty bow. He took    And drew the cord with his right hand; it twanged    With a clear sound as when a swallow screams.    The suitors were dismayed, and all grew pale.    Jove in loud thunder gave a sign from heaven.    The much-enduring chief, Ulysses, heard    With joy the friendly omen, which the son    Of crafty Saturn sent him. He took up    A winged arrow, that before him lay    Upon a table, drawn; the others still    Were in the quiver’s womb; the Greeks were yet    To feel them. This he set with care against    The middle of the bow, and toward him drew    The cord and arrow-notch, just where he sat,    And, aiming opposite, let fly the shaft.    He missed no ring of all; from first to last    The brass-tipped arrow threaded every one.    Then to Telemachus Ulysses said:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, the stranger sitting here    Hath not disgraced thee. I have neither missed    The rings, nor found it hard to bend the bow;    Nor has my manly strength decayed, as these    Who seek to bring me to contempt pretend;    And now the hour is come when we prepare    A supper for the Achaians, while the day    Yet lasts, and after supper the delights    Of song and harp, which nobly grace a feast.”  

    He spake, and nodded to Telemachus,    His well-beloved son, who girded on    His trenchant sword, and took in hand his spear,    And, armed with glittering brass for battle, came    And took his station by his father’s seat.  

            Book XXII  Death of the Suitors  

  Antinoüs slain by an arrow from the bow of Ulysses, who now declares himself, and begins the slaughter﻿—Arms brought to him and to Eumaeus and Philoetius by Telemachus﻿—Arms brought to the suitors by Melanthius the goatherd﻿—Appearance of Pallas in the shape of Mentor﻿—Death of all the suitors﻿—Medon and Phemius spared﻿—The unfaithful serving-women hanged.

      Then did Ulysses cast his rags aside,    And, leaping to the threshold, took his stand    On its broad space, with bow and quiver filled    With arrows. At his feet the hero poured    The winged shafts, and to the suitors called:﻿—  

    “That difficult strife is ended. Now I take    Another mark, which no man yet has hit.    Now shall I see if I attain my aim,    And, by the aid of Phoebus, win renown.”  

    He spake; and, turning, at Antinoüs aimed    The bitter shaft﻿—Antinoüs, who just then    Had grasped a beautiful two-eared cup of gold,    About to drink the wine. He little thought    Of wounds and death; for who, when banqueting    Among his fellows, could suspect that one    Alone against so many men would dare,    However bold, to plan his death, and bring    On him the doom of fate? Ulysses struck    The suitor with the arrow at the throat.    The point came through the tender neck behind,    Sideways he sank to earth; his hand let fall    The cup; the dark blood in a thick warm stream    Gushed from the nostrils of the smitten man.    He spurned the table with his feet, and spilled    The viands; bread and roasted meats were flung    To lie polluted on the floor. Then rose    The suitors in a tumult, when they saw    The fallen man; from all their seats they rose    Throughout the hall, and to the massive walls    Looked eagerly; there hung no buckler there,    No sturdy lance for them to wield. They called    Thus to Ulysses with indignant words:﻿—  

    “Stranger! in evil hour hast thou presumed    To aim at men; and thou shalt henceforth bear    Part in no other contest. Even now    Is thy destruction close to thee. Thy hand    Hath slain the noblest youth in Ithaca.    The vultures shall devour thy flesh for this.”  

    So each one said; they deemed he had not slain    The suitor wittingly; nor did they see,    Blind that they were, the doom which in that hour    Was closing round them all. Then with a frown    The wise Ulysses looked on them, and said:﻿—  

    “Dogs! ye had thought I never would come back    From Ilium’s coast, and therefore ye devoured    My substance here, and offered violence    To my maidservants, and pursued my wife    As lovers, while I lived. Ye dreaded not    The gods who dwell in the great heaven, nor feared    Vengeance hereafter from the hands of men;    And now destruction overhangs you all.”  

    He spake, and all were pale with fear, and each    Looked round for some escape from death. Alone    Eurymachus found voice, and answered thus:﻿—  

    “If thou indeed be he, the Ithacan    Ulysses, now returned to thine old home,    Well hast thou spoken of the many wrongs    Done to thee by the Achaians in thy house    And in thy fields. But there the man lies slain    Who was the cause of all. Antinoüs first    Began this course of wrong. Nor were his thoughts    So much of marriage as another aim﻿—    Which Saturn’s son denied him﻿—to bear rule    Himself o’er those who till the pleasant fields    Of Ithaca, first having slain thy son    In ambush. But he now has met his fate.    Spare, then, thy people. We will afterward    Make due amends in public for the waste    Here in thy palace of the food and wine.    For each of us shall bring thee twenty beeves,    And brass and gold, until thy heart shall be    Content. Till then we cannot blame thy wrath.”  

    Sternly the wise Ulysses frowned, and said:    “Eurymachus, if thou shouldst offer me    All that thou hast, thy father’s wealth entire,    And add yet other gifts, not even then    Would I refrain from bloodshed, ere my hand    Avenged my wrongs upon the suitor-crew.    Choose then to fight or flee, whoever hopes    Escape from death and fate; yet none of you    Will now, I think, avoid that bitter doom.”  

    He spake. At once their knees and head grew faint,    And thus Eurymachus bespake the rest:﻿—  

    “This man, O friends, to his untamable arm    Will give no rest, but with that bow in hand,    And quiver, will send forth from where he stands    His shafts, till he has slain us all. Prepare    For combat then, and draw your swords, and hold    The tables up against his deadly shafts,    And rush together at him as one man,    And drive him from the threshold through the door.    Then, hurrying through the city, let us sound    The alarm, and soon he will have shot his last.”  

    He spake, and, drawing his keen two-edged sword    Of brass, sprang toward him with a dreadful cry,    Just as the great Ulysses, sending forth    An arrow, smote the suitor on the breast,    Beside the nipple. The swift weapon stood    Fixed in his liver; to the ground he flung    The sword, and, reeling giddily around    The table, fell; he brought with him to earth    The viands and the double cup, and smote    The pavement with his forehead heavily,    And in great agony. With both his feet    He struck and shook his throne, and darkness came    Over his eyes. Then rushed Amphinomus    Against the glorious chief, and drew his sword    To thrust him from the door. Telemachus    O’ertook him, and between his shoulders drove    A brazen lance. Right through his breast it went,    And he fell headlong, with his forehead dashed    Against the floor. Telemachus drew back,    And left his long spear in Amphinomus,    Lest, while he drew it forth, someone among    The Achaians might attack him with the sword,    And thrust him through or hew him down. In haste    He reached his father’s side, and quickly said:﻿—  

    “Now, father, will I bring to thee a shield,    Two javelins, and a helmet wrought of brass,    Well fitted to the temples. I will case    Myself in armor, and will also give    Arms to the swineherd, and to him who tends    The beeves; for men in armor combat best.”  

    And wise Ulysses answered: “Bring them then,    And quickly, while I yet have arrows here    For my defence, lest, when I am alone,    They drive me from my station at the door.”  

    He spake. Obedient to his father’s word,    Telemachus was soon within the room    In which the glorious arms were laid. He took    Four bucklers thence, eight spears, and helmets four    Of brass, each darkened with its horsehair crest,    And bore them forth, and quickly stood again    Beside his father. But he first encased    His limbs in brass; his followers also put    Their shining armor on, and took their place    Beside the wise Ulysses, eminent    In shrewd devices. He, while arrows yet    Were ready to his hand, with every aim    Brought down a suitor; side by side they fell.    But when the shafts were spent, the archer-king    Leaned his good bow beside the shining wall,    Against a pillar of the massive pile,    And round his shoulders slung a fourfold shield,    And crowned his martial forehead with a helm    Wrought fairly, with a heavy horsehair crest    That nodded gallantly above, and took    In hand the two stout lances tipped with brass.  

    In the strong wall there was a postern door,    And, near the outer threshold of the pile,    A passage from it to a narrow lane,    Closed with well-fitting doors. Ulysses bade    The noble swineherd take his station there.    And guard it well, as now the only way    Of entrance. Agelaüs called aloud    To all his fellows, and bespake them thus:﻿—  

    “Friends! will no one among you all go up    To yonder postern door, and make our plight    Known to the people? Then the alarm would spread,    And this man haply will have shot his last.”  

    Melanthius, keeper of the goats, replied:    “Nay, noble Agelaüs; ’tis too near    The palace gate; the entrance of the lane    Is narrow, and a single man, if brave,    Against us all might hold it. I will bring    Arms from the chamber to equip you all;    For there within, and nowhere else, I deem,    Ulysses and his son laid up their arms.”  

    Thus having said, the keeper of the goats,    Melanthius, climbed the palace stairs, and gained    The chamber of Ulysses. Taking thence    Twelve shields, as many spears, as many helms    Of brass, with each its heavy horsehair plume,    He came, and gave them to the suitors’ hands.    Then sank the hero’s heart, and his knees shook    As he beheld the suitors putting on    Their armor, and uplifting their long spears.    The mighty task appalled him, and he thus    Bespake Telemachus with winged words:﻿—  

    “Telemachus, some woman here, or else    Melanthius, makes the battle hard for us.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “Father, I erred in this. I was the cause,    And no one else; I left the solid door    Ajar; the spy was shrewder far than I.    Now, good Eumaeus, shut the chamber door,    And see if any of the palace-maids    Have brought these arms, or if I rightly fix    The guilt upon Melanthius, Dolius’ son.”  

    So talked they with each other, while again    Melanthius, stealing toward the chamber, thought    To bring yet other shining weapons thence.    The noble swineherd marked him as he went,    And quickly drawing near Ulysses said:﻿—  

    “Son of Laertes! nobly born and wise!    The knave whom we suspect is on his way    Up to thy chamber. Tell me now, I pray,    And plainly, shall I make an end of him,    If I may prove the stronger man, or bring    The wretch into thy presence, to endure    The vengeance due to all the iniquities    Plotted by him against thee in these halls?”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Telemachus and I will keep at bay    The suitors in this place, however fierce    Their onset, while ye two bind fast his hands    And feet behind his back, and bringing him    Into the chamber, with the door made fast    Behind you, tie him with a double cord,    And draw him up a lofty pillar close    To the timbers of the roof, that, swinging there,    He may live long and suffer grievous pain.”  

    He spake; they hearkened and obeyed, and went    Up to the chamber unperceived by him    Who stood within and searched a nook for arms.    On each side of the entrance, by its posts,    They waited for Melanthius. Soon appeared    The goatherd at the threshold of the room,    Bearing a beautiful helmet in one hand,    And in the other a broad ancient shield,    Defaced by age and mould. Laertes once,    The hero, bore it when a youth, but now    Long time it lay unused, with gaping seams.  

    They sprang and seized the goatherd, dragging him    Back to the chamber by the hair; and there    They cast him, in an agony of fear,    Upon the floor, and bound his hands and feet    With a stout cord behind his back, as bade    The great Ulysses, much-enduring son    Of old Laertes. Round him then they looped    A double cord, and swung him up beside    A lofty pillar, till they brought him near    The timbers of the roof. And then didst thou,    Eumaeus, say to him in jeering words:﻿—  

    “Melanthius, there mayst thou keep watch all night    On a soft bed, a fitting place for thee;    And when the Mother of the Dawn shall come    Upon her golden seat from ocean’s streams,    Thou wilt not fail to see her. Thou mayst then    Drive thy goats hither for the suitors’ feast.”  

    They left him in that painful plight, and put    Their armor on, and closed the shining door,    And went, and by Ulysses, versed in wiles,    Stood breathing valor. Four were they who stood    Upon that threshold, while their foes within    Were many and brave. Then Pallas, child of Jove,    Drew near, like Mentor both in shape and voice.    Ulysses saw her, and rejoiced and said:﻿—  

    “Come, Mentor, to the aid of one who loves    And has befriended thee, thy peer in age.”  

    Thus said Ulysses, but believed he spake    To Pallas, scatterer of hosts. Fierce shouts    Came from the suitors in the hall, and first,    Thus Agelaüs railed, Damastor’s son:﻿—  

    “Mentor, let not Ulysses wheedle thee    To join him, and make war on us, for this    Our purpose is, and it will be fulfilled:    When by our hands the father and the son    Are slain, thou also shalt be put to death    For this attempt, and thy own head shall be    The forfeit. When we shall have taken thus    Thy life with our good weapons, we will seize    On all thou hast, on all thy wealth within    Thy dwelling or without, and, mingling it    With the possessions of Ulysses, leave    Within thy palaces no son of thine    Or daughter living, and no virtuous wife    Of thine, abiding here in Ithaca.”  

    He spake, and woke new anger in the heart    Of Pallas, and she chid Ulysses thus:﻿—  

    “Ulysses, thou art not, in might of arm    And courage, what thou wert when waging war    Nine years without a pause against the men    Of Troy for Helen’s sake, the child of Jove,    And many didst thou slay in deadly strife,    And Priam’s city, with its spacious streets,    Was taken through thy counsels. How is it    That, coming to thy own possessions here    And thy own palace, thou dost sadly find    Thy ancient valor fail thee in the strife    Against the suitors? Now draw near, my friend,    And stand by me, and see what I shall do,    And own that Mentor, son of Alcimus,    Amid a press of foes requites thy love.”  

    She spake, but gave not to Ulysses yet    The certain victory; for she meant to put    To further proof the courage and the might    Both of Ulysses and his emulous son.    To the broad palace roof she rose, and sat    In shape a swallow. Agelaüs now,    Damastor’s son, cheered on with gallant words    His friends; so also did Amphimedon,    Eurynomus, and Demoptolemus,    Polyctor’s son, Peisander, and with these    Sagacious Polybus. These six excelled    In valor all the suitors who survived,    And they were fighting for their lives. The bow    And the fleet shafts had smitten down their peers.    Thus to his fellows Agelaüs spake:﻿—  

    “O friends, this man will now be forced to stay    His fatal hand. See, Mentor leaves his side,    After much empty boasting, and those four    Are at the entrance gate alone. Now aim    At him with your long spears﻿—not all at once,    Let six first hurl their weapons, and may Jove    Grant that we strike Ulysses down, and win    Great glory! For the others at his side    We care but little, if their leader fail.”  

    He spake; they hearkened. Eagerly they cast    Their lances. Pallas made their aim to err.    One struck a pillar of the massive pile;    One struck the panelled door; one ashen shaft,    Heavy with metal, rang against the wall.  

    And when they had escaped that flight of spears,    Hurled from the crowd, the much-enduring man,    Ulysses, thus to his companions said:﻿—  

    “Now is the time, my friends, to send our spears    Into the suitor-crowd, who, not content    With wrongs already done us, seek our lives.”  

    He spake, and, aiming opposite, they cast    Their spears. The weapon which Ulysses flung    Slew Demoptolemus; his son struck down    Euryades; the herdsman smote to death    Peisander, and the swineherd Elatus.    These at one moment fell, and bit the dust    Of the broad floor. Back flew the suitor-crowd    To a recess; and after them the four    Rushed on, and plucked their weapons from the dead.  

    Again the suitors threw their spears; again    Did Pallas cause their aim to err. One struck    A pillar of the massive pile, and one    The panelled door; another ashen shaft,    Heavy with metal, rang against the wall.    Yet did the weapon of Amphimedon    Strike lightly on the wrist Telemachus.    The brass just tore the skin. Ctesippus grazed    The shoulder of Eumaeus with his spear,    Above the shield; the spear flew over it    And fell to earth. Then they who stood beside    The sage Ulysses, versed in wiles, once more    Flung their keen spears. The spoiler of walled towns,    Ulysses, slew Eurydamas; his son    Struck down Amphimedon; the swineherd took    The life of Polybus; the herdsman smote    Ctesippus, driving through his breast the spear,    And called to him, and gloried o’er his fall:﻿—  

    “O son of Polytherses, prompt to rail!    Beware of uttering, in thy foolish pride,    Big words hereafter; leave it to the gods,    Mightier are they than we. See, I repay    The hospitable gift of a steer’s foot,    Which once the great Ulysses from thy hand    Received, as he was passing through this hall.”  

    Thus spake the keeper of the horned herd.    Meantime, Ulysses slew Damastor’s son    With his long spear, in combat hand to hand    Telemachus next smote Evenor’s son,    Leiocritus. He sent the brazen spear    Into his bowels; through his body passed    The weapon, and he fell upon his face.    His forehead struck the floor. Then Pallas held    On high her fatal aegis. From the roof    She showed it, and their hearts grew wild with fear.    They fled along the hall as flees a herd    Of kine, when the swift gadfly suddenly    Has come among them, and has scattered them    In springtime, when the days are growing long.    Meantime, like falcons with curved claws and beaks,    That, coming from the mountain summits, pounce    Upon the smaller birds, and make them fly    Close to the fields among the snares they dread,    And seize and slay, nor can the birds resist    Or fly, and at the multitude of prey    The fowlers’ hearts are glad; so did the four    Smite right and left the suitors hurrying through    The palace-hall, and fearful moans arose    As heads were smitten by the sword, and all    The pavement swam with blood. Leiodes then    Sprang forward to Ulysses, clasped his knees,    And supplicated him with winged words:﻿—  

    “I come, Ulysses, to thy knees. Respect    And spare me. Never have I said or done,    Among the women of thy household, aught    That could be blamed, and I essayed to check    The wrongs of other suitors. Little heed    They gave my counsels, nor withheld their hands    From evil deeds, and therefore have they drawn    Upon themselves an evil fate. But I,    Who have done nothing﻿—I their soothsayer﻿—    Must I too die? Then is there no reward    Among the sons of men for worthy deeds.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, frowned and said:    “If then, in truth, thou wert as thou dost boast,    A soothsayer among these men, thy prayer    Within these palace-walls must oft have been    That far from me might be the blessed day    Of my return, and that my wife might take    With thee her lot, and bring forth sons to thee,    And therefore shalt thou not escape from death.”  

    He spake, and seizing with his powerful hand    A falchion lying near, which from the grasp    Of Agelaüs fell when he was slain,    Just at the middle of the neck he smote    Leiodes, while the words were on his lips,    And the head fell, and lay amid the dust.  

    Phemius, the son of Terpius, skilled in song,    Alone escaped the bitter doom of death.    He by constraint had sung among the train    Of suitors, and was standing now beside    The postern door, and held his sweet-toned lyre,    And pondered whether he should leave the hall,    And sit before the altar of the great    Herceian Jove, where, with Laertes, once    Ulysses oft had burned the thighs of beeves,    Or whether he should fling himself before    Ulysses, as a suppliant, at his knees.    This to his thought seemed wisest﻿—to approach    Laertes’ son, and clasp his knees. He placed    His sweet harp on the floor, between the cup    And silver-studded seat, and went and clasped    The hero’s knees, and said in winged words:﻿—  

    “I come, Ulysses, to thy knees. Respect    And spare me. It will be a grief to thee,    Hereafter, shouldst thou slay a bard, who sings    For gods and men alike. I taught myself    This art; some god has breathed into my mind    Songs of all kinds, and I could sing to thee    As to a god. O, seek not then to take    My life! Thy own dear son Telemachus    Will bear me witness that not willingly    Nor for the sake of lucre did I come    To sing before the suitors at their feasts    And in thy palace, but was forced to come    By numbers and by mightier men than I.”  

    He ceased; Telemachus, the mighty, heard    And thus bespake his father at his side:﻿—  

    “Refrain; smite not the guiltless with the sword;    And be the herald, Medon, also spared,    Who in our palace had the care of me    Through all my childhood; if he be not slain    Already by Philoetius, or by him    Who tends the swine, or if he have not met    Thyself, when thou wert ranging through the hail.”  

    He spake, and the sagacious Medon heard,    As crouching underneath a throne he lay,    Wrapped in the skin just taken from a steer,    To hide from the black doom of death. He came    From where he lay, and quickly flung aside    The skin, and, springing forward, clasped the knees    Of the young prince, and said in winged words:﻿—  

    “Dear youth, behold me here; be merciful;    Speak to thy father, that he put not forth    His sword to slay me, eager as he is    For vengeance, and incensed against the men    Who haunt these halls to make his wealth a spoil,    And in their folly hold thyself in scorn.”  

    He spake; the sage Ulysses smiled and said:    “Be of good cheer, since this my son protects    And rescues thee. Now mayst thou well perceive,    And say to other men, how much more safe    Is doing good than evil. Go thou forth    Out of this slaughter to the open court,    Thou and the illustrious bard, and sit ye there,    While here within I do what yet I must.”  

    He spake; they moved away and left the hall,    And by the altar of almighty Jove    Sat looking round them, still in fear of death.  

    Meantime, Ulysses passed with searching look    O’er all the place, to find if yet remained    A single one of all the suitor-crew    Alive, and skulking from his bitter doom.    He saw that all had fallen in blood and dust,    Many as fishes on the shelving beach    Drawn from the hoary deep by those who tend    The nets with myriad meshes. Poured abroad    Upon the sand, while panting to return    To the salt sea they lie, till the hot sun    Takes their life from them; so the suitors lay    Heaped on each other. Then Ulysses took    The word, and thus bespake Telemachus:﻿—  

    “Go now, Telemachus, and hither call    The nurse, Dame Eurycleia. I would say    Somewhat to her that comes into my thought.”  

    So spake the chief. Telemachus obeyed    The word, and smote the door, and called the nurse:﻿—  

    “Come hither, ancient dame, who hast in charge    To oversee the women in their tasks;    My father calls thee, and would speak with thee.”  

    He spake; nor flew the word in vain; she flung    Apart the portals of those stately rooms,    And came in haste. Before her went the prince.    Among the corpses of the slain they found    Ulysses, stained with blood, and grimed with dust.    As when a lion, who has just devoured    A bullock of the pasture, moves away,    A terror to the sight, with breast and cheeks    All bathed in blood; so did Ulysses seem,    His feet and hands steeped in the blood of men.    She, when she saw the corpses and the pools    Of blood, and knew the mighty task complete,    Was moved to shout for joy. Ulysses checked    Her eager zeal, and said in winged words:﻿—  

    “Rejoice in spirit, dame, but calm thyself,    And shout not. To exult aloud o’er those    Who lie in death is an unholy thing.    The pleasure of the gods, and their own guilt,    Brought death on these; for no respect had they    To any of their fellow-men﻿—the good    Or evil﻿—whosoever he might be    That came to them, and thus on their own heads    They drew this fearful fate. Now name to me    The women of the palace; let me know    Who is disloyal, and who innocent.”  

    Then thus the well-beloved nurse replied:    “My son, I will declare the truth. There dwell    Here in thy palace fifty serving-maids,    Whom we have taught to work, to comb the fleece    And serve the household. Twelve of these have walked    The way of shame. To me they give no heed,    Nor to Penelope herself. Thy son    Has just now grown to manhood, and the queen    Has never suffered him to rule the maids;    But let me now, ascending to her room﻿—    The royal bower﻿—apprise thy wife, to whom    Some deity has sent the gift of sleep.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Wake her not yet, but go and summon all    The women who have wrought these shameful deeds.”  

    He spake; the matron through the palace went    To seek the women, and to bid them come.    Meanwhile, Ulysses called Telemachus,    The herdsman and the swineherd to his side,    And thus commanded them with wingea words:﻿—  

    “Begin to carry forth the dead, and call    The women to your aid; and next make clean,    With water and with thirsty sponges, all    The sumptuous thrones and tables. When ye thus    Have put the hall in order, lead away    The serving-maids, and in the space between    The kitchen vault and solid outer wall    Smite them with your long swords till they give up    The ghost, and lose the memory evermore    Of secret meetings with the suitor-train.”  

    He spake; the women came, lamenting loud    With many tears, and carried forth the dead,    Leaning upon each other as they went,    And placed them underneath the portico    Of the walled court. Ulysses gave command,    Hastening their task, as all unwillingly    They bore the corpses forth. With water next,    And thirsty sponges in their hands, they cleansed    The sumptuous thrones and tables. Then the prince,    Telemachus, with shovels cleared the floor,    The herdsman and the swineherd aiding him,    And made the women bear the rubbish forth.    And now when all within was once again    In seemly order, they led forth the maids    From that fair pile into the space between    The kitchen vault and solid outer wall,    A narrow space from which was no escape,    And thus discreet Telemachus began:﻿—  

    “I will not take away these creatures’ lives    By a pure death﻿—these who so long have heaped    Reproaches on my mother’s head and mine,    And played the wanton with the suitor-crew.”  

    He spake, and made the hawser of a ship    Fast to a lofty shaft; the other end    He wound about the kitchen vault. So high    He stretched it that the feet of none who hung    On it might touch the ground. As when a flock    Of broad-winged thrushes or wild pigeons strike    A net within a thicket, as they seek    Their perch, and find unwelcome durance there,    So hung the women, with their heads a-row,    And cords about their necks, that they might die    A miserable death. A little while,    And but a little, quivered their loose feet    In air. They led Melanthius from the hall    And through the porch, cut off his nose and ears,    Wrenched out the parts of shame, a bloody meal    For dogs, and in their anger from the trunk    Lopped hands and feet. Then having duly washed    Their feet and hands, they came into the hall,    And to Ulysses; they had done their work.    And then to the dear nurse Ulysses said:﻿—  

    “Bring sulphur, dame, the cure of noxious air,    And fire, that I may purge the hall with smoke;    And go, and bid Penelope come down,    With her attendant women, and command    That all the handmaids of the household come.”  

    And thus in turn Dame Eurycleia spake:    “Well hast thou said, my son, but suffer me    To bring thee clothes, a tunic and a cloak,    Nor with those rags on thy broad shoulders stand    In thine own palace; it becomes thee not.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “First let a fire be kindled in this hall.”  

    He spake, and Eurycleia, the dear nurse,    Obeyed, and brought the sulphur and the fire.    Ulysses steeped in smoke the royal pile.    Both hall and court. The matron, passing through    The stately palace of Ulysses, climbed    The stair to find and summon all the maids.    And forth they issued, bearing in their hands    Torches, and, crowding round Ulysses, gave    Glad greeting, seized his hands, embraced him, kissed    His hands and brow and shoulders. The desire    To weep for joy o’ercame the chief; his eyes    O’erflowed with tears; he sobbed; he knew them all.  

            Book XXIII  Ulysses and Penelope After the Slaughter  

  Descent of Penelope to the hall﻿—Her doubts of the identity of Ulysses removed by evident tokens given by Ulysses﻿—Her transport at their removal﻿—His narrative of his adventures﻿—Departure of Ulysses with his son, the herdsman, and the swineherd, to the country.

      Up to the royal bower the matron went    With an exulting heart, to tell the queen    That her beloved husband was within.    With knees that faltered not, and quick light step    She went, and, standing by her mistress, said:﻿—  

    “Awake, Penelope, dear child, and see    With thine own eyes what thou hast pined for long.    Ulysses has returned; thy lord is here,    Though late, and he has slain the arrogant crew    Of suitors, who disgraced his house, and made    His wealth a spoil, and dared insult his son.”  

    And thus discreet Penelope replied:    “The gods, dear nurse, have made thee mad; for they    Have power to change the wisest men to fools,    And make the foolish wise, and they have warped    Thy mind once sound. How canst thou mock me thus,    Amidst my sorrows, with such idle tales?    Why wake me from the pleasant sleep that closed    My lids so softly? Never have I slept    So sweetly since Ulysses went from me    To that bad city, which no tongue should name.    Go, then; return into the lower rooms.    Had any of my women save thyself    Brought such a message to disturb my sleep,    I would have sent her back into the hall    With angry words; thy years are thy excuse.”  

    But Eurycleia, the dear nurse, rejoined:    “Nay, my dear child, I mock thee not. Most true    It is that thy Ulysses has returned,    And here he is at home, as I have said.    The stranger whom they scoffed at in the hall    Is he; and long Telemachus has known    That he was here, but wisely kept from all    His father’s secret, till he should avenge    Upon those violent men their guilty deeds.”  

    She ended, and her mistress, overjoyed,    Sprang from her couch, embraced the aged dame,    And wept, and said to her in winged words:﻿—  

    “Tell me, dear nurse, and truly, if indeed    Ulysses have returned as thou hast said.    How smote he those proud suitors?﻿—he alone,    And they so many, gathered in the hall.”  

    And thus the well-beloved nurse replied:    “I saw it not, nor knew of it. I heard    Only the moanings of the slain, while we    The maids, affrighted, sat in a recess    Of that well-vaulted chamber; the firm doors    Closed us all in, until at length thy son,    Sent by his father, called me forth. I found    Ulysses standing midst the dead that lay    Heaped on each other, everywhere along    The solid pavement. Thou wouldst have rejoiced    To see him like a lion with the stains    Of slaughter on him. Now the suitors lie    Before the portals of the palace-court,    And he has kindled a great fire, and steeps    In smoke the noble hall. He bade me come    To call thee. Follow me, that ye may give    Your hearts to gladness﻿—for ye have endured    Great sorrows both, and your long-cherished hope    Is now fulfilled. He hath returned alive    To his dear home, and finds thee and his son    Yet in his palace, and hath terribly    Avenged himself upon the guilty men    Who under his own roof have done him wrong.”  

    Then spake the sage Penelope again:    “Beloved nurse, exult not overmuch,    Nor rashly boast. Well is it known to thee,    Were he to come beneath this roof again,    How welcome he would be to all, but most    To me and to the son to whom we gave    His being. Yet thy tidings are not true.    Someone of the immortals must have slain    The arrogant suitors, angry to behold    Their foul injustice and their many crimes;    For no respect had they to mortal man,    Good he might be, or bad, whome’er they met;    And therefore have they made an evil end.    But my Ulysses must have perished far    From Ithaca, cut off from his return.”  

    Then Eurycleia, the dear nurse, rejoined:    “What words are these, my child, that pass thy lips?    Sayst thou, then, that thy husband, who now stands    Upon thy hearthstone, never will return?    O slow of faith! but thou wert ever thus.    Come, then, I give a certain proof. I saw    Myself, when he was at the bath, the scar    Left on him by the white tusk of a boar,    And would have told thee, but he laid his hands    Upon my mouth, and would not suffer me    To bear the tidings, such his forecast was.    Now follow me; I give my life in pledge.    If I deceive thee, slay me ruthlessly.”  

    Then spake discreet Penelope again:    “Dear nurse, though thou in many things art wise,    Think not to scan the counsels of the gods,    Who live forever. Yet will we descend,    And meet my son, and look upon the slain,    And see the avenger by whose hand they fell.”  

    She spake, and from the royal bower went down,    Uncertain whether she should stand aloof    And question there her lord, or haste to him    And clasp his hands in hers and kiss his brow.    But having passed the threshold of hewn stone,    Entering she took her seat right opposite    Ulysses, in the full glow of the fire,    Against the other wall. Ulysses sat    Beside a lofty column with his eyes    Cast down, and waiting for his highborn wife    To speak when she had seen him. Long she sat    In silence, for amazement overpowered    Her senses. Sometimes, looking in his eyes,    She saw her husband there, and then again,    Clad in those sordid weeds, she knew him not.    Then spake Telemachus, and chid her thus:﻿—  

    “Mother, unfeeling mother! hard of heart    Art thou; how else couldst thou remain aloof?    How keep from taking, at my father’s side,    Thy place, to talk with him, and question him?    No other wife could bring herself to bear    Such distance from a husband, just returned    After long hardships, in the twentieth year    Of absence, to his native land and her.    Mother! thy heart is harder than a stone.”  

    And thus the sage Penelope replied:    “Dear child, my faculties are overpowered    With wonder, and I cannot question him,    Nor even speak to him, nor fix my looks    Upon his face. But if it be indeed    Ulysses, and he have returned, we soon    Shall know each other; there are tokens known    To both of us, to none but him and me.”  

    She ended, and the much-enduring chief    Ulysses, smiling at her words, bespake    Telemachus at once, in winged words:﻿—  

    “Suffer thy mother, O Telemachus,    To prove me; she will know me better soon.    My looks are sordid, and my limbs are wrapped    In tattered raiment, therefore does she think    Meanly of me, and cannot willingly    Believe that I am he. But let us now    Consider what most wisely may be done.    He who hath slain, among a tribe of men,    A single one with few to avenge his death,    Flees from his kindred and his native land;    But we have slain the champions of the realm,    The flower of all the youth of Ithaca.    Therefore, I pray thee, think what shall be done.”  

    And then disoreet Telemachus replied:    “Look thou to that, dear father; for they say    That thou of all mankind wert wont to give    The wisest counsels. None of mortal birth    In this was deemed thy peer. We follow thee    With cheerful hearts; nor will our courage fail,    I think, in aught that lies within our power.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Then will I tell thee what I deem most wise.    First take the bath, and then array yourselves    In tunics, bid the palace-maidens choose    Fresh garments; let the godlike bard, who bears    The clear-toned harp, be leader, and strike up    A melody to prompt the festive dance,    That all may say who hear it from without﻿—    Whether the passers by or dwellers near﻿—    ‘It is a wedding.’ Else throughout the land    The rumor of the slaughter we have wrought    Among the suitors may have spread before    We reach our wooded farm, and there consult    Beneath the guidance of Olympian Jove.”  

    He spake; they hearkened and obeyed. They took    The bath, and then they put their garments on.    The maids arrayed themselves; the godlike bard    Took the curved harp, and woke in all the love    Of melody, and of the graceful dance.    The spacious pile resounded to the steps    Of men and shapely women in their mirth,    And one who stood without was heard to say:﻿—  

    “Someone, no doubt, has made the long-wooed queen    His bride at last; a worthless woman she,    Who could not, for the husband of her youth,    Keep his fair palace till he came again.”  

    Such words were said, but they who uttered them    Knew little what had passed. Eurynomè,    The matron of the palace, meantime took    Magnanimous Ulysses to the bath    In his own dwelling, smoothed his limbs with oil,    And threw a gorgeous mantle over him    And tunic. Pallas on the hero’s head    Shed grace and majesty; she made him seem    Taller and statelier, made his locks flow down    In curls like blossoms of the hyacinth,    As when a workman skilled in many arts,    And taught by Pallas and Minerva, twines    A golden border round the silver mass,    A glorious work; so did the goddess shed    Grace o’er his face and form. So from the bath    He stepped, like one of the immortals, took    The seat from which he rose, right opposite    Penelope, and thus addressed the queen:﻿—  

    “Lady, the dwellers of the Olympian heights    Have given thee an impenetrable heart    Beyond all other women. Sure I am    No other wife could bring herself to bear    Such distance from a husband just returned    After long hardships, in the twentieth year    Of absence, to his native land and her.    Come, nurse, prepare a bed, where by myself    I may lie down; an iron heart is hers.”  

    To this the sage Penelope replied:    “Nay, sir, ’tis not through pride or disregard,    Or through excess of wonder, that I act    Thus toward thee. Well do I remember thee    As thou wert in the day when thy good ship    Bore thee from Ithaca. Bestir thyself,    Dame Eurycleia, and make up with care    A bed without the chamber, which he framed    With his own hands; bear out the massive bed,    And lay upon it seemly coverings,    Fleeces and mantles for his nightly rest.”  

    She spake to try her husband; but, displeased,    Ulysses answered thus his virtuous queen:﻿—  

    “O woman, thou hast said unwelcome words.    Who hath displaced my bed? That task were hard    For long-experienced hands, unless some god    Had come to shift its place. No living man,    Even in his prime of years, could easily    Have moved it, for in that elaborate work    There was a mystery; it was I myself    Who shaped it, no one else. Within my court    There grew an olive-tree with full-leaved boughs,    A tall and flourishing tree; its massive stem    Was like a column. Round it I built up    A chamber with cemented stones until    The walls were finished; then I framed a roof    Above it, and put on the well-glued doors    Close fitting. Next I lopped the full-leaved boughs,    And, cutting off the trunk above the root,    Smoothed well the stump with tools, and made of it    A post to bear the couch. I bored the wood    With wimbles, placed on it the frame, and carved    The work till it was done, inlaying it    With silver, gold, and ivory. I stretched    Upon it thongs of oxhide brightly dyed    In purple. Now, O wife, I cannot know    Whether my bed remains as then it was,    Or whether someone from the root has hewn    The olive trunk, and moved it from its place.”  

    He spake, and her knees faltered and her heart    Was melted as she heard her lord recount    The tokens all so truly; and she wept,    And rose, and ran to him, and flung her arms    About his neck, and kissed his brow, and said:﻿—  

    “Ulysses, look not on me angrily,    Thou who in other things art wise above    All other men. The gods have made our lot    A hard one, jealous lest we should have passed    Our youth together happily, and thus    Have reached old age. I pray, be not incensed,    Nor take it ill that I embraced thee not    As soon as I beheld thee, for my heart    Has ever trembled lest someone who comes    Into this isle should cozen me with words;    And they who practise fraud are numberless.    The Argive Helen, child of Jupiter,    Would ne’er have listened to a stranger’s suit    And loved him, had she known that in the years    To come the warlike Greeks would bring her back    To her own land. It was a deity    Who prompted her to that foul wrong. Her thought    Was never of the great calamity    Which followed, and which brought such woe on us.    But now, since thou, by tokens clear and true,    Hast spoken of our bed, which human eye    Has never seen save mine and thine, and those    Of one handmaiden only, Actoris﻿—    Her whom my father gave me when I came    To this thy palace, and who kept the door    Of our close chamber﻿—thou hast won my mind    To full belief, though hard it was to win.”  

    She spake, and he was moved to tears; he wept    As in his arms he held his dearly loved    And faithful wife. As welcome as the land    To those who swim the deep, of whose stout barque    Neptune has made a wreck amidst the waves,    Tossed by the billow and the blast, and few    Are those who from the hoary ocean reach    The shore, their limbs all crested with the brine,    These gladly climb the sea-beach, and are safe﻿—    So welcome was her husband to her eyes.    Nor would her fair white arms release his neck,    And there would rosy-fingered Morn have found    Both weeping, but the blue-eyed Pallas planned    That thus it should not be; she stayed the night    When near its close, and held the golden Morn    Long in the ocean deeps, nor suffered her    To yoke her steeds that bring the light to men﻿—    Lampas and Phaëthon, swift steeds that bear    The Morning on her way. Ulysses then,    The man of forecast, thus bespake his queen:﻿—  

    “Not yet, O wife, have we attained the close    Of all our labors. One remains which yet    I must achieve, toilsome, and measureless    In difficulty; for so prophesied    The spirit of Tiresias, on the day    When to the abode of Pluto I went down    To ask the seer concerning the return    Of my companions, and my own. But now    Seek we our couch, dear wife, that, softly laid,    We may refresh ourselves with welcome sleep.”  

    Then spake in turn the sage Penelope:    “Whenever thou desirest it thy couch    Shall be made ready, since the gods vouchsafe    To bring thee back into thy pleasant home    And to thy native land. But now that thou    Hast spoken of it, and some deity    Is prompting thee, declare what this new task    May be. Hereafter I shall hear of it,    No doubt, nor were it worse to know it now.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Dear wife, why wilt thou ask? why press me thus?    Yet will I tell thee truly, nor will keep    Aught from thee, though thou wilt not gladly hear,    Nor I relate. Tiresias bade me pass    Through city after city, till I found    A people who know not the sea, nor eat    Their food with salt, who never yet beheld    The red-prowed galley, nor the shapely oars,    Which are the wings of ships. And this plain sign    He gave, nor will I keep it back from thee,    That when another traveller whom I meet    Shall say it is a winnowing-fan I bear    On my stout shoulder, there he bade me plant    The oar upright in earth, and offer up    To monarch Neptune there a ram, a bull,    And sturdy boar, and then, returning home,    Burn hallowed hecatombs to all the gods    Who dwell in the broad heaven, each one in turn.    At last will death come over me, afar    From ocean, such a death as peacefully    Shall take me off in a serene old age,    Amid a people prosperous and content    All this, the prophet said, will come to pass.”  

    And then the sage Penelope rejoined:    “If thus the immortals make thy later age    The happier, there is hope that thou wilt find    Escape from evil in the years to come.”  

    So talked they with each other. Meantime went    Eurynomè, attended by the nurse,    And in the light of blazing torches dressed    With soft fresh drapery a bed; and when    Their busy hands had made it full and high,    The aged dame withdrew to take her rest    In her own chamber, while Eurynomè,    Who kept the royal bower, upheld a torch    And thither led the pair, and, when they both    Were in the chamber, went her way. They took    Their place delighted in the ancient bed.    The prince, the herdsman, and the swineherd ceased    Meantime to tread the dance, and bade the maids    Cease also, and within the palace-rooms    Dark with night’s shadow, sought their place of rest.    Then came the time of pleasant mutual talk,    In which that noblest among women spake    Of wrongs endured beneath her roof from those    Who came to woo her﻿—an insatiate crew﻿—    Who made of beeves and fatlings of the flock    Large slaughter, and drained many a wine-cask dry.    Then nobly born Ulysses told what woes    His valor brought on other men; what toils    And suffering he had borne; he told her all,    And she, delighted, heard him, nor did sleep    Light on her eyelids till his tale was done.  

    And first he told her how he overcame    The people of Ciconia; how he passed    Thence to the rich fields of the race who feed    Upon the lotus; what the Cyclops did,    And how upon the Cyclops he avenged    The death of his brave comrades, whom the wretch    Had piteously slaughtered and devoured.    And how he came to Aeolus, and found    A friendly welcome, and was sent by him    Upon his voyage; yet ’twas not his fate    To reach his native land; a tempest caught    His fleet, and far across the fishy deep    Bore him away, lamenting bitterly.    And how he landed at Telepylus,    Among the Laestrigonians, who destroyed    His ships and warlike comrades, he alone    In his black ship escaping. Then he told    Of Circè, her deceit and many arts,    And how he went to Pluto’s dismal realm    In his good galley, to consult the soul    Of him of Thebes, Tiresias, and beheld    All his lost comrades and his mother﻿—her    Who brought him forth, and trained him when a child.    And how he heard the Sirens afterward,    And how he came upon the wandering rocks,    The terrible Charybdis, and the crags    Of Scylla﻿—which no man had ever passed    In safety; how his comrades slew for food    The oxen of the Sun; how Jupiter,    The Thunderer, with a bolt of fire from heaven    Smote his swift barque; and how his gallant crew    All perished, he alone escaped with life.    And how he reached Ogygia’s isle, he told,    And met the nymph Calypso, who desired    That he would be her husband, and long time    Detained and fed him in her vaulted grot,    And promised that he ne’er should die, nor know    Decay of age, through all the days to come;    Yet moved she not the purpose of his heart.    And how he next through many hardships came    To the Phaeacians, and they welcomed him    And honored him as if he were a god,    And to his native country in a barque    Sent him with ample gifts of brass and gold    And raiment. As he uttered this last word,    Sleep softly overcame him; all his limbs    Lay loose in rest, and all his cares were calmed.  

    The blue-eyed Pallas had yet new designs;    And when she deemed Ulysses was refreshed    With rest and sleep, in that accustomed bed,    She called the Morning, daughter of the Dawn,    To rise from ocean in her car of gold,    And shed her light on men. Ulysses rose    From his soft couch, and thus enjoined his spouse:﻿—  

    “O wife! enough of misery have we borne    Already﻿—thou in weeping for my long    Unhappy absence﻿—I for years withheld    By Jupiter and all the other gods    From my return to this dear land, although    I pined for home. Now since upon this couch    We take the place so earnestly desired,    Take thou the charge of all that I possess    Here in the palace. For the herds and flocks    Which those high-handed suitors have devoured,    I shall seize many others as a spoil;    The rest the Greeks will bring me, till my stalls    Are filled again. I hasten to my farm    Embowered in trees, to greet the aged man    My excellent father, who continually    Grieves for me. Prudent as thou art, I give    This charge; a rumor, with the rising sun,    Will quickly go abroad that I have slain    The suitors in the palace. Now withdraw,    Thou and thy maidens, to the upper room,    And sit and look not forth, nor ask of aught.”  

    So spake the chief, and on his shoulders braced    His glorious armor. Then he called his son,    The herdsman, and the swineherd, bidding them    To take in hand their weapons. They obeyed,    And, having armed themselves in brass, they threw    The portals open. As they all went forth,    Ulysses led the way. The early light    Was on the earth, but Pallas, shrouding them    In darkness, led them quickly through the town.  

            Book XXIV  Conclusion  

  The souls of the suitors conducted to Hades by Mercury﻿—Agamemnon and Achilles in Hades﻿—Their meeting with the souls of the suitors, and narrative of Amphimedon﻿—Meeting and mutual recognition of Ulysses and his father in the orchard at Ithaca﻿—Insurrection of the Ithacans, with Eupeithes, the father of Antinoüs, at their head﻿—The revolt quelled, Eupeithes slain by Laertes and a lasting peace made between Ulysses and his subject.

      Cyllenian Hermes summoned forth the souls    Of the slain suitors. In his hand he bore    The beautiful golden wand, with which at will    He shuts the eyes of men, or opens them    From sleep. With this he guided on their way    The ghostly rout; they followed, uttering    A shrilly wail. As when a flock of bats,    Deep in a dismal cavern, fly about    And squeak, if one have fallen from the place    Where, clinging to each other and the rock,    They rested, so that crowd of ghosts went forth    With shrill and plaintive cries. Before them moved    Beneficent Hermes through those dreary ways,    And past the ocean stream they went, and past    Leucadia’s rock, the portals of the Sun,    And people of the land of dreams, until    They reached the fields of asphodel, where dwell    The souls, the bodiless forms of those who die.  

    And there they found the soul of Peleus’ son,    His friend Patroclus, and the blameless chief    Antilochus, and Ajax, who excelled    In stature and in form all other Greeks    Save the great son of Peleus. These were grouped    Around Achilles. Then approached the ghost    Of Agamemnon, Atreus’ son; he seemed    In sorrow, and around him others stood,    Who in the palace of Aegisthus met    Their fate and died. The son of Peleus took    The word, and spake to Agamemnon thus:﻿—  

    “Atrides, we had thought that Jove, who wields    The thunder, favored thee, through all thy years,    Beyond all other men﻿—thou didst bear rule    Over so many and such valiant men    Upon the plain of Troy, where we of Greece    Endured such sufferings. Yet all too soon    The cruel doom of death, which no man born    Of woman can escape, has fallen on thee.    O, if amid the honors of thy sway    That doom had overtaken thee, while yet    In Troy’s far realm, then would the assembled Greeks    Have built a tomb to thee! Thou wouldst have left    A heritage of glory to thy son;    Now hast thou died a most unhappy death.”  

    And then the soul of Agamemnon said:    “Fortunate son of Peleus, godlike chief    Achilles, who didst die upon the field    Of Ilium, far from Argos, while there fell    Around thee many of the bravest sons    Of Troy and Greece, who fought for thee, and thou    Wert lying in thy mighty bulk, amid    Whirlwinds of dust, forgetful evermore    Of horsemanship. All that day long we fought,    Nor stayed our hands till Jove, to part us, sent    A hurricane. When we had borne thee thence    And brought thee to the fleet, upon a bier    We laid thee, pouring o’er thy shapely limbs    Warm water, and anointing them with oil.    Round thee the Achaians stood in tears, hot tears,    And cut their hair away. From ocean’s depth    Thy mother, when she heard the tidings, rose    With her immortal sea-nymphs. Mournfully    Came o’er the waves the sound of their lament.    Trembled the Greeks with fear, and, rushing forth,    Would have sought refuge in their roomy ships,    If Nestor, wise in ancient lore, and known    For counsels ever safe, had not restrained    Their haste, and thus declared his prudent thought:﻿—  

    “ ‘Stay, Argives, youths of Greece; think not of flight!    It is his mother; from the sea she comes    To her dead son, and brings her deathless nymphs.’  

    “He spake; his words withheld the valiant Greeks    From flight. And now around thee came and stood    The daughters of the Ancient of the Deep,    Lamenting bitterly. Upon thy corse    They put ambrosial robes. The Muses nine    Bewailed thee with sweet voices, answering    Each other. Then wouldst thou have seen no one    Of all the Argive host with eyes unwet,    The Muses’ song so moved them. Seventeen day?    And nights we mourned thee﻿—both the immortal ones    And mortals. On the eighteenth day we gave    Thy body to the fire, and at the pile    Slew many fatling ewes, and many an ox    With crooked horns. In raiment of the gods    The fire consumed thee midst anointing oils    And honey. Many heroes of our host    In armor and in chariots, or on foot,    Contended round thy funeral pyre in games,    And mighty was the din. And when at length    The fires of Vulcan had consumed thy flesh,    We gathered up at morning thy white bones,    Achilles, pouring over them pure wine    And fragrant oils. Thy mother brought a vase    Of gold, which Bacchus gave, she said, the work    Of Vulcan the renowned, and in it now,    Illustrious son of Peleus, thy white bones    Are lying, and with thine are mingled those    Of dead Patroclus Menoetiades.    Apart we placed the ashes of thy friend    Antilochus, whom thou didst honor most    After the slain Patroclus. O’er all these    The sacred army of the warlike Greeks    Built up a tomb magnificently vast    Upon a cape of the broad Hellespont,    There to be seen, far off upon the deep,    By those who now are born, or shall be born    In future years. Thy mother, having first    Prayed to the gods, appointed noble games,    Within the circus, for the Achaian chiefs.    Full often have I seen the funeral rites    Of heroes, when the youth, their chieftain dead,    Were girded for the games, and strove to win    The prizes; but I most of all admired    Those which the silver-footed Thetis gave    To mark thy burial, who wert loved by all    The immortals. So thou hast not lost by death    Thy fame, Achilles, and among the tribes    Of men thy glory will be ever great;    But what hath it availed me to have brought    The war on Ilium to an end, since Jove    Doomed me to be destroyed on my return,    Slain by Aegisthus and my guilty wife?”  

    So talked they with each other. Now approached    The herald Argus-queller, bringing down    The souls of suitors by Ulysses slain.    Both chiefs moved toward them, wondering at the sight.    The soul of Agamemnon, Atreus’ son,    Knew well-renowned Amphimedon, whose birth    Was from Melanthius, and by whom he once    Was welcomed to his house in Ithaca;    And him the son of Atreus first bespake:﻿—  

    “Amphimedon, what sad mischance has brought    You all, who seem like chosen men, and all    Of equal age, into these drear abodes    Beneath the earth? ’Twere hard indeed to find,    In a whole city, nobler forms of men.    Has Neptune wrecked you in your ships at sea    With fierce winds and huge waves, or armed men    Smitten you on the land, while carrying off    Their beeves and sheep, or fighting to defend    Your wives and city? Tell me, for I claim    To have been once your guest. Rememberest thou    I lodged in thy own palace when I came    With godlike Menelaus, and besought    Ulysses to unite his gallant fleet    To ours, and sail for Troy. A whole month long    Were we in crossing the wide sea, and hard    We found the task to gain as our ally    Ulysses, the destroyer of walled towns.”  

    The soul of dead Amphimedon replied:    “Atrides Agamemnon, far renowned,    And king of men, I well remember all    Of which thou speakest; I will now relate,    And truly, how we met our evil end.    We wooed the wife of the long-absent chief    Ulysses; she rejected not nor yet    Granted our suit, detested as it was,    But, meditating our destruction, planned    This shrewd device. She laid upon the loom    Within her rooms a web of delicate threads,    Ample in length and breadth, and thus she said    To all of us: ‘Young princes, who are come    To woo me﻿—since Ulysses is no more,    My noble husband﻿—urge me not, I pray,    To marriage, till I finish in the loom﻿—    That so my threads may not be spun in vain﻿—    A funeral vesture for the hero-chief    Laertes, when his fatal hour shall come,    With death’s long sleep; else some Achaian dame    Might blame me, should I leave without a shroud    Him who in life possessed such ample wealth.’    Such were her words, and easily they won    Upon our generous minds. So went she on    Weaving that ample web, and every night    Unravelled it by torchlight. Three full years    She practised thus, and by the fraud deceived    The Grecian youths; but when the hours had brought    The fourth year round, a woman who knew all    Revealed the mystery, and we ourselves    Saw her unravelling the ample web.    Thenceforth constrained, and with unwilling hands,    She finished it. And when at length she showed    The vesture she had woven, the broad web    That she had bleached to brightness like the sun’s    Or like the moon’s, some hostile deity    Brought back Ulysses to a distant nook    Of his own fields, and to his swineherd’s lodge.    And thither also came in his black ship    His son, returning from the sandy coast    Of Pylos. Thence the twain, when they had planned    To slay the suitors, came within the walls    Of the great city; first Telemachus,    And after him Ulysses, with his guide    The swineherd. He was clad in sordid weeds,    And seemed a wretched beggar, very old,    Propped on a staff. In that disguise of rags    None knew him, as he suddenly appeared,    Not even the oldest of us all. Harsh words    And blows we gave him. He endured them all    Awhile with patience, smitten and reviled    In his own palace. Moved at length by Jove,    He and his son Telemachus bore off    The shining weapons from the hall, to lie    In a far chamber, and barred all the doors.    Then, prompted by her husband’s craft, the queen    Proposed a game of archery, with bow    And rings of hoary steel, to all of us    Ill-fated suitors. This drew on our death.    Not one of us could bend that sturdy bow,    None had the strength. But as it passed from us    Into Ulysses’ hands, we loudly chid    The bearer, and forbade him, but in vain.    Telemachus alone with stern command    Bade him deliver it. When in his hands    The much-enduring chief, Ulysses, took    The bow, he drew the string with ease, and sent    A shaft through all the rings. He sprang and stood    Upon the threshold; at his feet he poured    The winged arrows, cast a terrible glance    Around him, and laid King Antinoüs dead,    Then sent the fatal shafts at those who stood    Before him; side by side they fell and died.    Some god, we saw, was with them, as they rushed    Upon us mightily, and chased us through    The palace, slaying us on every side;    And fearful were the groans of dying men,    As skulls were cloven, and the pavement swam    With blood. Such, Agamemnon, was the fate    By which we perished. Now our bodies lie    Neglected at the palace; for not yet    Our kindred, dwelling in our homes, have heard    The tidings, nor have come to cleanse our wounds    From the dark blood, and lay us on the bier    With tears﻿—such honors as are due the dead.”  

    In turn the soul of Agamemnon spake:    “Son of Laertes, fortunate and wise,    Ulysses! thou by feats of eminent might    And valor dost possess thy wife again.    And nobly minded is thy blameless queen,    The daughter of Icarius, faithfully    Remembering him to whom she gave her troth    While yet a virgin. Never shall the fame    Of his great valor perish, and the gods    Themselves shall frame, for those who dwell on earth,    Sweet strains in praise of sage Penelope.    Not such was she who treacherously slew    The husband of her youth﻿—she of the house    Of Tyndarus. Her name among mankind    Shall be the hateful burden of a song;    And great is the dishonor it has brought    On women, even the faithful and the good.”  

    So talked they with each other, standing there    In Pluto’s realm beneath the vaulted earth.    Meantime Ulysses, hastening from the town,    Came to the fair fields of Laertes, tilled    With care. Laertes, after years of toil,    Acquired them. There his dwelling stood; a shed    Encircled it, where ate and sat and slept    The servants of the household, who fulfilled    His slightest wish. An old Sicilian dame    Was there, who waited, in that distant spot,    On her old master with assiduous care.    And then Ulysses to his followers said:﻿—  

    “Go into that fair dwelling, and with speed    Slay for our feast the fattest of the swine.    I go to prove my father; I would learn    Whether he knows me when he sees my face,    Or haply knows me not, so long away.”  

    He spake, and laid his weapons in their hands.    Straight toward the house they went. Ulysses passed    Into the fruitful orchard, there to prove    His father. Going down and far within    The garden-plot, he found not Dolius there,    Nor any of the servants, nor his sons.    All were abroad, old Dolius leading them.    They gathered thorns to fence the garden-grounds.    There, delving in that fertile spot, around    A newly planted tree, Ulysses saw    His father only, sordidly arrayed    In a coarse tunic, patched and soiled. He wore    Patched greaves of bullock’s hide upon his thighs,    A fence against the thorns; and on his hands    gloves, to protect them from the prickly stems    Of bramble; and upon his head a cap    Of goatskin. There he brooded o’er his grief.    Him when the much-enduring chief beheld,    Wasted with age and sorrow-worn, he stopped    Beside a lofty pear-tree’s stem and wept,    And pondered whether he should kiss and clasp    His father in his arms, and tell him all,    How he had reached his native land and home,    Or question first and prove him. Musing thus,    It pleased him to begin with sportive words;    And thus resolved, divine Ulysses drew    Near to his father stooping at his task,    And loosening the hard earth about a tree,    And thus the illustrious son accosted him:﻿—  

    “O aged man! there is no lack of skill    In tending this fair orchard, which thy care    Keeps flourishing; no growth is there of fig,    Vine, pear, or olive, or of plants that grow    In borders, that has missed thy friendly hand.    Yet let me say, and be thou not displeased,    Thou art ill cared for, burdened as thou art    With years, and squalid, and in mean attire.    It cannot be that for thy idleness    Thy master treats thee thus; nor is there seen    Aught servile in thy aspect﻿—in thy face    Or stature; thou art rather like a king;    Thou seemest one who should enjoy the bath    And banquet, and lie soft﻿—for this befits    Old men like thee. Now say, and tell me true,    Who may thy master be? whose orchard this    Which thou dost tend? And, more than this, declare,    For much I long to know, if I am come    To Ithaca, as I just now was told    By one who met me as I came﻿—a man    Not overwise, who would not stop to tell    What I desired to learn, nor bear to hear    My questions, when I asked him if a guest    Of mine were living yet in health, or dead    And in the realm of Pluto. Let me speak    Of him, and mark me well, I pray; I lodged    Once, in my native land, a man who came    Into my house, and never stranger yet    More welcome was than he. He was by birth    Of Ithaca, he said, Laertes’ son,    And grandson of Arcesias. Him I led    Beneath my roof, and hospitably lodged,    And feasted in the plenty of my home,    And gave such gifts as might become a host﻿—    Seven talents of wrought gold, a silver cup    All over rough with flowers, twelve single cloaks,    Twelve mats, twelve mantles passing beautiful,    And tunics twelve, and, chosen by himself,    Twelve graceful damsels, skilled in household arts.”  

    And then his father answered, shedding tears:    “Thou art indeed, O stranger, in the land    Of which thou dost inquire, but wicked men    And lawless now possess it. Thou hast given    Thy generous gifts in vain; yet hadst thou found    Ulysses living yet in Ithaca,    Then would he have dismissed thee recompensed    With gifts and liberal cheer, as is the due    Of him who once has been our host. Yet say,    And truly say, how many years have passed    Since thou didst lodge my son, if he it was,    Thy hapless guest, whom, far away from home    And all his friends, the creatures of the deep,    And the foul birds of air, and beasts of prey,    Already have devoured. No mother mourned    His death and wrapped him in his shroud, nor I,    His father; nor did chaste Penelope,    His consort nobly dowered, bewail the man    She loved upon his bier with eyes dissolved    In tears, as fitting was﻿—an honor due    To those who die. Now, further, truly tell,    For I would learn, what is thy name, and whence    Thou comest, from what tribe, thy city where,    And who thy parents. Where is the good ship    At anchor which has brought thee and thy friends?    Or hast thou landed from another’s barque,    Which put thee on the shore and left the isle?”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “I will tell all and truly. I am come    From Alybas; a stately dwelling there    Is mine, Apheidas is my father, son    Of royal Polypemon, and my name    Eperitus. Some deity has warped    My course astray from the Sicanian coast,    And brought me hitherward against my will.    My barque lies yonder, stationed by the field    Far from the city. This is the fifth year    Since parting with me thy Ulysses left    My native land for his, ill-fated man!    Yet there were flights of birds upon the right    Of happy presage as he sailed, and I    Dismissed him cheerfully, and cheerfully    He went. We hoped that we might yet become    Each other’s guests, exchanging princely gifts.”  

    He spake, and a dark cloud of sorrow came    Over Laertes. With both hands he grasped    The yellow dust, and over his white head    Shed it with piteous groans. Ulysses felt    His heart within him melted; the hot breath    Rushed through his nostrils as he looked upon    His well-beloved father, and he sprang    And kissed and clasped him in his arms, and said:﻿—  

    “Nay, I am he, my father; I myself    Am he of whom thou askest. I am come    To mine own country in the twentieth year.    But calm thyself, refrain from tears, and grieve    No more, and let me tell thee, in a word,    I have slain all the suitors in my halls,    And so avenged their insolence and crimes.”  

    And then Laertes spake again, and said:    “If now thou be Ulysses, my lost son,    Give some plain token, that I may believe.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “First, then, behold with thine own eyes the scar    Which once the white tusk of a forest boar    Inflicted on Parnassus, when I made    The journey thither, by thy own command,    And by my gracious mother’s, to receive    Gifts which her father, King Autolycus,    Once promised, when he came to Ithaca.    And listen to me further; let me name    The trees which in thy well-tilled orchard grounds    Thou gavest me; I asked them all of thee,    When by thy side I trod the garden walks,    A little boy. We went among the trees,    And thou didst name them. Of the pear thirteen,    And of the apple ten thou gavest me,    And forty fig-trees; and thou didst engage    To give me fifty rows of vines, each row    Of growth to feed the winepress. Grapes are there    Of every flavor when the hours of Jove    Shall nurse them into ripeness from on high.”  

    He spake; a trembling seized the old man’s heart    And knees, as he perceived how true were all    The tokens which Ulysses gave. He threw    Round his dear son his arms. The hardy chief,    Ulysses, drew him fainting to his heart.    But when the old man’s strength revived, and calm    Came o’er his spirit, thus he spake again:﻿—  

    “O father Jove, assuredly the gods    Dwell on the Olympian height, since we behold    The arrogant suitors punished for their crimes.    Yet much I fear lest all the Ithacans    Throng hither, and send messages to rouse    Against us all the Cephallenian states.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “Take courage; let no thought like that disturb    Thy mind; but let us hasten to the house.    Telemachus is there, with whom I sent    The herdsman and the swineherd, bidding them    Make ready with all speed our evening meal.”  

    Thus talked the twain, and toward the dwelling took    Their way, and entering the commodious rooms    They found Telemachus, and by his side    The herdsman and the keeper of the swine,    Dividing for the feast the plenteous meats,    And mingling the dark wine. Then to the bath    Came the Sicilian dame, and ministered    To the large-souled Laertes, and with oil    Anointed him, and wrapped a sumptuous cloak    About him. Pallas gave the monarch’s limbs    An ampler roundness; taller to the sight    He stood, and statelier. As he left the bath,    His son beheld with wonder in his eyes,    So like a god Laertes seemed, and thus    Ulysses said to him in winged words:﻿—  

    “Someone among the ever-living gods    Hath surely shed, O father, on thy form    And aspect all this grace and majesty.”  

    The sage Laertes answered: “Father Jove,    And Pallas and Apollo! would that I    Were now as when I took the citadel    Of Nericus, the strongly built, beside    The seashore of Epirus, leading on    My Cephallenians! With such strength as then,    Armed for the fray, I would have met and fought    The suitors in the palace yesterday,    And struck down many lifeless in the hall,    And greatly would thy spirit have rejoiced.”  

    So talked they with each other. When they all    Ceased from their task, and saw their meal prepared,    They sat them down in order on the thrones    And seats, and each put forth his hand and shared    The banquet Now approached an aged man,    Dolius, attended by his sons, who came    Weary with toil, for the Sicilian dame,    The nurse who reared them, went and summoned them﻿—    She who in his late age with faithful care    Cherished the father. These, when at the board    They saw Ulysses, and knew who he was,    Stopped in the hall astonished. Instantly    Ulysses called to them with friendly words:﻿—  

    “Sit at the board, old man; let none of you    Give way to blank amazement. Know that we,    Though keen our appetite for this repast,    Have waited long, expecting your return.”  

    He spake, and Dolius sprang with outstretched arms    And seized Ulysses by the hand, and kissed    The wrist; and thus in winged words he spake:﻿—  

    “Dear master! since thou art returned to us,    Who longed and yet expected not to see    Thy face again﻿—since some divinity    Has led thee hither﻿—hail! and great may be    Thy happiness, and may the gods bestow    All blessings on thee! But declare, for I    Would gladly know, if sage Penelope    Have heard the tidings yet of thy return,    Or must we send them by a messenger.”  

    Ulysses, the sagacious, answered thus:    “My aged friend, she knows already all.    Why wouldst thou take that care upon thyself?”  

    He spake, and Dolius on a polished seat    Sat down, but round the great Ulysses came    His sons, and welcomed him with loving words,    And hung upon his hand, and then they took    Their places by their father. So they sat    Beneath Laertes’ roof, and banqueted.  

    Now through the city meantime swiftly ran    The rumor that the suitors all had met    A bloody death. No sooner had men heard    The tidings than they came with cries and moans    Before the palace, moving to and fro.    Each carried forth his dead, and gave to each    His funeral rites, except to those who came    From distant cities; these they put on board    Swift-sailing galleys of the fishermen,    That they might bear them home. And then they came    Sorrowing together in the marketplace.    There, when the assembly now was full, arose    Eupeithes and addressed them. In his heart    Was sorrow, that could never be consoled,    For his slain son Antinoüs, who was first    To fall before Ulysses. Weeping rose    The father, and harangued the assembly thus:﻿—  

    “Great things, indeed, my friends, hath this man done    For us Achaians. Many valiant men    He gathered in his ships and led abroad,    And lost his gallant ships, and lost his men    And now, returning, he has put to death    The best of all the Cephallenian race.    Come, then, and ere he find a safe retreat    In Pylos, or in hallowed Elis, where    The Epeians rule, pursue him; endless shame    Will be our portion else, and they who live    In future years will hear of our disgrace.    If we avenge not on these men of blood    The murder of our sons and brothers, life    Will not be sweet to me, and I would go    At once, and gladly, down among the dead.    Rise, then, and fall upon them ere they flee.”  

    So spake he, weeping; and the Greeks were moved    With pity as they heard him. Now appeared    The herald Medon and the sacred bard,    As, rising from the sleep of night, they left    The palace of Ulysses. They stood forth    Amid the multitude, who all beheld    With wonder. Then sagacious Medon spake:﻿—  

    “Give ear, ye men of Ithaca, and know    That not without the approval of the gods    Ulysses hath done this. I saw, myself,    One of the immortals taking part with him,    In all things like to Mentor. Now the god    Standing before Ulysses strengthened him    For combat, and now drove the routed band    Of suitors through the hall; in heaps they fell.”  

    He spake, and all who heard were pale with fear.    The aged hero, Halitherses, son    Of Mastor, then came forward; he alone    Knew what was past and what was yet to come,    And, wisely judging, to the assembly said:﻿—  

    “Hear now my words, ye men of Ithaca.    Through your own wrong all this has come to pass.    To me ye would not hearken, nor obey    When Mentor, shepherd of the people, spake.    On the mad doings of your sons ye put    No curb, nor checked the guilty insolence    That dared to waste the substance and insult    The consort of a man of eminent worth,    Who, so they thought, would nevermore return.    Now be it as I counsel; let us not    Go forth to draw down evil on our heads.”  

    He spake; but more than half the assembly rushed    Abroad with shouts; the others kept their place    Together. Ill the augur’s speech had pleased    The most. Eupeithes had persuaded them.    They flew to arms, and when they had put on    The glittering brass, they mustered in close ranks    Before the spacious city. At their head    Eupeithes led them on, who madly deemed    Himself the avenger of his slaughtered son.    Yet he from that encounter nevermore    Was to return; his fate o’ertook him there.  

    Then Pallas thus addressed Saturnian Jove:    “Our Father, son of Saturn, king of kings,    Tell me, I pray, the purpose of thy heart    Yet unrevealed. Shall there be cruel war    And deadly combats, or wilt thou ordain    That these shall henceforth dwell in amity?”  

    And cloud-compelling Jove made answer thus:    “My child, why ask me? Was it not with thee    A cherished purpose, that, returning home,    Ulysses amply should avenge himself    Upon the suitors? Do, then, as thou wilt.    Yet this, as the most fitting, I advise.    Now that the great Ulysses has avenged    His wrongs, let there be made a faithful league    With oaths, and let Ulysses ever reign;    And we will cause the living to forget    Their sons and brothers slain, and all shall dwell    In friendship as they heretofore have dwelt,    And there shall be prosperity and peace.”  

    He spake, and eager as she was before,    Encouraged by his words, the goddess plunged    Down from the summits of the Olympian mount    Now when they all had feasted to the full,    The much-enduring chief, Ulysses, said:    “Go, one of you, and see if they are near.”  

    He spake; a son of Dolius at his word    Went forth, and, coming to the threshold, stopped.    He saw them all at hand, and instantly    Bespake Ulysses thus, with winged words:    “They are upon us; we must arm at once.”  

    He spake; they rose, and quickly were in arms.    Four were Ulysses and his friends, and six    The sons of Dolius. Old Laertes then,    And Dolius, put on armor with the rest,    Gray-headed as they were, for now their aid    Was needed. When they all had clad themselves    In shining brass, they threw the portals wide    And sallied forth, Ulysses at their head.  

    Now Pallas, daughter of almighty Jove,    Drew near them. She had taken Mentor’s form    And Mentor’s voice. The much-enduring chief,    Ulysses, saw her and rejoiced, and said    To his beloved son, Telemachus:﻿—  

    “Now wilt thou, of thyself, Telemachus,    Bethink thee, when thou minglest in the fray    That tries men’s valor, not to cast disgrace    Upon thy forefathers﻿—a race renowned    For manly daring over all the earth.”  

    And thus discreet Telemachus replied:    “Nay, if thou wilt, my father, thou shalt see    That by no lack of valor shall I cast,    As thou hast said, dishonor on thy race.”  

    Laertes heard them, and rejoiced, and said:    “O what a day for me, ye blessed gods,    Is this! With what delight I see my son    And grandson rivals on the battlefield.”  

    And then the blue-eyed Pallas, drawing near    Laertes, said: “Son of Arcesias, loved    By me beyond all others of my friends,    Pray to Jove’s blue-eyed daughter, and to Jove,    And brandish thy long spear, and send it forth.”  

    So Pallas spake, and breathed into his frame    Strength irresistible. The aged chief    Prayed to the daughter of almighty Jove,    And brandished his long spear and sent it forth.    It smote Eupeithes on the helmet’s cheek.    The brass stayed not the spear, the blade passed through,    And heavily Eupeithes fell to earth,    His armor clashing round him as he fell.    Then rushed Ulysses and his valiant son    Forward, the foremost of their band, and smote    Their foes with swords and lancet double-edged,    And would have struck them down to rise no more,    If Pallas, daughter of the god who bears    The aegis, had not with a mighty voice    Commanded all the combatants to cease:﻿—  

    “Stay, men of Ithaca; withhold your hands    From deadly combat. Part, and shed no blood.”  

    So Pallas spake, and they grew pale with awe,    And fear-struck; as they heard her words they dropped    Their weapons all upon the earth. They fled    Townward as if for life, while terribly    The much-enduring chief Ulysses raised    His voice, and shouted after them, and sprang    Upon them as an eagle darts through air.    Then Saturn’s son sent down a bolt of fire;    It fell before his blue-eyed daughter’s feet,    And thus the goddess to Ulysses called:﻿—  

    “Son of Laertes, nobly born and wise,    Ulysses, hold thy hand; restrain the rage    Of deadly combat, lest the god who wields    The thunder, Saturn’s son, be wroth with thee.”  

    She spake, and gladly he obeyed; and then    Pallas, the child of aegis-bearing Jove,    Plighted, in Mentor’s form with Mentor’s voice,    A covenant of peace between the foes.  

